INTERNATIONAL  FISHERIES: 

MANAGEMENT  AND  ENFORCEMENT 

S.  HRG.  110–1144 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

APRIL  3,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–048 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 3, 2008  ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
1 

WITNESSES 

Fisheries, U.S. Department of State 

Fisheries Service, NOAA, U.S. Department of Commerce 

Balsiger,  Ph.D.,  James  W.,  Acting  Assistant  Administrator,  National  Marine 
...............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Balton,  Hon.  David  A.,  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  of  State  for  Oceans  and 
..................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Benton, David, Executive Director, Marine Conservation Alliance  .....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Brooks,  Rear  Admiral  Arthur  E.,  Commander,  Coast  Guard  District  17,  U.S. 
Coast Guard, Department of Homeland Security  ..............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Negroponte, Hon. John D., Deputy Secretary, U.S. Department of State  ..........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Speer, Lisa, Director, Water and Oceans Program, Natural Resources Defense 
Council  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Cook, James, Vice President, Pacific Ocean Producers, LLC 

APPENDIX 

Cantwell, Hon. Maria, U.S. Senator from Washington, prepared statement  .....
Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  James  W.  Balsiger,  Ph.D.  by: 
Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. John F. Kerry 
..........................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Hon. David A. Balton by: 

Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to David Benton by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Rear  Admiral  Arthur  E.  Brooks 

by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. John F. Kerry 
..........................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to James Cook by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................
Hon. Ted Stevens  ..............................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  John  F.  Kerry  to  Hon. 
John Negroponte  ..................................................................................................

12 
14 

20 
22 
37 
41 

26 
28 
46 
49 
2 
3 

55 
57 

67 
67 

75 
73 
79 
81 

83 
84 

92 
93 

88 
86 
89 
90 

97 
96 
99 
98 

70 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Response to written questions submitted to Lisa Speer by: 

IV 

Page

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................ 102 
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ...................................................................................... 101 
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  .................................................................................... 103 
69 

Snowe, Hon. Olympia J., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement 

..........

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

INTERNATIONAL  FISHERIES: 

MANAGEMENT  AND  ENFORCEMENT 

THURSDAY,  APRIL  3,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The Committee met, pursuant to notice, at 9:58 a.m. in room SR– 
253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Good morning. Just over a year ago, President 
Bush  signed  into  law  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Reauthorization  Act, 
which  mandates  science-based  catch  limits  and  an  end  to  over-
fishing  in  U.S.  territories.  Now  the  primary  threat  to  sustainable 
fisheries  are  the  foreign  fleets  that  pillage  the  world’s  oceans  by 
practicing  illegal,  unreported,  and  unregulated  fishing  or  what  we 
call IUU fishing. We simply cannot allow this high seas piracy. 

I  want  you  to  note,  Mr.  Secretary,  I  understand  your  situation. 
I  will  put  my  statement  full  in  the  record  and  be  happy  to  turn  to 
you  for  your  comments  for  the  record.  Thank  you  very  much  for 
coming. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Just  over  a  year  ago,  President  Bush  signed  into  law  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Re-
authorization  Act  which  mandates  science-based  catch  limits  and  an  end  to  over-
fishing  in  the  U.S.  Now  the  primary  threat  to  sustainable  fisheries  are  the  foreign 
fleets that pillage the worlds oceans by practicing Illegal, Unreported, and Unregu-
lated fishing or IUU fishing. We simply cannot allow this high seas piracy. 

I  am  committed  to  making  sure  that  the  U.S.  has  every  authority,  resource,  and 
tool  we  need  to  bring  an  end  to  IUU  fishing.  The  Magnuson-Stevens  Reauthoriza-
tion  Act  contains  international  fisheries  compliance  and  monitoring  provisions,  but 
there is much more to do. 

In  December,  the  President  signed  into  law  my  legislation  requiring  NOAA  to 
maintain  a  list  of  IUU  fishing  vessels  around  the  world,  so  that  the  U.S.  can  take 
action  against  them  in  our  waters.  I  have  also  drafted  a  Senate  resolution  calling 
for  an  end  to  harmful  foreign  fishing  subsidies  that  lead  to  IUU  fishing,  as  well  as 
a  resolution  urging  U.S.  leadership  on  efforts  to  prepare  for  future  management  of 
Arctic  Ocean  fisheries.  Additionally,  I  am  committed  to  closing  the  gaps  in  inter-
national agreements that still leave large areas of the high seas in the North Pacific 
unregulated. 

Despite all these efforts, there are still loopholes that allow IUU fish to come into 
the U.S., and this must stop. I am currently preparing a bill that would strengthen 
the  laws  that  make  it  illegal  to  trade  in  fish  or  fish  products  harvested  from  IUU 
fishing.  This  bill  would  strengthen  civil  and  criminal  penalties  and  establish  a 
strong  and  effective  inter-agency  International  Fisheries  Enforcement  Program.  I 
urge my colleagues to join me in this effort. 
(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

I thank Ambassador Negroponte for his statement today and his ongoing support 
for  ratifying  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention.  Ratifying  this  Convention  would  fur-
ther  strengthen  our  presence  in  the  global  effort  to  sustain  our  international  fish-
eries. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  today.  I  would  especially  like  to 
thank  Coast  Guard  District  17  Commander  Rear  Admiral  Gene  Brooks  and  Dave 
Benton, Executive Director of the Marine Conservation Alliance, for making the long 
trip  from  Alaska  to  be  with  us.  I  would  also  like  to  thank  Jim  Balsiger  who  was 
recently appointed as Acting Administrator of the National Marine Fisheries Service 
following many years of service as Alaska’s Regional Director. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. NEGROPONTE, 

DEPUTY SECRETARY, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF STATE 

Mr.  NEGROPONTE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have  submitted 
a slightly longer statement for the record, but if I could make some 
summary  remarks?  I  appreciate  your  invitation  and  Senator 
Inouye’s  to  address  the  Committee  this  morning  on  ways  the 
United States can strengthen the management and enforcement of 
fisheries around the globe. 

Today, the State Department witness, Ambassador David Balton, 
who  is  the  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  for  Oceans  and  Fisheries, 
will  testify  in  much  greater  detail  about  our  efforts  to  formulate 
and  enforce  better  management  measures  for  international  fish-
eries.  For  my  part,  I  would  like  to  focus  on  how  the  challenges  we 
face  in  this  endeavor  are  compelling  reasons  for  the  United  States 
to  become  party  to  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention  as  soon  as  pos-
sible. 

With  155  parties,  including  the  major  fishing  nations,  the  Law 
of  the  Sea  Convention  is  widely  accepted  as  the  legal  framework 
under  which  all  international  fisheries  must  operate.  The  United 
States  accepts  the  fisheries  provisions  of  this  Convention.  Indeed, 
those  provisions  form  the  basis  of  a  related  treaty  that  the  United 
States  has  already  ratified,  the  1995  U.N.  Fish  Stocks  Agreement, 
which deals with the management of key stocks within and outside 
of the exclusive economic zone. 

Senator Stevens, you will recall that you went to the United Na-
tions when the U.N. Fish Stocks Agreement was adopted to deliver 
the  United  States’  intervention  supporting  that  agreement.  The 
United  States  was  the  third  country  to  ratify  the  Fish  Stocks 
Agreement,  and  we  also  chaired  the  seven  meetings  of  the  parties 
to  the  Agreement,  as  well  as  the  2004  review  conference  held  to 
consider its implementation. 

Despite  our  leadership  on  this  issue,  some  nations  still  question 
our intentions and our right to press for improvements in the man-
agement  and  enforcement  of  international  fisheries  rules  because 
we  have  not  yet  joined  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention.  Acceding 
to  the  Convention  will  give  us  greater  leverage  in  negotiating  on 
these matters, particularly in our efforts to eliminate illegal, unre-
ported, and unregulated fishing. 

American  fishermen  already  follow  these  standards,  and  they 
support  our  accession  to  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention.  By  doing 
so,  we  will  be  in  a  stronger  position  to  encourage  other  govern-
ments  to  hold  their  fishermen  accountable  to  the  same  standards 
that ours now uphold. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

Other  important  industries  support  the  Convention  as  well.  Oil 
and gas companies want international recognition and greater legal 
clarity  regarding  the  outer  limits  of  our  continental  shelf  beyond 
200  miles.  This  will  facilitate  access  to  the  vast  energy  resources 
residing  there,  particularly  in  the  Arctic.  American  companies  can 
recover valuable minerals from the deep sea bed only if we join the 
Convention  because  a  permit  issued  under  domestic  legislation 
would  not  provide  a  U.S.  entity  with  the  certainty  of  tenure  that 
it would require. 

The  telecommunications  and  shipping  industries  also  want  the 
Convention’s  protection  of  submarine  cables  and  navigational  free-
doms. An equally important reason to join is to put our vital navi-
gational rights on the firmest legal footing. The United States mili-
tary establishment continues to express its urgent need for our ac-
cession  to  the  Convention  in  order  to  promote  international  co-
operation on issues—on initiatives of national security importance, 
such as the Proliferation Security Initiative. 

Last, I want to note that no additional legislation on fisheries or 
on  any  other  topic  is  required  before  acceding  to  the  Convention. 
Indeed, the drafters of the 1976 Fishery Conservation and Manage-
ment  Act  intended  it  to  be  consistent  with  the  Convention’s  provi-
sions  on  fisheries,  and  subsequent  amendments  to  what  is  now 
known  as  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  have  preserved  that  consist-
ency. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  be  pleased  to  provide  for  the  record  my 
testimony  on  the  substance  of  the  Convention  before  the  Senate 
Foreign  Relations  Committee  in  a  hearing  last  fall  for  any  mem-
bers  who  might  be  interested.  I  know  that  you  are  a  strong  sup-
porter  of  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention  and  as  I  understand  is 
Chairman Inouye. And I thank you for your leadership and for this 
opportunity  to  make  the  case  for  U.S.  accession  to  the  Convention 
in  the  context  of  international  fisheries  management  and  enforce-
ment. 

And that concludes my summary remarks. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Negroponte follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. NEGROPONTE, DEPUTY SECRETARY, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF STATE 

Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  appre-
ciate  your  invitation  to  address  the  Committee  this  morning  on  ways  the  United 
States  can  strengthen  the  management  and  enforcement  of  fisheries  around  the 
globe.  Today,  the  State  Department  witness,  Ambassador  David  Balton,  will  testify 
in  much  greater  detail  about  our  efforts  to  formulate  and  enforce  better  manage-
ment measures for international fisheries. For my part, I would like to focus on how 
the challenges we face in this endeavor are compelling reasons for the United States 
to become party to the Law of the Sea Convention as soon as possible. 

With 155 parties, including the major fishing nations, the Law of the Sea Conven-
tion  is  widely  accepted  as  the  legal  framework  under  which  all  international  fish-
eries  must  operate.  The  United  States  accepts  the  fisheries  provisions  of  the  Con-
vention.  Indeed,  those  provisions  form  the  basis  of  a  related  treaty  that  the  United 
States  has  already  ratified—the  1995  U.N.  Fish  Stocks  Agreement—which  deals 
with  the  management  of  key  stocks  within  and  outside  of  the  Exclusive  Economic 
Zone. 

Vice  Chairman  Stevens  will  recall  that  he  went  to  the  United  Nations  when  the 
U.N. Fish Stocks Agreement was adopted to deliver the U.S. intervention supporting 
that  Agreement.  The  United  States  was  the  third  country  to  ratify  the  Fish  Stocks 
Agreement, and we also chaired the 7 meetings of the parties in the Agreement, as 
well as the 2004 Review Conference held to consider its implementation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

Despite  our  leadership  on  this  issue,  some  nations  still  question  our  intentions 
and  our  right  to  press  for  improvements  in  the  management  and  enforcement  of 
international  fisheries  rules—because  we  have  not  yet  joined  the  Law  of  the  Sea 
Convention. Acceding to the Convention will give us greater leverage in negotiating 
on  these  matters—particularly  in  our  efforts  to  eliminate  illegal,  unreported,  and 
unregulated fishing. 

American  fishermen  already  follow  these  standards  and  they  support  our  acces-
sion to the Law of the Sea Convention. By doing so, we will be in a stronger position 
to  encourage  other  governments  to  hold  their  fishermen  accountable  to  the  same 
standards that ours now uphold. 

Other  important  industries  support  the  Convention  as  well.  Oil  and  gas  compa-
nies  want  international  recognition  and  greater  legal  clarity  regarding  the  outer 
limits  of  our  continental  shelf  beyond  200  miles.  This  will  facilitate  access  to  the 
vast energy resources residing there, particularly in the Arctic. American companies 
can recover valuable minerals from the deep seabed only if we join the Convention, 
because  a  permit  issued  under  domestic  legislation  would  not  provide  a  U.S.  entity 
with certainty of tenure. The telecommunications and shipping industries also want 
the Convention’s protection of submarine cables and navigational freedoms. 

An  equally  important  reason  to  join  is  to  put  our  vital  navigational  rights  on  the 
firmest legal footing. The United States military establishment continues to express 
its  urgent  need  for  our  accession  to  the  Convention,  in  order  to  promote  inter-
national cooperation on initiatives of national security importance, such as the Pro-
liferation Security Initiative. 

Lastly,  I  want  to  note  that  no  additional  legislation  on  fisheries  or  on  any  other 
topic is required before acceding to the Convention. Indeed, the drafters of the 1976 
Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act  intended  it  to  be  consistent  with  the 
Convention’s  provisions  on  fisheries,  and  subsequent  amendments  to  what  is  now 
known as the Magnuson-Stevens Act have preserved that consistency. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  I  would  be  pleased  to  provide  for  the  record 
my  testimony  on  the  substance  of  the  Convention  before  the  Senate  Foreign  Rela-
tions  Committee  in  a  hearing  last  fall  for  any  members  who  might  be  interested. 
Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  I  know  that  you  are  both  strong  sup-
porters  of  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention.  I  thank  you  for  your  leadership  and  for 
this  opportunity  to  make  the  case  for  U.S.  accession  to  the  Convention  in  the  con-
text of international fisheries management and enforcement. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Secretary  Negroponte. 
Glad  to  see  you  are  here  and  willing  to  make  a  statement.  And  I 
appreciate  the  fact  that  you  are  once  again  back  in  the  State  De-
partment, where we need you. 

So we will put your full statement in the record, and I would ap-
preciate it if you would provide the Committee with a copy of your 
statements that you made before the other Committee. 

Mr. NEGROPONTE. I shall do that. 
Senator STEVENS. It would be helpful. 
[The information referred to follows:] 

WRITTEN TESTIMONY OF HON.  JOHN D.  NEGROPONTE,  DEPUTY SECRETARY, 
U.S.  DEPARTMENT OF STATE,  BEFORE THE SENATE FOREIGN RELATIONS 
COMMITTEE ON SEPTEMBER 27, 2007 

Hearing on Accession to the 1982 Law of the Sea Convention and Ratifica-
tion  of  the  1994  Agreement  Amending  Part  XI  of  the  Law  of  the  Sea 
Convention 

[Senate Treaty Document 103–39] 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  1982  United  Nations  Convention 
on  the  Law  of  the  Sea  (‘‘the  Convention’’)  and  the  1994  Agreement  relating  to  the 
Implementation of Part XI of the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea 
of 10 December 1982 (‘‘the 1994 Agreement’’). 

At my confirmation hearing earlier this year, I reminded the Committee that the 
Senate  confirmed  me  20  years  ago  as  Assistant  Secretary  for  Oceans  and  Inter-
national  Environmental  and  Scientific  Affairs.  Shortly  thereafter,  under  the  first 
President  Bush,  we  began  to  work  on  revising  the  deep  seabed  mining  section  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

the  Convention  to  address  the  flaws  President  Reagan  had  correctly  identified,  so 
that  we  could  join  the  Convention.  That  effort  succeeded,  resulting  in  the  1994 
Agreement overhauling the deep seabed mining regime, as I will explain in greater 
detail. 

Since  my  first  involvement  with  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention,  I  have  had  the 
privilege  to  serve  the  United  States  in  other  assignments  that  have  only  strength-
ened  my  support  for  this  treaty.  As  Ambassador  to  the  United  Nations,  I  learned 
that  other  countries  look  to  the  United  States  for  leadership  on  oceans  issues  such 
as maritime security—a role that is lessened without U.S. accession to the Conven-
tion.  As  Ambassador  to  Iraq,  I  saw  first-hand  the  importance  of  navigational  free-
doms for deploying and sustaining our forces in combat zones, and how the Conven-
tion serves as a foundation for our partnerships in the Proliferation Security Initia-
tive.  Most  recently,  as  Director  of  National  Intelligence,  I  was  reminded  how  the 
Convention  strengthens  our  ability  to  carry  out  intelligence  activities  that  other 
countries might seek to restrain. 

Mr.  Chairman,  these  experiences  compel  me  to  endorse—most  enthusiastically 
and emphatically—the President’s urgent request that the Senate approve the Con-
vention,  as  modified  by  the  1994  Agreement.  As  the  President  said  in  his  May  15 
statement, joining will serve the national security interests of the United States, se-
cure  U.S.  sovereign  rights  over  extensive  marine  areas,  promote  U.S.  interests  in 
the  environmental  health  of  the  oceans,  and  give  the  United  States  a  seat  at  the 
table when the rights essential to our interests are debated and interpreted. 
History 

From  the  earliest  days  of  its  history,  the  United  States  has  relied  on  the  bounty 
and the opportunity of the seas for sustenance, for trade and economic development, 
for  defense,  for  communication,  and  for  interaction  with  the  rest  of  the  world. 
Today,  as  the  world’s  strongest  maritime  power  and  a  leader  in  global  maritime 
trade and commerce, the United States has a compelling national interest in a sta-
ble  international  legal  regime  for  the  oceans.  We  have  consistently  sought  balance 
between  the  interests  of  countries  in  controlling  activities  off  their  coasts  and  the 
interests  of  all  countries  in  protecting  freedom  of  navigation.  The  United  States 
joined a group of law of the sea treaties in 1958, by which it is still bound. But those 
treaties  left  open  some  important  issues.  For  example,  they  did  not  set  forth  the 
maximum breadth of the territorial sea, an issue of critical importance to U.S. free-
dom  of  navigation,  and  they  did  not  set  forth  a  procedure  for  providing  legal  cer-
tainty regarding the continental shelf. We therefore continued to pursue completion 
of a single, integrated law of the sea treaty that would attract near-universal accept-
ance;  the  U.S.  delegation  played  a  very  prominent  role  in  the  negotiating  session 
that began under the Nixon Administration and culminated in the 1982 Convention. 
The  resulting  treaty  was  a  victory  for  U.S.  navigational,  economic,  and  other  in-
terests  except  for  one  important  issue—deep  seabed  mining.  Due  to  flaws  in  the 
deep seabed mining chapter—Part XI of the Convention—President Reagan decided 
not  to  sign  the  1982  Convention.  However,  the  other  aspects  of  the  treaty  were  so 
favorable that President Reagan, in his Ocean Policy Statement in 1983, announced 
that the United States accepted, and would act in accordance with, the Convention’s 
balance  of  interests  relating  to  traditional  uses  of  the  oceans—everything  but  deep 
seabed  mining.  He  instructed  the  Government  to  abide  by,  or  as  the  case  may  be, 
to  enjoy  the  rights  accorded  by,  the  other  provisions,  and  to  encourage  other  coun-
tries to do likewise. 

As I mentioned earlier, the first Bush Administration agreed to participate in ne-
gotiations  that  modified  Part  XI—in  a  legally  binding  manner—overcoming  each  of 
the  objections  that  President  Reagan  had  identified.  The  United  States  signed  that 
Agreement  in  1994.  The  Convention  came  into  force  that  same  year,  and  has  since 
been joined by industrialized countries that shared the U.S. objections to the initial 
deep seabed mining chapter. There are now 155 parties to the Convention, including 
almost all of our traditional allies. 

This Administration expressed its strong support for the Convention in testimony 
before  this  Committee  in  the  fall  of  2003.  Thereafter  we  worked  closely  with  the 
Committee  to  develop  a  proposed  Resolution  of  Advice  and  Consent,  which  we  con-
tinue to support, that addressed a number of issues, including those relating to U.S. 
military interests. Since then, our conviction has only grown: we must join the Law 
of the Sea Convention, and join it now, to take full advantage of the many benefits 
it  offers  the  United  States  and  to  avoid  the  increasing  costs  of  being  a  non-party. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Joining Is a Win-Win 

6 

Joining  is  a  win/win  proposition.  We  will  not  have  to  change  U.S.  laws  or  prac-
tices, or give up rights, and we will benefit in a variety of ways. The United States 
already acts in accordance with the Convention for a number of reasons: 

the same provisions as the Convention. 

• First,  as  noted,  we  are  party  to  a  group  of  1958  treaties  that  contain  many  of 
• Second,  the  United  States  heavily  influenced  the  content  of  the  1982  Conven-
• Finally,  the  treaty  has  been  the  cornerstone  of  U.S.  oceans  policy  since  1983, 
when  President  Reagan  instructed  the  Executive  Branch  to  act  in  accordance 
with the Convention’s provisions with the exception of deep seabed mining. 

tion, based on U.S. law, policy, and practice. 

Thus, we are in the advantageous position in the case of this treaty that U.S. ad-

herence to its terms is already time-tested and works well. 

At the same time, the United States would gain substantial benefits from joining 
the  Convention—these  can  be  summarized  in  terms  of  security,  sovereignty,  and 
sustainability. 

Security.  As  the  world’s  foremost  maritime  power,  our  security  interests  are  in-
trinsically  linked  to  freedom  of  navigation.  We  have  more  to  gain  from  legal  cer-
tainty and public order in the world’s oceans than any other country. Our forces are 
deployed throughout the world, and we are engaged in combat operations in Central 
and  Southwest  Asia.  The  U.S.  Armed  Forces  rely  on  the  navigational  rights  and 
freedoms reflected in the Convention for worldwide access to get to the fight, sustain 
our  forces  during  the  fight,  and  return  home  safely,  without  permission  from  other 
countries. 

In  this  regard,  the  Convention  secures  the  rights  we  need  for  U.S.  military  ships 
and the commercial ships that support our forces to meet national security require-
ments in four ways: 

sovereignty—to 12 nautical miles; 

• by limiting coastal States’ territorial seas—within which they exercise the most 
• by affording our military and commercial vessels and aircraft necessary passage 
rights  through  other  countries’  territorial  seas  and  archipelagoes,  as  well  as 
through  straits  used  for  international  navigation  (such  as  the  critical  right  of 
submarines to transit submerged through such straits); 
• by setting forth maximum navigational rights and freedoms for our vessels and 
aircraft in the exclusive economic zones of other countries and in the high seas; 
and 
• by  affirming  the  authority  of  U.S.  warships  and  government  ships  to  board 
stateless  vessels  on  the  high  seas,  which  is  a  critically  important  element  of 
maritime security operations, counter-narcotic operations, and anti-proliferation 
efforts, including the Proliferation Security Initiative. 

The United States has had a certain amount of success in promoting these provi-
sions  internationally  as  reflective  of  customary  international  law,  as  well  as  in  en-
forcing them through operational challenges. However, these tools alone are not ade-
quate to ensure the continued vitality of these rights. Customary law is not univer-
sally accepted and, in any event, changes over time—in this case, potentially to the 
detriment  of  our  interests.  There  are  increasing  pressures  from  coastal  States 
around the world to evolve the law of the sea in ways that would unacceptably alter 
the balance of interests struck in the Convention. Operational challenges are inher-
ently  risky  and  resource-intensive.  Joining  the  Convention  would  put  the  naviga-
tional rights reflected in the Convention on the firmest legal footing. We would have 
treaty rights rather than have to rely solely upon the acceptance of customary inter-
national law rights by other states or upon the threat or use of force. Securing these 
treaty  rights,  and  obtaining  a  seat  at  the  table  in  treaty-based  institutions,  would 
provide  a  safeguard  against  changes  in  State  practice  that  could  cause  customary 
law  to  drift  in  an  unfavorable  direction.  Moreover,  joining  would  promote  the  will-
ingness of other countries to cooperate with us on initiatives of great security impor-
tance, such as the Proliferation Security Initiative. 

Sovereignty.  Joining  the  Convention  would  advance  U.S.  economic  and  resource 
interests. Recent Russian expeditions to the Arctic have focused attention on the re-
source-related  benefits  of  being  a  party  to  the  Convention.  Because  so  much  is  at 
stake  in  vast  areas  of  continental  shelf  beyond  200  nautical  miles,  I  will  explain  in 
some  detail  the  Convention’s  provisions  that  govern  these  areas  and  why  being  a 
party  would  put  the  United  States  in  a  far  better  position  in  terms  of  maximizing 
its sovereign rights. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

The  Convention  recognizes  the  sovereign  rights  of  a  coastal  State  over  its  conti-
nental  shelf,  which  extends  out  to  200  nautical  miles—and  beyond,  if  it  meets  spe-
cific  criteria.  These  rights  include  sovereign  rights  for  the  purpose  of  exploring  the 
continental  shelf  and  exploiting  its  natural  resources,  including  oil,  gas,  and  other 
energy  resources.  U.S.  interests  are  well  served  not  only  by  the  Convention’s  de-
tailed  definition  of  the  shelf  (in  contrast  to  the  1958  Convention’s  vague  standard), 
but  also  by  its  procedures  for  gaining  certainty  regarding  the  shelf’s  outer  limits. 
Parties  enjoy  access  to  the  expert  body  whose  technical  recommendations  provide 
the needed international recognition and legal certainty to the establishment of con-
tinental shelf beyond 200 nautical miles. 

Following such procedures, Russia made the first submission (in 2001) to that ex-
pert body, the Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelf. The Commission 
found  that  Russia  needed  to  collect  additional  data  to  substantiate  its  submission. 
Russia has announced that the data it collected this year support the claim that its 
continental  shelf  extends  as  far  as  the  North  Pole.  Setting  aside  its  recent  flag 
planting,  which  has  only  symbolic  value,  Russia’s  continuing  data  collection  in  the 
Arctic reflects its commitment to maximizing its sovereign rights under the Conven-
tion over energy resources in that region. 

Currently,  as  a  non-party,  the  United  States  is  not  in  a  position  to  maximize  its 
sovereign  rights  in  the  Arctic  or  elsewhere.  We  do  not  have  access  to  the  Commis-
sion’s  procedures  for  according  international  recognition  and  legal  certainty  to  our 
extended shelf. And we have not been able to nominate an expert for election to the 
Commission.  Thus,  there  is  no  U.S.  Commissioner  to  review  the  detailed  data  sub-
mitted by other countries on their shelves. 

Norway  has  also  made  a  submission  to  support  its  extended  continental  shelf  in 
the  Arctic,  and  Canada  and  Denmark  are  conducting  surveys  there  to  collect  data 
for their submissions. The Commission has already made recommendations on sub-
missions  by  Brazil  and  Ireland  and  is  considering  several  other  submissions.  Many 
more are expected in the coming months. 

The  United  States  has  one  of  the  largest  continental  shelves  in  the  world;  in  the 
Arctic, for example, our shelf could run as far as 600 miles from the coastline. How-
ever, as noted, we have no access to the Commission, whose recommendations would 
facilitate  the  full  exercise  of  our  sovereign  rights—whether  we  use  them  to  explore 
and  exploit  natural  resources,  prevent  other  countries  from  doing  so,  or  otherwise. 
In the absence of the international recognition and legal certainty that the Conven-
tion provides, U.S. companies are unlikely to secure the necessary financing and in-
surance  to  exploit  energy  resources  on  the  extended  shelf,  and  we  will  be  less  able 
to keep other countries from exploiting them. 

Joining  the  Convention  provides  other  economic  benefits:  it  also  gives  coastal 
States  the  right  to  claim  an  exclusive  economic  zone  (‘‘EEZ’’)  out  to  200  nautical 
miles.  That  gives  the  United  States,  with  its  extensive  coastline,  the  largest  EEZ 
of any country in the world. In this vast area, we have sovereign rights for the pur-
pose  of  exploring,  exploiting,  conserving,  and  managing  living  and  non-living  nat-
ural resources. 

Sustainability.  The  Convention  also  supports  U.S.  interests  in  the  health  of  the 
world’s  oceans  and  the  living  resources  they  contain.  It  addresses  marine  pollution 
from a variety of sources, including ocean dumping and operational discharges from 
vessels.  The  framework  appropriately  balances  the  interests  of  the  coastal  State  in 
protection  of  the  marine  environment  and  its  natural  resources  with  the  naviga-
tional  rights  and  freedoms  of  all  States.  This  framework,  among  other  things,  sup-
ports vital economic activities off the coast of the United States. Further, the United 
States  has  stringent  laws  regulating  protection  of  the  marine  environment,  and  we 
would be in a stronger position as a party to the Convention as we encourage other 
countries to follow suit. 

The  Convention  also  promotes  the  conservation  of  various  marine  resources.  In-
deed,  U.S.  ocean  resource-related  industries  strongly  support  U.S.  accession  to  the 
Convention. U.S. fishermen, for example, want their government to be in the strong-
est  possible  position  to  encourage  other  governments  to  hold  their  fishermen  to  the 
same standards we are already following, under the Convention and under the Fish 
Stocks  Agreement  that  elaborates  the  Convention’s  provisions  on  straddling  fish 
stocks and highly migratory fish stocks. 

Joining  the  Convention  provides  other  important  benefits  that  straddle  the  secu-
rity,  sovereignty,  and  sustainability  categories.  For  example,  its  provisions  protect 
laying and maintaining the fiber optic cables through which the modern world com-
municates, for both military and commercial purposes; for that reason, the U.S. tele-
communications industry is a strong supporter of the Convention. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

We Need to Join Now 

8 

Some  may  ask  why,  after  the  Convention  has  been  in  force  for  thirteen  years, 
there is an urgent need to join. There are compelling reasons why we need to accede 
to the Convention now. 

Although the first several years of the Convention’s life were fairly quiet, its pro-
visions are now being actively applied, interpreted, and developed. The Convention’s 
institutions  are  up  and  running,  and  we—the  country  with  the  most  to  gain  and 
lose on law of the sea issues—are sitting on the sidelines. For example, the Commis-
sion  on  the  Limits  of  the  Continental  Shelf  (which  is  the  technical  body  charged 
with  addressing  the  continental  shelf  beyond  200  nautical  miles)  has  received  nine 
submissions and has made recommendations on two of them, without the participa-
tion of a U.S. commissioner. Recommendations made in that body could well create 
precedents,  positive  and  negative,  on  the  future  outer  limit  of  the  U.S.  shelf.  We 
need to be on the inside to protect our interests. Moreover, in fora outside the Con-
vention,  the  provisions  of  the  Convention  are  also  being  actively  applied.  Our  posi-
tion as a non-Party puts us in a far weaker position to advance U.S. interests than 
should be the case for our country. 

We also need to join now to lock in, as a matter of treaty law, the very favorable 
provisions  we  achieved  in  negotiating  the  Convention.  It  would  be  risky  to  assume 
that  we  can  preserve  ad  infinitum  the  situation  upon  which  the  United  States  cur-
rently  relies.  As  noted,  there  is  increasing  pressure  from  coastal  States  to  augment 
their  authority  in  a  manner  that  would  alter  the  balance  of  interests  struck  in  the 
Convention.  We  should  secure  these  favorable  treaty  rights  while  we  have  the 
chance. 
Deep Seabed Mining 

One  part  of  the  Convention  deserves  special  attention,  because,  in  its  original 
version,  it  kept  the  United  States  and  other  industrialized  countries  from  joining. 
Part XI of the Convention, now modified by the 1994 Implementing Agreement, es-
tablishes  a  system  for  facilitating  potential  mining  activities  on  the  seabed  beyond 
the  limits  of  national  jurisdiction—specifically,  the  deep  seabed  beyond  the  conti-
nental  shelf  of  any  nation.  The  Convention,  as  modified,  meets  our  goal  of  guaran-
teed  access  by  U.S.  industry  to  deep  seabed  minerals  under  reasonable  terms  and 
conditions. 

Specifically,  the  Convention  sets  forth  the  process  by  which  mining  firms  can 
apply  for  and  obtain  access  and  exclusive  legal  rights  to  deep  seabed  mineral  re-
sources. The International Seabed Authority is responsible for overseeing such min-
ing;  it  includes  an  Assembly,  open  to  all  Parties,  and  a  36-member  Council.  The 
Authority’s role is limited to administering deep seabed mining of mineral resources 
in  areas  beyond  national  jurisdiction;  it  has  no  other  authority  over  uses  of  the 
oceans  or  over  other  resources  in  the  oceans.  The  Council  is  the  primary  decision- 
making  body,  with  responsibility  for  giving  practical  effect  to  the  requirement  for 
non-discriminatory access to deep seabed minerals and for adopting rules for explo-
ration and development. 

The 1994 Agreement, which contains legally binding changes to the 1982 Conven-
tion, fundamentally overhauls the deep seabed mining provisions in a way that sat-
isfies  each  of  the  objections  of  the  United  States,  as  stated  by  President  Reagan, 
and of other industrialized countries. President Reagan considered that those provi-
sions  would  deter  future  development  of  deep  seabed  mining;  establish  a  decision- 
making  process  that  would  not  give  the  United  States  a  role  that  reflected  or  pro-
tected  its  interests;  allow  amendments  to  enter  into  force  without  the  approval  of 
the  United  States;  provide  for  mandatory  transfer  of  technology;  allow  national  lib-
eration  movements  to  share  in  the  benefits  of  deep  seabed  mining;  and  not  assure 
access of future qualified miners. 

The 1994 Agreement overcomes these objections and ensures that the administra-
tion  of  deep  seabed  mining  is  based  on  free-market  principles.  Specifically,  the 
Agreement: 

• deletes the objectionable provisions on mandatory technology transfer; 
• ensures that market-oriented approaches are taken to the management of deep 
seabed minerals (e.g., by eliminating production controls), replacing the original 
Part XI’s centralized economic planning approach; 
• scales  back  the  deep  seabed  mining  institutions  and  links  their  activation  and 
• guarantees  the  United  States  a  permanent  seat  on  the  Council,  where  sub-
stantive  decisions  are  made  by  consensus—the  effect  of  which  is  that  any  deci-
sion that would result in a substantive obligation on the United States, or that 
would have financial or budgetary implications, would require U.S. consent; 

operation to actual development of interest in deep seabed mining; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

• ensures  that  the  United  States  would  need  to  approve  the  adoption  of  any 
amendment to the Part XI provisions and any distribution of deep seabed min-
ing revenues accumulated under the Convention; and 
• recognizes  the  seabed  mine  claims  established  on  the  basis  of  the  exploration 
already  conducted  by  U.S.  companies  and  provides  assured  equality  of  access 
for any future qualified U.S. miners. 

The  deep  seabed  is  an  area  that  the  United  States  has  never  claimed  and  has 
consistently  recognized  as  being  beyond  the  sovereignty  and  jurisdiction  of  any  na-
tion.  As  reflected  in  U.S.  law  (the  Deep  Seabed  Hard  Mineral  Resources  Act  of 
1980),  it  has  long  viewed  deep  seabed  mining  as  an  activity  appropriate  for  inter-
national  administration.  The  United  States  asked  for  changes  to  the  1982  Conven-
tion’s  deep  seabed  mining  provisions  and  got  them.  As  George  P.  Shultz,  Secretary 
of State to President Reagan, said recently in a letter to Senator Lugar: ‘‘The treaty 
has  been  changed  in  such  a  way  with  respect  to  the  deep  sea-beds  that  it  is  now 
acceptable, in my judgment. Under these circumstances, and given the many desir-
able aspects of the treaty on other grounds, I believe it is time to proceed with ratifi-
cation.’’ 
Why Stay Out? 

Given all the valuable benefits of joining and the substantial costs of not joining, 
is  there  a  persuasive  argument  why  the  United  States  should  remain  a  non-party? 
I do not think there is one. 

Certain  arguments  distort  the  risks  of  joining  and/or  paint  an  unrealistic  picture 
of  our  situation  as  a  non-party.  In  this  regard,  opponents  do  not  offer  viable  alter-
natives  to  the  Convention.  Some  say  we  should  rely  on  the  1958  conventions;  how-
ever,  those  are  less  favorable  in  many  respects,  such  as  navigational  rights,  the 
outer limits of the continental shelf, and authority to conduct boardings on the high 
seas. Some say we should continue to rely on customary law; however, as noted, cus-
tomary  law  is  not  universally  accepted,  evolves  based  on  State  practice,  and  does 
not  provide  access  to  the  Convention’s  procedural  mechanisms,  such  as  the  conti-
nental  shelf  commission.  Finally,  some  say  we  should  rely  on  the  threat  or  use  of 
force; however, it is implausible and unwise to think that the United States can rely 
on military power alone to enforce its rights, particularly economic rights. 

Certain arguments against U.S. accession are simply inaccurate. And other argu-
ments are outdated, in the sense that they may have been true before the deep sea-
bed  mining  provisions  were  fixed  and  thus  are  no  longer  true.  I  would  like  to  ad-
dress some of these ‘‘myths’’ surrounding the Convention: 

Myth: Joining the Convention would surrender U.S. sovereignty. 
Reality:  On  the  contrary.  Some  have  called  the  Convention  a  ‘‘U.S.  land  grab.’’ 
It expands U.S. sovereignty and sovereign rights over extensive maritime terri-
tory  and  natural  resources  off  its  coast,  as  described  earlier  in  my  testimony. 
It  is  rare  that  a  treaty  actually  increases  the  area  over  which  a  country  exer-
cises sovereign rights, but this treaty does. The Convention does not harm U.S. 
sovereignty  in  any  respect.  As  sought  by  the  United  States,  the  dispute  resolu-
tion mechanisms provide appropriate flexibility in terms of both the forum and 
the exclusion of sensitive subject matter. The deep seabed mining provisions do 
not apply to any areas in which the United States has sovereignty or sovereign 
rights;  further,  these  rules  will  facilitate  mining  activities  by  U.S.  companies. 
And  the  navigational  provisions  affirm  the  freedoms  that  are  important  to  the 
worldwide mobility of U.S. military and commercial vessels. 
Myth:  The  Convention  is  a  ‘‘UN’’  treaty  and  therefore  does  not  serve  our  inter-
ests. 
Reality:  The  Convention  is  not  the  United  Nations—it  was  merely  negotiated 
there,  as  are  many  agreements,  and  negotiated  by  States,  not  by  U.N.  bureau-
crats.  Further,  just  because  a  treaty  was  drawn  up  at  the  U.N.  does  not  mean 
it  does  not  serve  our  interests.  For  example,  the  United  States  benefits  from 
U.N.  treaties  such  as  the  Convention  Against  Corruption  and  the  Convention 
for  the  Suppression  of  Terrorist  Bombings.  The  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention  is 
another such treaty that serves U.S. interests. 
Myth:  The  International  Seabed  Authority  (ISA)  has  the  power  to  regulate 
seven-tenths of the Earth’s surface. 
Reality:  The  Convention  addresses  seven-tenths  of  the  earth’s  surface;  the  ISA 
does  not.  First,  the  ISA  does  not  address  activities  in  the  water  column,  such 
as  navigation.  Second,  the  ISA  has  nothing  to  do  with  the  ocean  floor  that  is 
subject  to  the  sovereignty  or  sovereign  rights  of  any  country,  including  that  of 
the United States. Third, the ISA only addresses deep seabed mining. Thus, its 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

role  is  limited  to  mining  activities  in  areas  of  the  ocean  floor  beyond  national 
jurisdiction.  It  has  no  other  role  and  no  general  authority  over  the  uses  of  the 
oceans, including freedom of navigation and overflight. 
Myth: The Convention gives the U.N. its first opportunity to levy taxes. 
Reality: Although the Convention was negotiated under U.N. auspices, it is sep-
arate from the U.N. and its institutions are not U.N. bodies. Further, there are 
no  taxes  of  any  kind  on  individuals  or  corporations  or  others.  Concerning  oil/ 
gas production within 200 nautical miles of shore, the United States gets exclu-
sive  sovereign  rights  to  seabed  resources  within  the  largest  such  area  in  the 
world.  There  are  no  finance-related  requirements  in  the  EEZ.  Concerning  oil/ 
gas  production  beyond  200  nautical  miles  of  shore,  the  United  States  is  one  of 
a  group  of  countries  potentially  entitled  to  extensive  continental  shelf  beyond 
its EEZ. Countries that benefit from an Extended Continental Shelf have no re-
quirements for the first 5 years of production at a site; in the sixth year of pro-
duction, they are to make payments equal to 1 percent of production, increasing 
by 1 percent a year until capped at 7 percent in the twelfth year of production. 
If the United States were to pay royalties, it would be because U.S. oil and gas 
companies are engaged in successful production beyond 200 nautical miles. But 
if the United States does not become a party, U.S. companies will likely not be 
willing  or  able  to  engage  in  oil/gas  activities  in  such  areas,  as  I  explained  ear-
lier. 

Concerning  mineral  activities  in  the  deep  seabed,  which  is  beyond  U.S.  jurisdic-
tion, an interested company would pay an application fee for the administrative ex-
penses  of  processing  the  application.  Any  amount  that  did  not  get  used  for  proc-
essing the application would be returned to the applicant. The Convention does not 
set  forth  any  royalty  requirements  for  production;  the  United  States  would  need  to 
agree to establish any such requirements. 

In  no  event  would  any  payments  go  to  the  United  Nations,  but  rather  would  be 
distributed  to  countries  in  accordance  with  a  formula  to  which  the  United  States 
would have to agree. 

Myth:  The  Convention  would  permit  an  international  tribunal  to  second-guess 
the U.S. Navy. 
Reality:  No  international  tribunal  would  have  jurisdiction  over  the  U.S.  Navy. 
U.S.  military  activities,  including  those  of  the  U.S.  Navy,  would  not  be  subject 
to  any  form  of  dispute  resolution.  The  Convention  expressly  permits  a  party  to 
exclude  from  dispute  settlement  those  disputes  that  concern  ‘‘military  activi-
ties.’’  The  United  States  will  have  the  exclusive  right  to  determine  what  con-
stitutes a military activity. 
Myth: The International Tribunal for the Law of the Sea could order the release 
of a vessel apprehended by the U.S. military. 
Reality: The Tribunal has no jurisdiction to order release in such a case. Its au-
thority  to  address  the  prompt  release  of  vessels  applies  only  to  two  types  of 
cases:  fishing  and  protection  of  the  marine  environment.  Further,  even  if  its 
mandate  did  extend  further—which  it  does  not—the  United  States  will  be  tak-
ing advantage of the optional exclusion of military activities from dispute settle-
ment. As such, in no event would the Tribunal have any authority to direct the 
release of a vessel apprehended by the U.S. military. 
Myth:  The  Convention  was  drafted  before—and  without  regard  to—the  war  on 
terror and what the United States must do to wage it successfully. 
Reality: The Convention enhances, rather than undermines, our ability to wage 
the  war  on  terror.  Maximum  maritime  naval  and  air  mobility  is  essential  for 
our military forces to operate effectively. The Convention provides the necessary 
stability and framework for our forces, weapons, and materiel to get to the fight 
without  hindrance.  It  is  essential  that  key  sea  and  air  lanes  remain  open  as 
a  matter  of  international  legal  right  and  not  be  contingent  upon  approval  from 
nations  along  those  routes.  The  senior  U.S.  military  leadership—the  Joint 
Chiefs of Staff—has recently confirmed the continuing importance of U.S. acces-
sion to the Convention in a letter to the Committee. 
Myth: The Convention would prohibit or impair U.S. intelligence and submarine 
activities. 
Reality:  The  Convention  does  not  prohibit  or  impair  intelligence  or  submarine 
activities.  Joining  the  Convention  would  not  affect  the  conduct  of  intelligence 
activities  in  any  way.  This  issue  was  the  subject  of  extensive  hearings  in  2004 
before  the  Senate  Select  Committee  on  Intelligence.  Witnesses  from  Defense, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

CIA, and State all confirmed that U.S. intelligence and submarine activities are 
not adversely affected by the Convention. 

We  follow  the  navigational  provisions  of  the  Convention  today  and  are  not  ad-

versely affected; similarly, we would not be adversely affected by joining. 

Myth: The United States can rely on use or threat of force to protect its naviga-
tional interests fully. 
Reality:  The  United  States  has  utilized  diplomatic  and  operational  challenges 
to  resist  the  excessive  maritime  claims  of  other  countries  that  interfere  with 
U.S.  navigational  rights.  But  these  operations  entail  a  certain  degree  of  risk, 
as  well  as  resources.  Being  a  party  to  the  Convention  would  significantly  en-
hance  our  efforts  to  roll  back  these  claims  by,  among  other  things,  putting  the 
United States in a stronger position to assert our rights. 
Myth:  Joining  the  Convention  would  hurt  U.S.  maritime  interdiction  efforts 
under the Proliferation Security Initiative (PSI). 
Reality: Joining the Convention would not affect applicable maritime law or pol-
icy  regarding  the  interdiction  of  weapons  of  mass  destruction.  PSI  specifically 
requires  participating  countries  to  act  consistent  with  international  law,  which 
includes  the  law  reflected  in  the  Convention.  Almost  all  PSI  partners  are  par-
ties  to  the  Convention.  Further,  joining  the  Convention  is  likely  to  strengthen 
PSI by attracting new cooperative partners. 
Myth: President Reagan thought the treaty was irremediably defective. 
Reality:  As  explained  above,  President  Reagan  identified  only  certain  deep  sea-
bed  mining  provisions  of  the  Convention  as  flawed.  His  1983  Ocean  Policy 
Statement  demonstrates  that  he  embraced  the  non-deep-seabed  provisions  and 
established them as official U.S. policy. The 1994 Agreement overcomes each of 
the  objections  to  the  deep  seabed  mining  provisions  identified  by  President 
Reagan.  As  President  Reagan’s  Secretary  of  State,  George  P.  Shultz,  noted  in 
his  recent  letter  to  Senator  Lugar,  ‘‘It  surprises  me  to  learn  that  opponents  of 
the  treaty  are  invoking  President  Reagan’s  name,  arguing  that  he  would  have 
opposed ratification despite having succeeded on the deep sea-bed issue. During 
his  administration,  with  full  clearance  and  support  from  President  Reagan,  we 
made it very clear that we would support ratification if our position on the sea- 
bed issue were accepted.’’ 
Myth: The Convention provides for mandatory technology transfer. 
Reality:  Mandatory  technology  transfer  was  eliminated  by  the  1994  Agreement 
that modified the original Convention. 
Myth:  The  United  States  could  and  should  renegotiate  a  new  law  of  the  sea 
agreement, confined to the provisions on navigational freedoms. 
Reality:  Assuming,  for  the  sake  of  argument,  that  this  were  a  desirable  out-
come,  other  countries  would  have  no  reason  or  incentive  to  enter  into  such  a 
negotiation. The Convention is widely accepted, having been joined by over 150 
parties including all other major maritime powers and most other industrialized 
nations. Those parties are generally satisfied with the entirety of the treaty and 
would be unwilling to sacrifice other provisions of the Convention, such as bene-
fits  associated  with  exclusive  economic  zones  and  sovereign  rights  over  the  re-
sources  they  contain,  as  well  as  continental  shelves  out  to  200  nautical  miles 
and  in  some  cases  far  beyond.  And  parties  that  would  like  to  impose  new  con-
straints  on  our  navigational  freedoms  certainly  would  not  accept  the  1982 
version of those freedoms. 

Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  confident  that  the  Committee  will  agree  that  U.S.  accession 
to the Convention is the best way to secure navigational and economic rights related 
to  the  law  of  the  sea.  I  hope  I  have  convinced  the  Committee  that  arguments 
against  joining  the  Convention  are  completely  unfounded,  that  there  are  not  viable 
alternatives to joining, and that we cannot just go out and negotiate another treaty, 
much less one that is more favorable. And we certainly cannot have much influence 
over development of the law of the sea in the 21st Century from outside the Conven-
tion. 

The  safest,  most  secure,  and  most  cost-effective  way  to  lock  in  these  significant 
benefits  to  our  ocean-related  interests  is  to  join  the  Convention.  President  Bush, 
Secretary  Rice,  and  I  urge  the  Committee—once  again—to  give  its  swift  approval 
for  U.S.  accession  to  the  Law  of  the  Sea  Convention  and  ratification  of  the  1994 
Agreement,  and  we  urge  the  Senate  to  give  its  advice  and  consent  before  the  end 
of this session of Congress. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

Senator  STEVENS.  But  we  do  thank  you  for  coming,  and  I  know 

you have another appointment. So there will be no questions. 

Mr.  NEGROPONTE.  I  thank  you  very  much  for  this  opportunity 

and look forward to continuing to work with you on this issue. 

Thank you. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Mr. Secretary. 
Now,  our  first  panel  is  Dr.  James  Balsiger,  Assistant  Adminis-
trator for Fisheries, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administra-
tion,  NOAA;  Mr.  David  Balton,  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  for 
Oceans  and  Fisheries,  Department  of  State;  and  Rear  Admiral 
Gene Brooks, Commander of the 17th Coast Guard District and the 
force’s Maritime Component Commander for Alaska. 

Gentlemen, your statements will appear in full on the record. Ap-
preciate  your  comments.  There  is  no  limit  on  what  comments  you 
want to make. But let us proceed in the order that I indicated. 

Dr. Balsiger, you would be first, please. 

Doctor? 

STATEMENT OF JAMES W. BALSIGER, PH.D., ACTING ASSISTANT 
ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL  MARINE  FISHERIES  SERVICE, 
NOAA, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Dr. BALSIGER. Thank you. Good morning. I am Jim Balsiger, the 
Acting  Assistant  Administrator  for  Fisheries  within  the  National 
Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Can  you  pull  that  mike  toward  you,  please, 

Dr. BALSIGER. Of course. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
Dr.  BALSIGER.  With  the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce.  Thank 
you,  Senator  Stevens,  and  my  thanks  to  Chairman  Inouye  for  the 
invitation  to  this  hearing.  Thanks  to  the  Members  of  the  Senate 
Commerce  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  describe  some  of  the 
challenges of international fisheries management. 

I  am  pleased  to  see  Congress  has  increased  attention  on  these 
issues.  Thanks  to  the  efforts  of  this  Committee,  Congress  adopted 
and  the  President  signed  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fisheries  Con-
servation  and  Management  Reauthorization  Act  in  January  2007. 
This  act  contains  several  new  provisions  that  will  significantly 
shape  the  focus  of  our  international  fisheries  management  efforts. 
Fulfilling  this  mandate  is  a  high  priority  for  my  agency,  and  I 
will  illustrate  this  with  some  of  the  examples  from  our  work  with 
the  regional  fishery  management  organizations,  or  the  RFMOs. 
Many  of  our  target  fish  stocks  and  protected  species  range  into 
waters  of  other  countries.  So  our  management  strategies  require  a 
multilateral, regional approach. 

RFMOs  provide  a  forum  for  collaboration,  data  sharing,  regional 
management, and enforcement, and NOAA has a leadership role in 
a number of these RFMOs. One of these RFMOs, the International 
Convention  for  the  Conservation  of  Atlantic  Tunas,  or  ICCAT,  has 
adopted  catch  and  trade  tracking  programs  for  bluefin  tuna  in  re-
sponse to declining stocks and high levels of IUU fishing. 

These  programs  help  us  verify  where  bluefin  tuna  are  caught 
and  allow  us  to  track  product  from  capture  through  its  final  mar-
ket.  This  information  can  lead  to  trade  restrictions  against  coun-
tries,  which  are  a  major  deterrent  to  illegal  trade—illegal  fishing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

The  Northwest  Atlantic  Fisheries  Organization,  or  NAFO,  has 
also taken proactive steps to combat IUU fishing. With U.S. leader-
ship,  this  RFMO  developed  a  compliance  scheme  that  prevents  a 
vessel  from  landing  its  catch  in  the  port  of  any  NAFO  member  if 
the vessel has been cited engaging in IUU fishing. Programs based 
on this scheme have been adopted by other RFMOs. 

NOAA  also  plays  a  leadership  role  in  developing  international 
measures  to  reduce  bycatch  of  sea  birds,  sea  turtles,  and  sharks. 
The U.S. promotes the development of national sea bird bycatch re-
duction  plans  by  RFMO  members  and  stresses  the  need  for  sci-
entific assessments. 

On sea turtles, the U.S. led negotiations resulting in FAO guide-
lines  to  reduce  sea  turtle  mortality  in  fishing  operations.  These 
guidelines have now been adopted by several RFMOs. Additionally, 
the U.S. negotiated the binding Inter-American Convention for the 
Protection and Conservation of Sea Turtles and were hosting inter-
national workshops to train fishermen to use circle hooks as turtle 
bycatch reduction devices. 

On  sharks,  we  have  the  Shark  Finning  Prohibition  Act  enacted 
and  has  drastically  reduced  the  number  of  sharks  finned  with  the 
carcasses  discarded  at  sea.  In  accordance  with  this  mandate,  the 
U.S.  has  promoted  the  adoption  of  shark  finning  bans  in  many 
RFMOs. 

Through  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act,  Congress  recognized  a  sig-
nificant  lack  of  data  for  international  fisheries  management,  par-
ticularly  from  developing  countries.  Good  data  is  the  cornerstone 
for sound fisheries management, and to address this data scarcity, 
NOAA  has  provided  funding  to  improve  data  collection  in  other 
countries. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  also  calls  for  a  biennial  report  to 
Congress  on  IUU  fishing,  and  NOAA  is  currently  soliciting  infor-
mation  from  the  public  that  can  be  used  to  identify  nations  whose 
vessels are engaged in IUU fishing. With regard to enforcement ef-
forts  to  combat  IUU  fishing,  NOAA’s  Office  of  Law  Enforcement 
works  closely  with  the  international,  Federal,  and  State  law  en-
forcement  partners  to  detect,  apprehend,  and  prosecute  those  in-
volved  in  illegal  importation  of  IUU  product.  These  efforts  include 
NOAA’s coordination with Coast Guard patrols in the North Pacific 
Ocean to detect large-scale high seas driftnet fishing. 

NOAA  currently  serves  as  the  chair  of  the  International  Moni-
toring, Control, and Surveillance Network, which works with coun-
tries around the globe to exchange enforcement information, includ-
ing  information  on  IUU  fishing.  The  network  provides  a  mecha-
nism  for  fisheries  law  enforcement  professionals  to  share  experi-
ences as they monitor increasingly complex global fisheries. 

Another important development that will improve NOAA’s ability 
to detect IUU fish imports is the International Trade Data System 
currently  under  development  by  the  Department  of  Homeland  Se-
curity.  This  system  is  a  Government-wide  platform  for  the  elec-
tronic  collection,  use,  and  dissemination  of  trade  data.  NOAA  has 
taken  steps  to  become  a  participating  agency,  and  I  believe  our 
participation will significantly improve our ability to enforce RFMO 
trade measures and documentation requirements. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

In closing, we have a lot to be proud of in the international fish-
eries  management  realm,  but  much  work  remains.  With  the  tools 
that  this  Committee  has  supplied,  NOAA  is  well  positioned  to  im-
prove  our  fisheries  management  efforts  to  benefit  the  world’s  ma-
rine ecosystems. 

Senator  Stevens,  please  give  my  thanks  again  to  Chairman 
Inouye for the invitation, to the Members of the Committee. I look 
forward  to  working  with  you,  with  the  public,  with  the  fishing  in-
dustry, and our international counterparts on this important issue. 
I would be happy to answer questions when the time is right. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Balsiger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES W.  BALSIGER,  PH.D.,  ACTING ASSISTANT 
ADMINISTRATOR, NATIONAL MARINE FISHERIES SERVICE, NOAA, U.S. DEPARTMENT 
OF COMMERCE 

Introduction 

Good  morning,  I  am  Jim  Balsiger,  the  Acting  Assistant  Administrator  for  Fish-
eries  within  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  U.S. 
Department  of  Commerce.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Sen-
ate  Commerce  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  discuss  the  many  challenges  of 
international fisheries management. In my years working on fisheries issues in the 
Alaska  region,  I  have  been  directly  engaged  in  addressing  our  international  goals 
for fishery management and the conservation of protected species. As the U.S. Fed-
eral  Commissioner  for  the  North  Pacific  Anadromous  Fish  Commission  and  other 
international  management  bodies,  I  am  pleased  to  see  the  increased  attention  fo-
cused on this critical aspect of NOAA’s National Marine Fisheries Service’s (NMFS) 
mission. 

Thanks  to  the  efforts  of  this  Committee,  Congress  adopted  and  the  President 
signed  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Reauthoriza-
tion  Act  (Magnuson-Stevens  Act)  into  law  in  January  2007.  This  Act  contains  sev-
eral  new  provisions  that  will  significantly  shape  the  focus  of  fisheries  management 
including  reinforcing  NOAA’s  mandate  for  international  activities.  Congress  has 
tasked  the  Department  of  Commerce,  working  with  our  partners  at  the  State  De-
partment,  Coast  Guard,  and  other  agencies,  to  work  multilaterally  to  address  mul-
tiple  aspects  in  international  stewardship  of  living  marine  resources.  Fulfilling  this 
mandate has been a high priority for the agency. 

My testimony will cover a number of topics, with a particular focus on illegal, un-
reported  and  unregulated  (IUU)  fishing.  IUU  fishing  is  estimated  to  generate  some 
$4–$9  billion  in  landings  gross  revenues  each  year.  This  illegal  fishing  can  under-
mine  our  domestic  fishery  management  practices  and  has  implications  for  sustain-
able  international  fisheries  management  which  benefit  the  world’s  marine  eco-
systems, the U.S. fishing industry, and the American seafood consumer. As a major 
consumer  of  seafood,  the  United  States  has  an  obligation  to  avoid  the  importation 
of illegal seafood product. With a multi-agency approach and with new technologies, 
the United States continues to work with our country partners bilaterally and mul-
tilaterally to address the challenges of IUU fishing. 
Global IUU-related Activities 

In  the  global  context,  the  United  Nations  General  Assembly  has  drawn  attention 
to the negative impacts of IUU fishing and called for its elimination in every annual 
resolution  on  fisheries  since  1998.  This  created  the  impetus  for  the  Food  and  Agri-
culture Organization of the United Nations (FAO) to begin its program on IUU fish-
ing, starting in 2001 with the development of its International Plan of Action to Pre-
vent,  Deter,  and  Eliminate  IUU  Fishing.  This  Plan  called  on  FAO  members  to  de-
velop  corresponding  national  plans  of  action  in  the  following  2  years,  a  task  com-
pleted by the United States in 2004. FAO is the premiere international organization 
addressing global fishing issues. While the State Department typically has the lead 
in these issues, NOAA provides technical expertise for issues addressed by FAO. 

The  FAO  has  continued  its  work  on  IUU  fishing  by  developing  tools  to  eliminate 
this destructive fishing practice. Beginning in 2002, the FAO began to develop a vol-
untary  model  scheme  on  Port  State  measures  to  combat  IUU  fishing.  This  project 
was  completed  and  adopted  in  2004.  At  the  2007  meeting  of  the  FAO  Committee 
on  Fisheries  (COFI),  there  was  agreement  to  organize  and  negotiate  a  binding 
agreement which would set minimum standards for the in-port inspection of fishing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

vessels,  and  the  denial  of  certain  port  services  to  vessels  suspected  or  confirmed  to 
have  engaged  in  IUU  fishing.  This  is  an  exciting  new  development.  Up  to  now,  the 
focus has been on developing rules and applying pressure to flag states to eliminate 
IUU  fishing.  This  initiative  strikes  directly  at  IUU  fishing  vessels  by  making  it 
more  difficult  and  costly  for  them  to  land  their  illicit  catches.  Also  launched  by 
COFI  in  2007  was  the  development  of  a  global  record  of  all  fishing  vessels  which 
includes information on the vessels’ past activities and beneficial owners. The devel-
opment  of  this  database  is  essential  because  currently  there  is  no  comprehensive 
fishing vessel data base. 

The FAO is working with the International Maritime Organization to promote the 
entry  into  force  of  the  Torremolinos  Protocol  of  1993,  an  instrument  that  would  set 
international safety standards for fishing vessels. This protocol would address some 
of  the  crew  safety  concerns  associated  with  IUU  fishing.  NMFS  will  continue  to 
work to combat IUU fishing in the global forums. 
Regional Fishery Management Organization (RFMO) Actions 

Many of our target fish stocks and protected species also occupy waters under the 
jurisdiction of other countries and on the high seas. By their very nature, these re-
sources  require  an  international  approach  to  science  and  management  in  order  to 
be  effective.  In  most  cases,  it  is  necessary  to  collaboratively  manage  these  species. 
This  collaboration  ranges  from  a  simple  bilateral  agreement  (such  as  the  Inter-
national  Pacific  Halibut  Commission)  to  the  most  complex,  multinational  Regional 
Fishery  Management  Organization  (RFMO),  such  as  the  3  tuna  RFMOs  of  which 
the  United  States  is  a  member.  NMFS  is  taking  a  leadership  role  in  a  number  of 
RFMOs,  which  are  key  to  combating  IUU  fishing  in  the  multilateral  context.  Next 
I will highlight the type of measures taken by RFMOs. 
Catch/Trade Documentation Schemes 

Catch  and  trade  documentation  schemes  in  the  Convention  for  the  Conservation 
of  Antarctic  Marine  Living  Resources  (CCAMLR)  and  the  International  Convention 
for  the  Conservation  of  Atlantic  Tunas  (ICCAT)  illustrate  multilateral  efforts  to 
combat IUU fishing. CCAMLR adopted a Catch Documentation Scheme in 1999 de-
signed to prevent illegal harvests of Patagonian and Antarctic toothfish from enter-
ing  markets  in  CCAMLR  member  countries.  The  Scheme  monitors  international 
trade,  identifies  the  origin  of  imports,  determines  if  imports  caught  in  the  Conven-
tion  Area  are  consistent  with  CCAMLR  conservation  measures,  and  provides  catch 
data for stock assessments. NMFS has fully implemented the Catch Documentation 
Scheme  in  the  United  States  and  recently  went  a  step  further  by  implementing  an 
electronic  reporting  system  that  will  greatly  enhance  the  integrity  of  the  Scheme. 
This electronic reporting system serves as a model for other RFMO catch and trade 
tracking programs. 

In  the  early  1990s,  ICCAT  adopted  a  trade  tracking  program  for  both  fresh  and 
frozen bluefin tuna in response to concerns about the status of the resource and sus-
pected high levels of IUU fishing. Subsequently, statistical document programs were 
adopted  for  swordfish  (fresh  and  frozen)  and  bigeye  tuna  (frozen).  The  programs 
track  the  trade  of  product  and  provide  information  on  the  flag  state  and  name  of 
the  harvesting  vessel,  the  location  of  harvest,  the  point  of  export,  a  description  of 
the  fish  in  the  shipment  and  a  variety  of  other  identification  information.  Informa-
tion from these programs assists with catch data verification for both ICCAT mem-
bers  and  non-members  and  is  used  as  important  input  into  ICCAT’s  process  for 
evaluating  fishery  activities  under  its  Trade  Measures  Recommendation,  which  can 
lead to the adoption of restrictive trade measures against countries. 

ICCAT  also  overhauled  its  bluefin  tuna  statistical  document  program  in  2007  to 
create a Bluefin Tuna Catch Documentation Scheme. Like the CCAMLR Catch Doc-
umentation Scheme, this program tracks product from the point of capture through 
its  final  market.  This  Scheme,  which  requires  documentation  when  harvest  occurs 
rather  than  only  at  export,  will  capture  the  large  portion  of  bluefin  tuna  product 
that stays within a country and never enters international trade. The program was 
specifically  developed  to  provide  more  direct  control  of  the  eastern  Atlantic  and 
Mediterranean  bluefin  tuna  fishery  given  pervasive  quota  compliance  and  data  re-
porting  problems.  A  United  States  proposal  to  implement  ICCAT’s  catch  and  trade 
documentation  programs  electronically  was  adopted  by  ICCAT  in  2006,  and  the 
United States is working toward electronic implementation with a view to improving 
the efficiency and effectiveness of these programs. 
Compliance Committees/Sanctions 

ICCAT  was  the  first  RFMO  to  adopt  a  trade-related  instrument  to  promote  com-
pliance  with  conservation  measures.  The  organization’s  Bluefin  Tuna  Action  Plan, 
agreed upon in 1994, established a multilateral process for evaluating fishing activi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

ties  and  recommending  restrictions  on  trade  against  countries  that  diminished  the 
effectiveness of ICCAT’s bluefin tuna measures. The approach taken to help reduce 
IUU fishing and protect overfished bluefin tuna was expanded to address the sword-
fish fishery and, more generally, all unregulated and unreported catches in the mid- 
and late 1990s. 

By  2003,  ICCAT  had  identified  and  adopted  a  comprehensive  trade  measure  in-
strument which applied equally to all ICCAT fisheries and all parties (both member 
and  non-member).  This  made  the  process  for  the  application  of  trade  restrictive 
measures  more  transparent,  employed  comparable  standards  for  evaluating  fishery 
related  activities,  and  allowed  for  swift  re-imposition  of  trade  sanctions.  This  com-
prehensive  approach  has  bolstered  ICCAT’s  already  significant  efforts  to  eliminate 
IUU  fishing  in  the  Atlantic  Ocean.  This  has  led  to  a  number  of  countries  to  take 
action to rectify non-compliant activity. Additionally, this has provided the incentive 
for  countries  to  join  the  Commission  in  order  to  directly  assist  in  conservation  pro-
grams. 

In addition to trade related approaches, ICCAT has adopted a suite of monitoring, 
control,  surveillance  and  quota  compliance  measures.  The  latter  approach  requires 
parties  to  repay  quota  overharvests,  including  a  penalty  for  repeated  incidences. 
With  respect  to  the  swordfish  and  bluefin  tuna  fisheries,  extreme  cases  of  quota 
non-compliance  can  lead  to  trade  penalties.  Full  implementation  of  ICCAT’s  quota 
compliance  regime  by  the  organization  has  been  slow  and  the  United  States  con-
tinues to work toward improving this situation. 

Another  notable  example  of  improved  compliance  is  the  Northwest  Atlantic  Fish-
eries Organization’s (NAFO) adoption in 1997 of its ‘‘Scheme to Promote Compliance 
by  Non  Contracting  Party  Vessels  with  the  Conservation  and  Enforcement  Meas-
ures Established by NAFO.’’ The development of this Scheme was led by the United 
States. In brief, the Scheme presumes that any non-Contracting Party vessel sight-
ed  engaging  in  fishing  activities  in  the  NAFO  Regulatory  Area  is  undermining 
NAFO  conservation  and  enforcement  measures  and,  unless  this  presumption  is  re-
butted,  the  vessel  may  not  land  its  catch  in  the  port  of  any  NAFO  member.  The 
NAFO Scheme marked a significant achievement in RFMO efforts to deal with non- 
Contracting party fishing activities and facilitated the adoption of similar programs 
by  other  regional  fishery  conservation  and  management  organizations  throughout 
the world. 
IUU Vessel Lists 

As a tool to combat IUU fishing activities, an increasing number of RFMOs have 
adopted procedures for listing vessels that have engaged in IUU fishing. These lists 
have been created to attach certain penalties to vessels, including restriction on port 
access,  unloading  prohibitions,  and  product  marketing.  The  United  States  has 
played a leading role in ensuring that such lists are compiled in a transparent man-
ner and provide due process to listed vessels. NMFS is designing a system that will 
implement  U.S.  obligations  to  apply  these  RFMO  decisions  in  our  ports  to  vessels 
that  have  been  included  on  IUU  vessel  lists.  The  United  States  is  also  developing 
a robust outreach program to enhance IUU awareness among the public and private 
sectors.  NMFS  has  posted  links  on  its  webpage  to  RFMO  IUU  vessel  lists  in  order 
to  provide  the  public  with  a  single  source  where  IUU  lists  can  be  found.  NMFS  in-
tends to further enhance our IUU outreach activities to create further economic dis-
incentives for IUU fishing, including limits on access of IUU product into the signifi-
cant United States market. 
Bycatch Reduction 

The United States plays a leadership role in the adoption of RFMO measures de-

signed to reduce bycatch of seabirds, sea turtles, and sharks. 

Seabirds: The United States has taken a leadership role in addressing seabird by-
catch  in  a  number  of  RFMOs  by  promoting  the  development  of  individual  National 
Plans of Action by RFMO members and by stressing the need for RFMOs to scientif-
ically  assess  seabird/fisheries  interactions  and  take  appropriate  steps  to  mitigate 
them. Due in part to United States leadership, seabird bycatch mitigation measures 
have  been  adopted  in  ICCAT,  CCAMLR  and  the  Western  and  Central  Pacific  Fish-
eries  Commission  (WCPFC).  Additional  efforts  are  currently  underway  to  address 
seabird bycatch in the Inter-American Tropical Tuna Commission (IATTC). Many of 
the  measures  adopted  by  these  RFMOs  are  comparable  to  those  already  required 
in U.S. fisheries. Additionally, the United States is promoting international seabird 
conservation by participating in the activities of the Agreement on the Conservation 
of  Albatrosses  and  Petrels  (ACAP).  ACAP  entered  into  force  in  2004,  and  its  objec-
tive  is  to  achieve  and  maintain  a  favorable  conservation  status  for  albatrosses  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

petrels. The Administration is currently reviewing ACAP for possible submission to 
the Senate. 

Sea  turtles:  The  United  States  led  negotiations  resulting  in  the  FAO  Guidelines 
to  Reduce  Sea  Turtle  Mortality  in  Fishing  Operations  in  2005.  The  United  States 
has  subsequently  led  successful  efforts  to  adopt  the  FAO  Guidelines  in  the  IATTC, 
WCPFC, and NAFO. Additionally, the United States took a leadership role in nego-
tiating  the  Inter-American  Convention  for  the  Protection  and  Conservation  of  Sea 
Turtles (the only binding international sea turtle treaty) and participates in Indian 
Ocean-Southeast  Asia  Marine  Turtle  Memorandum  of  Understanding,  and  the 
Memorandum of Understanding Concerning Conservation Measures for Marine Tur-
tles of the Atlantic Coast of Africa. All three measures have provisions requiring or 
urging  participant  countries  to  use  bycatch  reduction  devices  such  as  Turtle  Ex-
cluder Devices and circle hooks. The United States continues to work bilaterally and 
multilaterally  to  urge  countries  to  implement  measures  comparable  to  the  United 
States  to  reduce  sea  turtle  bycatch  and  injury.  The  United  States  has  also  worked 
successfully  with  nations  that  export  shrimp  to  the  United  States  to  help  them  de-
velop  Turtle  Excluder  Device  programs  comparable  to  the  United  States  program. 
Finally, the United States has hosted one international workshop on circle hooks for 
the  longline  fisheries,  and  will  host  another  in  2008.  The  workshops,  when  coupled 
with  a  coordinated  strategy  among  the  U.S.  delegations  to  RFMOs,  have  increased 
U.S.  effectiveness  in  pushing  for  binding  RFMO  measures  to  reduce  sea  turtle  by-
catch and mortality. 

Sharks: The United States has been a leader in calling on the international com-
munity  to  improve  the  conservation  and  management  and  reduce  bycatch  of  shark 
populations. The Shark Finning Prohibition Act was enacted in 2000 with the intent 
of drastically reducing the number of sharks finned and carcasses discarded at sea. 
The Shark Finning Prohibition Act directed the United States to seek agreement on 
international  bans  on  shark  finning  and  other  fishing  practices  adversely  affecting 
these species through the United Nations, FAO and RFMOs. The adoption of shark 
finning bans and 5 percent fin to carcass ratio requirements by many of the world’s 
RFMOs is due in part to U.S. leadership internationally, pursuant to Congressional 
direction  in  the  Shark  Finning  Prohibition  Act.  The  Shark  Finning  Prohibition  Act 
also directs the United States to urge other governments to prepare and submit Na-
tional  Plan  of  Actions  for  sharks  under  the  FAO’s  International  Plan  of  Action  for 
the  Conservation  and  Management  of  Sharks.  The  United  States  worked  to  ensure 
that the December 2007 United Nations General Assembly Fisheries Resolution con-
tains  a  strong  mandate  for  improved  global  efforts  relating  to  shark  conservation 
and management. 
NOAA Activities and Initiatives 
Fisheries Enforcement Activities 

NOAA’s  Office  of  Law  Enforcement  includes  148  sworn  Federal  agents.  The  offi-
cers work closely with international, Federal and state law enforcement partners in 
an  effort  to  detect,  apprehend  and  prosecute  those  involved  in  the  illegal  importa-
tion of IUU products into the United States and its territories and to stop the global 
trade of IUU fisheries products. These efforts include NOAA’s coordination with the 
U.S.  Coast  Guard  sea  and  air  patrols  in  the  North  Pacific  Ocean  to  detect  illegal 
large-scale  high  seas  driftnet  fishing.  The  Office  of  Law  Enforcement  also  works 
closely with Customs and Border Protection to detect illegal fisheries products being 
imported into the United States. 

NOAA’s  Office  of  Law  Enforcement  is  routinely  engaged  in  international  inves-
tigations that involve efforts to terminate unscrupulous business operations that are 
multi-national  in  scope.  Such  efforts  typically  involve  the  application  of  the  Lacey 
Act  and  have  resulted  in  blocking  importation  of  illegally  harvested  and  processed 
marine  products  trafficked  on  a  worldwide  scale.  In  recent  years  the  Office  of  Law 
Enforcement  has  been  able  to  identify  a  number  of  multi-million  dollar  IUU  oper-
ations engaged in the trafficking of IUU fish and fish products through investigative 
operations  that  have  resulted  in  successful  prosecution  and  ultimately  the  termi-
nation  of  these  operations.  Such  cases  have  resulted  in  the  elimination  of  activities 
that  have  caused  or  that  are  causing  harm  to  marine  resources  throughout  the 
world. 

The Office of Law Enforcement has also initiated an effort to enhance our ability 
to  investigate  and  respond  to  IUU  fishing  activity  as  well  as  other  growing  inter-
national  responsibilities.  Creation  of  an  intelligence  analysis  capability  within  the 
Office  of  Law  Enforcement  is  one  critical  need  being  addressed  which  will  require 
further  expansion  in  the  future.  Developing  a  capability  to  access,  evaluate,  and 
analyze fisheries-related intelligence and then to create intelligence-driven products 
to assist in focusing limited enforcement resources is critical to meet our obligations 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

to  respond  to  IUU  fishing  issues  and  to  the  flow  of  IUU  product  around  the  globe 
and into the United States. 
Leadership of the International Monitoring, Control and Surveillance Network 

In  2001,  the  United  States  joined  other  countries  to  establish  the  International 
Monitoring,  Control  and  Surveillance  Network  (Network),  which  works  multilater-
ally  to  exchange  fisheries  and  enforcement  information,  including  information  re-
lated to IUU fishing. The Network was established to provide a mechanism for fish-
eries  law  enforcement  professionals  to  share  information  and  experiences  as  they 
monitor  the  increasingly  complex  harvesting  and  marketing  of  fish  around  the 
world.  The  rise  in  illegal  activities  that  has  accompanied  globalization  underscores 
the need for cooperative law enforcement across national borders. 

In  2006,  the  High  Seas  Task  Force  project  on  global  IUU  fishing  recommended 
enhancement  of  the  Network  as  a  key  initiative  to  combat  IUU  fishing.  NOAA  has 
taken the lead to improve the Network through implementation of an enhancement 
project  and  by  serving  as  Chair  of  the  Network.  Funding  for  the  enhancement  has 
been  provided  by  several  partners,  including  Australia,  Canada,  New  Zealand,  and 
the United Kingdom. 
International Trade Data System Project 

One  important  development  that  will  improve  NOAA’s  ability  to  detect  IUU  fish 
being  imported  into  the  United  States  is  the  International  Trade  Data  System  cur-
rently  under  development  by  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  International 
Trade Data System is an integrated, government-wide system for the electronic col-
lection,  use,  and  dissemination  of  trade  data.  The  Safe  Ports  Act  of  2006  made 
International  Trade  Data  System  mandatory  for  all  Federal  agencies  that  have  a 
role  in  determining  the  admissibility  of  imports  to  the  United  States  market  and 
NMFS has taken steps to become a participating government agency in this system. 
International Trade Data System will significantly improve the capability of NMFS 
to enforce trade measures and documentation requirements of these programs. Cur-
rently, the Office of Law Enforcement is informed of permitting, documentation and 
reporting  violations  long  after  they  occur,  which  makes  investigation  and  forfeiture 
of  product  difficult  or  impossible.  This  system  will  allow  screening  and  targeting  of 
inbound  shipments,  potentially  on  a  pre-arrival  basis.  Such  capability  will  place 
NOAA  staff  in  a  position  to  approve  entries  or  to  place  holds  on  shipments  when 
permits/documentation are missing. Close interagency coordination will ensure effec-
tive and consistent application of import regulations as well as detection of potential 
IUU shipments of fish and fish products. 
Newly Reauthorized Magnuson-Stevens Act 

The  newly  reauthorized  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  contains  several  new  provisions 
that will significantly shape the focus of fisheries management in the coming years. 
Importantly, the Magnuson-Stevens Act pays an unprecedented level of attention to 
international fisheries, and the overarching approach of this legislation is a call for 
the  Secretary  of  Commerce  to  work  multilaterally,  through  RFMOs  and  other  fo-
rums, to combat IUU fishing. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  amends  the  High  Seas  Driftnet  Fishing  Moratorium 
Protection  Act  (Moratorium  Protection  Act)  to  require  the  Secretary  of  Commerce 
to produce a biennial report to Congress that lists countries which the United States 
has identified as having vessels engaged in IUU fishing or bycatch of protected liv-
ing  marine  resources.  Under  the  Act,  the  United  States  is  directed  to  consult  with 
and encourage identified nations to take appropriate corrective action to address the 
IUU fishing and bycatch activity outlined in the biennial report. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  also  requires  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  to  develop 
rulemaking to implement certification procedures for nations that have been identi-
fied  in  the  biennial  report.  If  these  nations  do  not  take  steps  to  address  the  prob-
lems  of  IUU  fishing  or  bycatch,  the  United  States  is  authorized  to  prohibit  the  im-
portation of certain fish and fish products from such nations into the United States 
and take other measures. 

NMFS has been actively working to implement the international provisions of the 
Magnuson-Stevens  Act  to  help  combat  IUU  fishing.  In  January  of  this  year,  NMFS 
produced  a  report  on  the  status  of  progress  toward  implementation  of  the  inter-
national  provisions  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act,  which  highlights  the  work  that 
has been undertaken to date. I will briefly describe for the Committee where we are 
with  respect  to  implementation  and  outreach  on  the  international  provisions  of  the 
Magnuson-Stevens Act. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Magnuson-Stevens Act Implementation and Outreach 

19 

The first step that NMFS took to implement the international requirements in the 
newly  reauthorized  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  was  to  promulgate  a  final  rule  to  define 
IUU fishing. This definition mirrors the definition of IUU fishing that was included 
in the reauthorized Magnuson-Stevens Act. 

In  fulfillment  of  its  obligations  under  Magnuson-Stevens  Act,  the  United  States 
is  seeking  to  strengthen  international  fishery  management  agreements  to  address 
IUU  fishing  through  negotiation  of  their  underlying  agreements  or  negotiation  of 
new  protocols.  With  substantial  United  States  involvement,  international  fishery 
management  organizations  have  taken  action  toward  the  adoption  and  sharing  of 
IUU  vessel  lists,  use  of  observers  and  technologies  to  monitor  compliance,  and  pro-
motion  and  use  of  centralized  vessel  monitoring  systems.  As  previously  noted,  the 
United States has also worked with these organizations to adopt trade tracking and 
documentation  schemes,  prevent  trade  or  import  of  IUU-caught  fish,  and  protect 
vulnerable marine ecosystems. 

Most  RFMOs  operate  on  the  basis  of  catch  data  that  are  far  less  complete  than 
necessary.  Systems  that  would  improve  data  shortcomings  and  serve  as  a  basis  for 
improved  management,  such  as  observer  programs  and  vessel  monitoring  systems, 
are not universal. There are clear cases of RFMO members who are capable of pro-
viding  complete  data  but  fail  to  do  so.  Some  developing  country  RFMO  members 
lack  the  capability  and  resources  to  collect  and  share  this  information,  and  the 
world  has  been  slow  to  realize  that  assistance  to  these  countries  for  the  purpose  of 
improving international fisheries management is in everyone’s interest. 

This  Committee  and  the  Congress  as  a  whole  have  recognized  this  gap  and  pro-
vided authorization through the Magnuson-Stevens Act and initial funding to allow 
us  to  reach  out  and  assist  other  countries  to  improve  their  contributions  to  inter-
national  fisheries  management.  We  are  enthusiastic  about  this  new  authority  and 
the  prospects  that,  with  it,  we  can  help  improve  the  situation  in  ways  that  were 
not  available  to  us  previously.  In  cooperation  with  its  Federal  partners,  NMFS  has 
assisted other nations in addressing IUU fishing and bycatch of protected resources. 
We have hosted and supported workshops on techniques and tools to strengthen en-
forcement;  methods  to  prevent  and  mitigate  the  incidental  take  of  marine  turtles, 
mammals,  seabirds,  and  other  resources;  and  response  to  marine  mammal 
strandings.  NMFS  has  also  provided  technical  and  other  assistance  to  developing 
countries to improve their monitoring, control, and surveillance capabilities and has 
sought to promote the development of effective fisheries observer programs in other 
countries. 

Although  not  funded  with  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  funding,  a  similar  initiative 
called  the  Coral  Triangle  Initiative  is  going  forward  with  support  from  NOAA  and 
the  Department  of  State.  The  Initiative  is  bringing  together  Indonesia,  Malaysia, 
Philippines, Papua New Guinea, Solomon Islands, and Timor-Leste, who are cooper-
ating  in  a  wide  range  of  marine  projects,  including  sustainable  fisheries,  IUU  fish-
ing, fishing overcapacity, and destructive fishing practices. 

In  addition,  NMFS  is  developing  a  proposed  rule  to  establish  procedures  for  the 
identification  and  certification  of  nations  whose  vessels  are  engaged  in  IUU  fishing 
or  bycatch  of  protected  living  marine  resources.  In  preparation  for  development  of 
these  procedures,  NMFS  held  three  public  meetings  to  solicit  comments  from  the 
public on an advance notice of proposed rulemaking. 

Finally,  in  preparation  for  the  first  biennial  report,  which  is  due  to  Congress  in 
January  2009,  NMFS  is  soliciting  information  from  the  public,  including  other  na-
tions,  as  well  as  from  appropriate  Federal  agencies  that  can  be  used  in  the  identi-
fication of nations whose vessels are engaged in IUU fishing or bycatch of protected 
living  marine  resources.  NMFS  has  also  developed  an  internal  process  for  the  com-
pilation,  review,  and  analysis  of  all  appropriate  information  and  NMFS  will  be  col-
laborating  with  our  Federal  partners,  such  as  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  State  De-
partment,  in  the  verification  of  such  information.  The  United  States  plans  to  con-
duct consultations with nations that have been identified as having vessels engaged 
in IUU fishing activity to promote corrective action. NMFS will keep the Committee 
apprised  of  progress  implementing  the  international  portions  of  the  Magnuson-Ste-
vens Act. 
Conclusion 

While  the  United  States  takes  pride  in  what  has  been  accomplished  through 
RFMOs  and  other  fora,  much  work  remains  to  be  done.  NMFS  is  actively  working 
to implement the international provisions of the Magnuson-Stevens Act and is vigor-
ously  engaged  through  various  RFMOs  to  combat  IUU  Fishing.  We  strive  to  work 
in  a  cooperative  and  transparent  manner  toward  achieving  these  goals.  With  the 
tools and support this Committee has supplied to this complex endeavor, NOAA will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

create  the  incentives  for  sustainable  international  fisheries  management  to  benefit 
the world’s marine ecosystems, the U.S. fishing industry, and the American seafood 
consumer. 

As  a  matter  of  outstanding  business,  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Commis-
sion  adopted  a  new  treaty,  known  as  the  Antigua  Convention,  to  provide  it  with  a 
comprehensive  mandate  that  incorporates  modern  standards  for  international  fish-
eries  management.  Let  me  state  our  agreement  with  Ambassador  Balton’s  urging 
quick Congressional action on implementing legislation for the Antigua Convention. 
Chairman  Inouye  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  that  concludes  my  statement. 
The  Department  of  Commerce  and  NOAA  look  forward  to  working  with  you,  the 
public,  the  fishing  industry,  and  our  international  counterparts  on  these  important 
fisheries issues. I will be happy to answer any questions. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Secretary, and we 
will proceed with all of the statements. Then I will have some ques-
tions. 

Mr. Balton, Deputy Assistant Secretary of Oceans and Fisheries, 

I would be happy to have your statement. 
STATEMENT  OF  HON.  DAVID  A.  BALTON,  DEPUTY  ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY  OF  STATE  FOR  OCEANS  AND  FISHERIES,  U.S. 
DEPARTMENT OF STATE 
Mr. BALTON. Thank you, Senator Stevens. It is a pleasure to ap-

pear before you again this morning. 

We  seek  sustainable  fisheries,  but  three  daunting  challenges 
stand  in  the  way—first,  overcapacity  of  fishing  fleets,  which  leads 
to overfishing; second, illegal, unreported, and unregulated fishing; 
and  third,  adverse  environmental  effects  of  certain  fishing  prac-
tices. 

We  cannot  successfully  address  these  challenges  separately,  nor 
can we succeed without the cooperation of other nations and stake-
holders.  Congress  and  the  Administration  also  need  to  continue  to 
work  together.  The  overall  picture  is  worrisome.  FAO  estimates 
that almost three quarters of commercially exploited fish stocks for 
which  good  data  exist  are  either  overexploited,  fully  exploited,  or 
recovering from a depleted state. Problems of overfishing, IUU fish-
ing, and other environmental factors have certainly contributed. 

We have two reasons for hope, however. First, international fish-
eries  issues  now  occupy  a  much  more  prominent  position  on  the 
policy  agenda.  And  second,  as  we  have  already  heard,  we  have  a 
robust  framework  for  international  fisheries  governance  that  rests 
on  the  1982  Convention  on  the  Law  of  the  Sea.  For  the  United 
States  to  maximize  its  influence  over  international  fisheries,  how-
ever, we must join all other major fishing nations as a party to this 
Convention. 

Of  the  three  challenges,  overcapacity  and  overfishing  are  the 
hardest to address. We have achieved only limited success in estab-
lishing  capacity  caps  for  some  fisheries.  To  be  sustainable,  many 
fisheries  need  actual  reductions  in  fishing  capacity  and  effort.  We 
also  need  stronger  disciplines  on  subsidies  to  the  fisheries  sector. 
At  the  WTO,  the  United  States  has  proposed  new  subsidies  rules, 
but negotiations continue. 

The  second  challenge,  IUU  fishing,  continues  to  plague  virtually 
all  fisheries,  but  we  are  making  progress  here.  Through  the  FAO, 
we  have  created  a  toolbox  for  this—flag  State  measures,  coastal 
State  measures,  port  State  measures,  market-related  measures. 
Governments have been using these tools, individually and through 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

the  RFMOs.  We  have  seen  improvements  in  the  monitoring,  con-
trol,  and  surveillance  of  fishing  vessels,  restrictions  on  trans-
shipment  at  sea,  catch  and  trade  documentation  schemes,  lists  of 
authorized vessels and of IUU vessels, import restrictions, and port 
State controls. 

We have seen an increase in cooperation among the RFMOs. We 
are  supporting  the  creation  of  a  global  record  on  fishing  vessels  to 
include  unique  vessel  identifiers  and  comprehensive  ownership  in-
formation. We are leading efforts to negotiate a new agreement on 
port State measures for IUU fishing. I was pleased to chair an ini-
tial meeting to develop a first draft of this treaty. Negotiations will 
begin  in  earnest  in  June,  with  the  goal  of  producing  a  final  treaty 
next year. 

We understand that Congress shares our desire to crack down on 
IUU  fishing,  and  we  look  forward  to  further  collaboration.  We 
know  that  Congress  also  shares  our  concern  over  the  third  chal-
lenge,  the  impact  of  certain  fishing  practices  on  the  marine  envi-
ronment.  I  can  report  reasonable  progress  here  as  well,  but  again, 
more needs to be done. 

We brokered a U.N. resolution that calls for identification of vul-
nerable marine ecosystems, for assessment of whether specific fish-
ing  practices  significantly  harm  them,  and  for  the  development  of 
measures  to  prevent  such  harm.  In  the  absence  of  such  measures, 
governments  have  agreed  to  stop  destructive  fishing  in  the  high 
seas areas in question by the end of this year. 

We  have  secured  interim  rules  for  the  South  Pacific  and  for  the 
Northwest  Pacific  to  give  effect  to  the  U.N.  mandate  as  negotia-
tions on longer-term arrangements proceed. Worldwide, as we have 
heard,  we  are  pressing  to  reduce  bycatch  of  species  of  concern,  in-
cluding  sea  turtles,  seabirds,  and  sharks.  With  respect  to  sharks, 
many RFMOs have followed the lead in banning shark finning, but 
they  have  done  little  else  for  these  species.  And  this  has  led  other 
international  bodies  to  act,  including  the  U.N.  and  the  Convention 
on Migratory Species. 

Despite their shortcomings, the RFMOs remain the only feasible 
means  for  managing  international  fisheries.  But  they  are  only  as 
effective  as  their  member  governments  allow  them  to  be.  One  way 
to  make  RFMOs  more  effective  is  to  review  their  performance 
using  common  criteria,  a  process  that  is  now  underway.  And  one 
RFMO,  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Commission,  has  adopt-
ed  a  new  treaty,  the  Antigua  Convention,  to  strengthen  its  role. 
The Senate provided advice and consent to this treaty, and we now 
urge Congress to pass the necessary implementing legislation. 

Let  me  conclude  with  a  call  for  greater  assistance  to  developing 
countries to help them with fisheries management. To achieve sus-
tainability  in  international  fisheries,  all  nations  must  have  the  ca-
pacity  to  implement  agreed  rules.  Such  assistance,  therefore,  will 
ultimately benefit the United States as well. 

Thank you very much, Senator Stevens. I would be happy to take 

any questions when the time is right. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Balton follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID A. BALTON, DEPUTY ASSISTANT SECRETARY OF 

STATE FOR OCEANS AND FISHERIES, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF STATE 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
I  am  pleased  to  have  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  to  outline  both  the 
challenges we face in working toward sustainable international fisheries, as well as 
the recent progress we have made. 
Introduction and Overview 

Managing  the  world’s  fisheries  on  a  sustainable  basis  is  a  goal  we  all  share,  but 
it  is  also  one  that  still  proves  elusive.  Three  challenges  in  particular  stand  in  the 
way of achieving this goal: 

1. Overcapacity of fishing fleets, which leads to overfishing; 
2. Illegal, unreported and unregulated (IUU) fishing; and 
3. Adverse environmental effects of certain fishing practices. 

We cannot successfully address these challenges by dealing with them in isolation 
from  each  other.  Nor  can  we  successfully  address  them  without  the  cooperation  of 
other nations, international organizations and key stakeholders. Flag States, coastal 
States,  market  States  and  port  States  each  play  a  vital  role  in  managing  the  con-
duct of fisheries and the progress of fisheries products through the marketplace. To 
achieve sustainable fisheries, we need to work with the governments of these States 
bilaterally  and  through  Regional  Fisheries  Management  Organizations  (RFMOs) 
and other international organizations such as the United Nations and the U.N. Food 
and  Agriculture  Organization  (FAO).  At  the  international  level  and  here  at  home, 
we also need to continue to engage industry groups, conservation organizations, sci-
entists, consumers and the media on these issues. Last, but certainly not least, Con-
gress and the Administration also need to continue to work together. 

The overall picture is worrisome. The FAO, in its most recent survey of the state 
of  the  world’s  fisheries,  estimates  that  almost  three  quarters  of  commercially  ex-
ploited  fish  stocks  for  which  adequate  data  exist  are  either  fully  exploited,  over-
exploited, or rebuilding from a depleted state. This situation has not changed appre-
ciably  over  the  past  two  decades.  But  even  as  global  capture  fisheries  production 
has  leveled  off,  the  demand  for  seafood  has  continued  to  increase.  Much  of  this  in-
creased demand is driven by developing countries whose citizens depend on fish and 
seafood as a critical source of low-cost protein. 

Two  things  have  changed  over  the  past  two  decades  or  so,  however,  which  give 
us  a  basis  for  hope.  First,  international  fisheries  issues,  and  the  challenges  noted 
above,  have  taken  a  much  more  prominent  position  on  the  policy  agenda.  Thanks 
in  part  to  more  extensive  media  coverage  of  these  issues,  we  see  much  greater 
awareness  of  the  problems  at  hand  and  more  insistent  calls  for  solutions  to  those 
problems. At both the international and domestic levels, we also see fisheries issues 
merging more and more with broader environmental issues. 

Second,  we  have  created  an  international  governance  structure  for  fisheries  that 
is  strong  and  growing  stronger.  The  international  community  has  forged  a  robust 
international  law  framework  at  both  the  global  and  regional  levels  and  has  devel-
oped a broad range of new tools for managing shared fisheries. The entirety of this 
framework  rests  on  the  1982  Convention  on  the  Law  of  the  Sea,  which  established 
the overall structure for international fisheries management. I must note, however, 
that  the  status  of  the  United  States  as  a  non-party  to  this  vital  treaty  undermines 
our  credibility  with  other  major  fishing  nations,  virtually  all  of  which  are  parties 
to  the  Convention.  As  discussed  by  Deputy  Secretary  Negroponte’s  testimony,  the 
Administration  once  again  urges  the  Senate  to  provide  its  advice  and  consent  to 
U.S. accession to this treaty. 

Building on the Law of the Sea framework, we have a series of other treaties for 
the  management  of  international  fisheries  to  which  the  United  States  is  party,  in-
cluding the 1993 FAO Compliance Agreement and the 1995 U.N. Fish Stocks Agree-
ment. The United States is also a key member of more than 10 RFMOs and is lead-
ing  international  efforts  to  strengthen  these  organizations  and  to  create  new  ones. 
Complementing  these  binding  mechanisms  are  a  number  of  voluntary  instruments, 
including a the FAO Code of Conduct for Responsible Fisheries, international plans 
of  action  that  address  bycatch  of  sharks  and  seabirds,  capacity  management,  and 
IUU  fishing,  and  a  number  of  other  technical  guidelines  and  model  instruments  to 
guide  further  cooperation,  including  one  for  improved  data  collection  and  sharing. 
Overcapacity and Overfishing 

Overcapacity  and  overfishing  are  proving  the  hardest  problems  to  solve.  Over-
capacity in particular contributes to poor stock productivity, unsatisfactory economic 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

performance, increased impacts on bycatch species and excessively contentious man-
agement  debates.  We  are  working  with  some  success  to  establish  capacity  caps  for 
some  key  fisheries.  But  it  is  clear  that  sustainable  fisheries  require  in  many  in-
stances a reduction in capacity and effort. There are simply too many fishing vessels 
operating  with  too  much  ability  to  catch  fish.  Through  the  RFMOs,  we  must  keep 
pressing  for  effective  capacity  management—including  monitoring  and  controlling 
both the level and use of fishing capacity—as part of their overall conservation and 
management regimes. 

A  key  challenge  is  that  many  developing  States  are  looking  to  increase  their  ca-
pacity  to  harvest  fish  within  areas  under  their  jurisdiction,  as  well  as  on  the  high 
seas.  They  argue,  with  some  merit,  that  the  developed  States  bear  the  lion’s  share 
of  responsibility  for  the  overcapacity  problem.  But  we  cannot  accommodate  the  de-
sires  of  developing  States  to  increase  their  capacity  to  participate  in  fisheries  that 
are  already  fully  subscribed  (or  oversubscribed)  unless  the  developed  States  with 
large fleets are willing to reduce their capacity concomitantly. 

Reforms  to  World  Trade  Organization  (WTO)  disciplines  on  fisheries  subsidies 
currently  under  negotiation  as  part  of  the  Doha  Round  are  a  vital  component  of 
rationalizing  fishing  capacity.  The  goal  is  to  eliminate  subsidies  that  lead  to  over-
fishing  and  overcapacity,  but  allow  the  continuation  of  some  subsidies  that  support 
sustainable  fisheries  management  (such  as  properly  designed  buy-out  programs). 
The United States presented a proposal for new subsidies rules in March 2007 that 
was very well-received. While the negotiations are far from complete, we are making 
substantial process. The United States is also working through other organizations, 
such as Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, to find new ways 
to  tackle  these  problems,  particularly  by  identifying  the  economic  drivers  that  lead 
to overfishing and IUU fishing. 
IUU Fishing 

IUU fishing continues to plague virtually all fisheries, in areas under national ju-
risdiction  and  on  the  high  seas.  The  international  community  has  recognized  this, 
and  has  created  a  set  of  new  tools  to  deal  with  this  phenomenon,  some  of  which 
seem to be helping. But more needs to be done. 

The  2001  FAO  International  Plan  of  Action  (IPOA)  to  Prevent,  Deter,  and  Elimi-
nate IUU Fishing lays out a suite of measures that individual States—whether act-
ing  as  flag  States,  coastal  States,  port  States  or  market  States—and  RFMOs  can 
implement to reduce the incidence of IUU fishing. 

In 2004, the United States became one of the first States to adopt a national plan 
of  action  to  give  operational  effect  to  this  IPOA.  An  increasing  number  of  States 
have  by  now  adopted  their  own  National  Plans  of  Action  on  IUU  fishing.  RFMOs 
have  also  adopted  measures  to  address  IUU  fishing,  including  requirements  to  im-
prove  monitoring,  control  and  surveillance  (MCS)  of  vessels,  restrictions  on  trans-
shipment  of  fish  at  sea,  catch  and  trade  documentation  schemes,  lists  of  both  au-
thorized  vessels  and  vessels  identified  as  having  engaged  in  IUU  fishing,  market- 
related measures and port State controls, to name some. We have also seen increas-
ing  cooperation  between  and  among  RFMOs,  particularly  those  in  adjacent  areas 
(such  as  the  Northwest  Atlantic  Fisheries  Organization  and  the  Northeast  Atlantic 
Fisheries  Commission)  and  those  that  deal  with  fisheries  for  similar  species  (such 
as the five RFMOs that manage tuna fisheries around the world). 

For  example,  the  five  tuna  RFMOs  met  jointly  for  the  first  time  in  Kobe,  Japan 
in January 2007. The meeting agreed to four immediate areas of coordinated work: 
harmonizing  and  improving  trade  tracking  programs,  creating  a  global  IUU  vessel 
list,  harmonizing  transshipment  control  measures,  and  standardizing  the  presen-
tation  of  stock  assessment  results.  Work  on  the  first  is  well  underway,  the  United 
States has also supported efforts among RFMOs to work toward a global IUU vessel 
list  by  contributing  to  a  process  that  provides  for  inclusion  of  vessels  identified  by 
one RFMO on the lists of others, while taking into account any due process concerns 
that may arise. 

We  are  also  pursuing  stronger  port  controls.  Because  fish  must  be  landed  before 
they can get to the market, controlling the landing point often presents the best and 
most  effective  chance  to  combat  IUU  fishing.  Stronger  agreed  standards  for  port 
States  to  regulate  the  landing  and  transshipment  of  fish  in  port  can  complement 
the  market-related  measures  already  in  place  through  several  RFMOs.  The  United 
States  strongly  supported  the  development  through  the  FAO  of  a  voluntary  model 
scheme to facilitate coordination and cooperation among port States to address IUU 
fishing. Last year, the FAO Committee on Fisheries agreed to create a new, binding 
agreement based on the Model Scheme. I was pleased to chair the initial expert con-
sultation  that  developed  a  first  draft  of  this  agreement.  This  draft  will  form  the 
basis of negotiations that will begin in earnest this coming June. Our goal is to com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

plete  the  negotiations  in  time  for  the  next  meeting  of  the  Committee  on  Fisheries 
to adopt an agreement in March 2009. 

The  United  States  continues  to  advocate  for  other  measures  to  combat  IUU  fish-
ing. Through FAO, we are pressing for the development of a global record of fishing 
vessels—including  transport  and  support  vessels—that  would  include  unique  vessel 
identifiers  and  comprehensive  ownership  information.  At  the  RFMO  level,  we  are 
seeking stronger MCS measures, including broader access to data from vessel moni-
toring  systems, 
increased  vessel  observer  programs,  stronger  documentation 
schemes, etc. 

Cooperative  mechanisms  such  as  the  International  MCS  Network,  which  facili-
tates cooperation and information-sharing between monitoring, control, and surveil-
lance  officials  in  different  countries,  are  increasingly  important.  Recognizing  the 
connections  among  vessels  involved  in  or  supporting  IUU  fishing,  we  have  also 
strongly  supported  the  FAO  and  the  International  Maritime  Organization’s  joint 
working  group  on  IUU  fishing,  and  in  particular  efforts  to  create  a  global  record  of 
all fishing vessels. 

The  Administration  understands  very  well  that  Congress  shares  our  desire  to 
crack  down  on  IUU  fishing.  The  2006  Magnuson-Stevens  Reauthorization  Act  has 
provided  new  tools  in  this  regard.  We  also  see  other  major  markets  moving  toward 
stricter  controls.  The  European  Union,  for  example,  is  considering  a  sweeping  set 
of  new  policies  intended  to  prevent  access  of  IUU-caught  fish  to  its  market  and  to 
strengthen  internal  information  collection  and  enforcement  within  its  member 
States. 
Environmental Impacts 

The  United  States  and  our  international  partners  have  become  increasingly  con-
cerned  by  the  impacts  of  certain  fishing  activities  on  the  marine  environment,  in-
cluding  excessive  bycatch  and  harm  to  vulnerable  marine  ecosystems.  In  2006,  the 
President  charged  the  Secretaries  of  State  and  Commerce  to  work  multilaterally  to 
end unregulated destructive fishing practices on the high seas and to work to create 
effective,  science-based  conservation  and  management  regimes  for  high  seas  fish-
eries  more  generally.  The  United  States  subsequently  chaired  negotiations  on  the 
2006  U.N.  General  Assembly  fisheries  resolution  (UNGA  Resolution  61/105)  that 
calls for specific actions by States, RFMOs, and the FAO to identify vulnerable ma-
rine  ecosystems,  assess  whether  certain  fishing  practices  may  significantly  harm 
them,  and  to  develop  effective  conservation  and  management  measures  for  these 
fisheries to prevent such harm, or halt fishing in these areas. 

The  United  States  has  been  in  the  forefront  of  efforts  to  apply  the  provisions  of 
UNGA  Resolution  61/105  within  existing  RFMOs,  and  to  develop  interim  manage-
ment  regimes  for  the  Northwest  Pacific  and  the  South  Pacific,  where  longer-term 
arrangements  are  still  under  negotiation.  In  addition,  the  United  States  is  taking 
a leadership role at the FAO in the negotiations on technical guidelines for the man-
agement  of  deep  sea  fisheries.  In  these  negotiations,  the  United  States  recently  se-
cured clear criteria and standards for identifying vulnerable marine ecosystems and 
assessing  and  determining  significant  adverse  impacts  to  such  ecosystems.  We  are 
now working within those RFMOs that have not yet adopted measures to implement 
Resolution 61/105 to ensure these criteria and standards are put into operation. 

In  addition,  ensuring  effective  conservation  and  management  of  sharks  is  a  high 
priority  for  the  United  States.  Sharks  are  particularly  susceptible  to  overexploi-
tation  because  they  are  typically  long-lived,  slow-growing,  and  produce  few  young. 
Many shark species are apex predators and are vital to the health of the ecosystems 
they  inhabit,  so  their  conservation  is  an  integral  part  of  ecosystem-based  fisheries 
management.  Sharks  are  currently  taken  in  fisheries  directed  for  sharks,  and  are 
also caught incidentally in fisheries targeting other species. Sharks are also subject 
to  the  practice  of  ‘‘finning,’’  which  is  the  removal  and  retention  of  shark  fins  and 
the  discard  of  shark  carcasses  at  sea.  The  United  States  has  led  efforts  within 
RFMOs  to  adopt  consistent  shark  finning  bans  and  to  reduce  shark  bycatch,  but 
States and RFMOs now need to take stronger action to manage directed shark fish-
eries. 

Once  again,  the  United  States  led  efforts  at  the  U.N.  General  Assembly  to  adopt 
language  in  the  2007  fisheries  Resolution  that  calls  on  States  and  RFMOs  to  take 
immediate  and  concerted  actions  to  improve  shark  conservation  and  management 
and  to  better  enforce  existing  rules  on  shark  fishing.  The  Resolution  calls  for  im-
proved compliance with current bans on shark finning, which could include require-
ments that sharks be landed with fins attached. Perhaps more importantly, the Res-
olution  calls  for  improved  management  of  directed  fisheries  through  establishing 
limits  on  shark  catches,  improving  assessment  of  the  health  of  shark  stocks,  and 
limiting shark fisheries until management measures are adopted. We are now work-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

ing  within  RFMOs  to  implement  these  provisions.  The  United  States  also  partici-
pated  in  a  first-ever  meeting  under  the  auspices  of  the  Convention  on  Migratory 
Species  (CMS)  in  December  2007  to  identify  and  elaborate  an  option  for  inter-
national cooperation on migratory sharks under CMS. 

The  United  States  is  continuing  to  press  for  stronger  actions  to  mitigate  the  by-
catch of other vulnerable marine species as well. We continue to enforce the prohibi-
tion on the importation of shrimp harvested in ways that harm endangered sea tur-
tles  and  the  importation  of  certain  tuna  that  is  caught  in  a  manner  that  is  incon-
sistent  with  agreed  standards  relating  to  dolphin  safety.  Through  NOAA,  we  are 
working  to  reduce  the  bycatch  of  sea  turtles  in  longline  fisheries.  We  are  also  re-
viewing  the  Agreement  on  the  Conservation  of  Albatrosses  and  Petrels  for  possible 
submission to the Senate. 
Strengthening RFMOs 

Though RFMOs are imperfect, they are currently the most practical way to man-
age  shared  international  fisheries.  As  active  participants  in  many  RFMOs,  we  are 
committed  to  multilateral  efforts  to  strengthen  fisheries  governance  in  order  to  en-
sure the sustainability of target stocks while also conserving associated and depend-
ent species and the habitats on which they depend. 

In  many  ways,  we  are  at  a  crossroads.  Many  national  and  multilateral  fora  re-
sponsible for fishery management are under heavy criticism for failing to take deci-
sions  that  the  science  tells  us  is  necessary  to  ensure  sustainability  of  fishery  re-
sources,  or  to  take  steps  (many  of  which  are  widely  acknowledged  to  be  effective) 
to  mitigate  the  impacts  of  fishing  activities  on  non-target  species  and  habitats.  If 
RFMOs fail to fulfill their obligations, we can expect calls to continue for other orga-
nizations to step in and fill that void. 

A  key  outcome  of  the  joint  tuna  RFMO  meeting  in  Kobe  was  a  commitment 
among  these  organizations  to  undertake  performance  reviews  to  assess  how  each 
was meeting its mandate and to identify how each could strengthen its functioning. 
The  first  three  of  these  reviews  are  under  way,  using  a  common  approach  and  cri-
teria  developed  through  U.S.  leadership.  Other  RFMOs  have  recently  strengthened 
their mandates and charters to reflect the changes in international fisheries govern-
ance  and  better  allow  them  to  manage  the  full  ecosystems  under  their  purview. 
With  new  regimes  coming  on  line  to  fill  the  gaps  in  international  management,  it 
is  vital  the  United  States  gives  these  organizations  its  full  support  and  participa-
tion. 

In this regard, I should mention that the Inter-American Tropical Tuna Commis-
sion  adopted  a  new  treaty,  known  as  the  Antigua  Convention,  to  provide  it  with  a 
comprehensive  mandate  that  incorporates  modern  standards  for  international  fish-
eries management. In 2005, the Senate provided its advice and consent to U.S. rati-
fication of the Antigua Convention. However, because Congress has yet to pass leg-
islation to implement the Convention, we have not deposited our instrument of rati-
fication.  We  therefore  urge  Congress,  and  this  Committee  in  particular,  to  take  up 
this legislation at the earliest opportunity. 
Capacity Building 

While  the  United  States  has  been  a  leader  in  managing  its  own  fisheries  and  in 
pressing  for  stronger  international  fisheries  governance,  success  depends  upon  our 
building  strong  international  partnerships.  Effective  international  governance  can 
only  work  if  all  parties  have  the  will  and  the  capacity  to  implement  agreed  rules. 
In  some  parts  of  the  world,  the  problems  facing  fisheries—especially  IUU  fishing— 
are  inextricably  linked  to  other  concerns  such  as  transboundary  crime,  smuggling, 
human trafficking, human rights, and environmental degradation. Developing coun-
tries  need  help  to  build  their  capacities  to  effectively  address  these  myriad  and 
interlinked  issues.  The  United  States  has  strongly  supported  mechanisms  like  the 
U.N. Fish Stocks Agreement Part VII Fund, which provides assistance to developing 
States  for  implementing  the  Agreement,  and  other  similar  funds  within  RFMOs. 
Building  capacity  for  sustainable  fisheries  management  is  important  in  the  big  pic-
ture,  but  it  sometimes  also  has  a  very  direct  affect  on  U.S.  fisheries.  Small  tunas 
born in the Gulf of Guinea, which are subject to tremendous fishing pressure there, 
form the backbone of U.S. fisheries for yellowfin and bigeye tuna off the East Coast 
and in the Gulf of Mexico. 

Working  with  developing  States  to  assist  their  efforts  to  build  strong  fisheries 
management and enforcement capabilities benefits all of us. Moreover, assistance to 
build  capacity  for  ecosystem-based  management  in  developing  countries  can  also 
benefit valuable fish stocks and fisheries. The Coral Triangle region of the Indo-Pa-
cific is another important tuna spawning and nursery ground that is under intense 
fishing pressure. Juvenile fish from this region eventually replenish adult yellowfin 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

and  bigeye  stocks  of  the  Pacific  that  are  fished  by  vessels  from  many  countries,  in-
cluding  the  United  States.  Recently,  the  United  States  committed  $4.35  million  to 
the  development  of  the  Coral  Triangle  Initiative,  a  new  cooperative  framework  to 
protect the world’s richest area of marine biodiversity from overexploitation. By pro-
moting  regional  cooperation  (among  the  countries  of  Indonesia,  Malaysia,  Phil-
ippines,  Papua  New  Guinea,  Solomon  Islands,  and  Timor  Lest),  the  Initiative  will 
develop  mutual  conservation  and  management  solutions  that  ensure  the  sustain-
ability of these commercially important tunas in their early life before they disperse 
across  the  Western  Pacific,  where  they  support  large  and  important  regional  fish-
eries. 

Thank you very much. I would be happy to take any questions. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Mr. Balton. 
Rear  Admiral  Brooks,  I  would  be  happy  to  have  your  statement, 

sir. 

STATEMENT OF REAR ADMIRAL ARTHUR E. BROOKS, 

COMMANDER, COAST GUARD DISTRICT 17, U.S. COAST GUARD, 

DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Admiral  BROOKS.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman.  It  is  a  pleasure 
to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  Coast  Guard’s  role  in 
international  fisheries  management  and  deterring  illegal,  unre-
ported, and unregulated or IUU fishing. It is also a pleasure to rep-
resent the Alaskan law enforcement community today. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  been  the  leading  Federal  law  enforcement 
presence  on  the  high  seas  since  the  days  of  the  Revenue  Cutter 
Service in the 18th century. Our role in defending living marine re-
sources  dates  back  to  the  great  Alaskan  fur  seal  and  sea  otter 
hunts  of  the  19th  century.  In  the  21st  century,  Coast  Guard  law 
enforcement  is  primarily  focused  on  protecting  the  3.4  million 
square  miles  of  the  U.S.  exclusive  economic  zone  and  key  areas  of 
the high seas. 

The  Coast  Guard  aims  to  provide  effective  and  professional  at- 
sea  enforcement  to  advance  national  goals  for  living  marine  re-
source conservation and management. IUU fishing describes activi-
ties that are a direct affront to such conservation and management 
measures. 

The U.S. Coast Guard strategy for maritime safety, security, and 
stewardship is driven by national policy, such as Presidential Deci-
sion  Directive  36,  Protecting  the  Ocean  Environment,  and  legisla-
tion  such  as  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fisheries  Conservation  and 
Management  Act.  Coast  Guard  efforts  to  deter  IUU  fishing  span 
across  domestic  and  international  fisheries,  and  they  bridge  our 
maritime security and maritime stewardship goals. 

IUU  activity  is  global.  It  is  conducted  by  fishing  vessels  of  all 
sizes  and  descriptions.  As  discussed,  the  U.N.  Food  and  Agricul-
tural  Organization  estimates  that  as  much  as  75  percent  of  the 
world’s  fish  stocks  are  fully  exploited,  overexploited,  or  depleted. 
There  are  tremendous  economic  incentives  at  play  in  IUU  fishing 
for both the coastal States and the IUU fishers. 

The  FAO  estimates  annual  global  revenues  lost  to  IUU  fishing 
to be as much as $9 billion per year. This activity damages marine 
ecosystems, distorts competition, and jeopardizes the economic sur-
vival  of  coastal  communities  that  rely  on  fishing  for  their  liveli-
hoods. Many coastal States lack the enforcement capability to effec-
tively  manage  and  protect  their  living  marine  resources  and  are 
left exposed to poaching and overfishing. Recent press reports from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

West  Africa,  for  example,  link  depleted  fish  stocks  to  regional  in-
stabilities  and  dangerous  illegal  large-scale  immigration  from  dev-
astated fishing communities. 

NOAA and the State Department are our key partners in imple-
menting  the  U.S.  national  plan  of  action  to  combat  IUU  fishing. 
The  Coast  Guard  applauds  NOAA  and  the  State  Department’s  ef-
forts to establish port State control measures, catch documentation 
schemes, and international trade data systems to deter IUU impor-
tation.  These  tools  will  help  restrict  market  access  for  IUU  prod-
ucts.  Nevertheless,  at-sea  enforcement,  which  applies  significant 
legal  and  economic  consequences  to  those  who  engage  in  illegal 
fishing  activity,  remains  a  critical  element  in  combating  the  IUU 
threat. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  the  only  Federal  agency  with  the  capability 
and  legal  authority  to  project  a  law  enforcement  presence  on  the 
high  seas  and  throughout  the  U.S.  exclusive  economic  zone.  The 
Coast Guard plan for fisheries law enforcement is known as Ocean 
Guardian and is based on principles of sound regulations, meaning 
enforceable legal regimes or systems of rules that define acceptable 
activities,  productive  partnerships,  cooperative  resource  manage-
ment  law  enforcement  and  case  prosecution  efforts,  use  of  tech-
nology  to  enhance  enforcement  efforts  through  maritime  domain 
awareness,  and  effective  presence,  meaning  professional  law  en-
forcement personnel onboard, capable surface and air assets. 

The  concepts  of  sound  regulations  and  productive  partnerships 
are inextricably linked. The Coast Guard serves as an enforcement 
advisor  to  a  number  of  U.S.  delegations  to  regional  fisheries  man-
agement  organizations,  or  the  RFMOs,  that  establish  the  founda-
tions of legal regimes for maritime governance to combat IUU fish-
ing.  One  such  RFMO  is  the  North  Pacific  Anadromous  Fish  Com-
mission.  My  staff  in  the  17th  Coast  Guard  District  serves  as  the 
head  of  the  U.S.  delegation  to  the  enforcement  committee  for  that 
commission. 

The Coast Guard is also highly engaged in maintaining a produc-
tive bilateral agreement with the People’s Republic of China to en-
force the U.N. moratorium on large-scale high seas driftnet fishing. 
The Chinese fisheries enforcement officers have served as ship rid-
ers on U.S. Coast Guard cutters under this agreement, staged and 
operated out of the Coast Guard’s North Pacific Regional Fisheries 
Training Center in Kodiak, Alaska. 

These forums further overlap with the international coordination 
efforts  of  the  North  Pacific  Coast  Guard  Forum  Fisheries  Working 
Group, which met last week in Seattle. This year, Pacific Rim part-
ners  will  conduct  harmonized  surface  and  air  patrols  in  the  North 
Pacific high threat area for IUU driftnet fishing. In addition to the 
United States, Canada, Japan, Korea, the Russian Federation, and 
the  People’s  Republic  of  China  will  all  contribute  operational  re-
sources to this effort. Similar efforts paid great dividends last year 
when the U.S. Coast Guard cutter BOUTWELL intercepted and fa-
cilitated  the  seizure  of  six  Chinese-flagged  high  seas  driftnet  ves-
sels. 

The Coast Guard’s operational efforts are guided by an organiza-
tional  sense  of  maritime  domain  awareness  or  knowledge  of  what 
is  happening  at  sea.  We  enhance  this  awareness  with  satellite- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

based ship tracking systems, such as the vessel monitoring system, 
which  allows  us  to  see  the  movement  of  many  U.S.  and  foreign- 
flagged vessels in the noncontiguous EEZ, especially in the western 
and central Pacific. 

VMS  is  also  an  extremely  valuable  tool  in  many  domestic  fish-
eries within the U.S. exclusive economic zone. However, awareness 
alone is of little use without a robust at-sea presence to detect and 
intercept  potential  perpetrators.  The  first  component  of  effective 
Coast  Guard  presence  is  a  professional  corps  of  knowledgeable 
boarding  officers.  The  five  U.S.  Coast  Guard  regional  fisheries 
training  centers,  including  the  North  Pacific  Regional  Training 
Center  in  Kodiak  and  the  Maritime  Law  Enforcement  Academy, 
continue  to  be  vital  to  training  our  maritime  law  enforcement  per-
sonnel. 

Our  cutters,  boats,  aircraft,  and  the  facilities  and  personnel  to 
support  them  must  be  up  to  the  task  of  sustaining  our  efforts  on 
scene over vast distances for days, weeks, or months on end. In the 
14th Coast Guard District, for example, in Honolulu, Hawaii, a pa-
trol  cutter  must  transit  for  over  a  week  from  the  nearest  Coast 
Guard base to reach many of the eight noncontiguous exclusive eco-
nomic zones most susceptible to illegal foreign fishing. 

Similar  distances  figure  into  the  17th  District  operations,  where 
the  U.S.-Russian  maritime  boundary  line  is  at  least  3  days  transit 
from  the  nearest  viable  logistics  stop  or  port,  and  emerging  oper-
ational areas in the Arctic are even more remote. 

The  centerpiece  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  future  capabilities  to  meet 
projected  increases  in  the  IUU  threat  and  to  secure  our  maritime 
borders is the Integrated Deepwater System. Deepwater will main-
tain our ability to enforce international and domestic living marine 
resource  regulations  in  the  distant  reaches  of  the  U.S.  exclusive 
economic zone and the high seas. 

The  Coast  Guard  addresses  the  IUU  threat  to  living  marine  re-
sources through our framework of concerted international efforts to 
develop legal regimes, foster partnerships inside and outside of our 
own  Government,  expanding  maritime  domain  awareness,  and 
maintaining effective at-sea enforcement. We will continue to work 
closely  with  NOAA,  the  State  Department,  and  our  international 
partners  to  achieve  national  and  international  objectives  for  fish-
eries conservation and management. 

One  thing  is  clear.  More  people  throughout  the  world  are  going 
to  greater  lengths  to  harvest  limited  living  marine  resources.  This 
impacts  economies  and  the  stability  and  well-being  of  entire  soci-
eties  across  the  globe.  In  the  face  of  increasing  resource  scarcity, 
IUU  fishing  is  a  threat  that  the  Coast  Guard  stands  ready  to  con-
front. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today.  I 

would be happy to answer any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Admiral Brooks follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REAR ADMIRAL ARTHUR E. BROOKS, COMMANDER, COAST 

GUARD DISTRICT 17, U.S. COAST GUARD, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Good  morning  Chairman  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  It  is 
a  pleasure  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  Coast  Guard’s  role  in  inter-
national  fisheries  management  and  deterring  Illegal,  Unregulated,  and  Unre-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

ported—or  IUU—fishing  both  within  areas  of  national  jurisdiction  and  on  the  high 
seas. 

Protecting living marine resources—through active patrolling to detect, deter, and 
interdict  vessels  engaged  in  illegal  fishing  activity—is  a  longstanding  Coast  Guard 
mission. Beginning with 19th Century protection of the Bering Sea fur seal and sea 
otter  herds,  and  continuing  through  the  post-WWII  expansion  in  the  size  and  effi-
ciency  of  global  fishing  fleets,  the  Coast  Guard  has  embraced  its  role  as  the  lead 
Federal  maritime  law  enforcement  presence  at  sea.  Coast  Guard  enforcement  pres-
ence  has  a  particular  focus  within  the  3.4  million  square  mile  U.S.  Exclusive  Eco-
nomic Zone (EEZ), the largest in the world, as well as in key areas of the high seas. 
The term ‘‘IUU fishing’’ is commonly understood to refer to fishing activities that 
are  inconsistent  with,  or  in  contravention  of,  fishery  management  and  conservation 
measures.  The  Coast  Guard  aims  to  provide  effective  and  professional  at-sea  en-
forcement to advance national goals for the conservation and management of living 
marine resources and their environments. The U.S. Coast Guard Strategy for Mari-
time  Safety,  Security,  and  Stewardship  is  driven  by  national  policy  such  as  Presi-
dential  Decision  Directive  36—Protecting  the  Ocean  Environment,  and  legislation 
such  as  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act.  Coast 
Guard efforts to deter IUU fishing span across domestic and international fisheries, 
and they bridge our maritime security and maritime stewardship goals. 

IUU activity is global in reach. It affects both domestic waters and the high seas, 
and is conducted by all types of fishing vessels. Controlling IUU fishing is a require-
ment  to  optimally  manage  and  protect  vital  living  marine  resources  that  are  under 
pressure  from  increasingly  sophisticated  and  capable  fishing  fleets  that  travel  the 
world’s  oceans  in  search  of  new  fish  stocks.  According  to  the  United  Nations  (U.N.) 
Food  and  Agriculture  Organization  (FAO),  seventy-five  percent  of  the  world’s  fish 
stocks  are  fully  exploited,  over-exploited,  or  depleted.  FAO  studies  indicate  that  in 
some  fisheries,  IUU  fishing  is  estimated  to  account  for  30  percent  of  total  catches. 
In  many  other  fisheries,  IUU  catches  may  even  exceed  legal  and  reported  har-
vesting. IUU activity has adverse effects on marine ecosystems, distorts competition, 
and  jeopardizes  the  economic  survival  of  coastal  communities  that  are  reliant  on 
local fisheries for their livelihood. 

Many  coastal  states  do  not  have  the  maritime  governmental  regimes  or  enforce-
ment  capability  necessary  to  effectively  manage  and  protect  their  living  marine  re-
sources  and  are  left  exposed  to  poaching  and  over-fishing.  Recent  press  reporting 
from West Africa, for example, suggests a link between depleted fish stocks and re-
gional instabilities and dangerous and illegal large-scale migration from devastated 
fishing communities. There are tremendous economic incentives at play in IUU fish-
ing, for both the coastal states and the IUU fishers. Revenues generated by coastal 
states  through  responsible  and  sustainable  management  lead  to  a  healthier  econ-
omy,  increased  societal  stability,  and  enhanced  maritime  security.  The  FAO  esti-
mates annual global revenue lost to IUU fishing to be $9 billion (U.S.). This revenue 
is a direct theft from maritime communities, including many of the world’s most vul-
nerable coastal states. 

Given  that  living  marine  resources  do  not  recognize  national  boundaries,  the 
Coast Guard works alongside key partners at home and abroad to protect them. We 
enforce  U.S.  domestic  fisheries  laws  in  conjunction  with  National  Oceanic  and  At-
mospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  Fisheries’  Office  of  Law  Enforcement  (OLE)  and 
General  Council  for  Enforcement  and  Litigation  (GCEL),  and  the  Department  of 
Justice, supporting conservation and management of domestic resources in the esti-
mated $60 billion domestic fishing industry. Additionally, the Coast Guard enforces 
laws  at  sea  to  protect  marine  mammals,  endangered  species,  and  marine  sanc-
tuaries. 

We applaud and support NOAA and the State Department in their efforts to bring 
additional  tools  to  bear  on  combating  IUU,  such  as  the  application  of  Port  State 
Measures  to  deter  IUU  importation,  implementation  of  Catch  Documentation 
Schemes, and development of an International Trade Data System. These tools will 
help restrict market access for IUU product, thereby making IUU activity less prof-
itable. However, at-sea enforcement and the ability to deliver consequences to those 
found  directly  engaged  in  illegal  fishing  activity  remains  a  critical  element  of  the 
overall  U.S.  Government  effort  to  address  the  IUU  threat,  as  outlined  in  the  U.S. 
National Plan of Action to Prevent, Deter, and Eliminate IUU Fishing. 

As the only agency with the infrastructure and authority to project a law enforce-
ment presence throughout the U.S. EEZ and in key areas of the high seas, the Coast 
Guard  implements  Ocean  Guardian,  our  strategic  plan  for  fisheries  law  enforce-
ment.  This  strategy  incorporates  the  four  principles  of:  (1)  sound  regulations  based 
on  effective  and  enforceable  legal  regimes  which  act  as  a  system  of  ‘‘rules’’  that 
shape  acceptable  activities;  (2)  productive  partnerships  that  facilitate  law  enforce-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

ment  cooperation;  (3)  use  of  technology  to  advance  Maritime  Domain  Awareness; 
and (4) effective presence on the ocean. We believe these four principles offer a use-
ful framework for addressing the threat posed by IUU fishing. The rest of my state-
ment will focus on how the Coast Guard implements Ocean Guardian. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  dedicated  to  supporting  multilateral  efforts  to  bolster  legal 
regimes that deter IUU and deliver consequences to violators. Considering maritime 
initiatives  and  policies  as  part  of  a  larger  system  enables  a  better  understanding 
of their inter-relationships and effectiveness. A well designed system of regimes cre-
ates  the  opportunity  for  mutually  supporting  domestic  and  international  regula-
tions. Together, they provide a comprehensive system of maritime governance. 

We  fully  support  modernization  of  Regional  Fishery  Management  Organizations 
(RFMOs) to include comprehensive boarding and inspection regimes as called for by 
the  1995  Agreement  for  the  Implementation  of  the  Provisions  of  the  United  Nations 
Convention on the Law of the Sea of 10 December 1982 Relating to the Conservation 
and  Management  of  Straddling  Fish  Stocks  and  Highly  Migratory  Fish  Stocks— 
more  commonly  referred  to  as  the  U.N.  Fish  Stocks  Agreement.  The  Western  and 
Central  Pacific  Fisheries  Commission’s  recent  incorporation  of  these  enforcement 
principles into its management regime is a particularly relevant example. This Com-
mission  is  one  of  the  first  in  the  world  to  employ  a  fully-developed  boarding  and 
inspection protocol for high seas enforcement based on the U.N. Fish Stocks Agree-
ment. The Coast Guard is proud to have been involved in its development. 

One  of  the  fundamental  building  blocks  of  this  system  is  the  1982  U.N.  Conven-
tion on the Law of the Sea. While this Convention, along with its 1994 Protocol re-
lating  to  Deep  Seabed  Mining,  was  referred  to  the  Senate  for  advice  and  consent 
in 1994, we remain a ‘‘non-party.’’ Joining the Convention with the declaration and 
understandings  reflected  in  Senate  Executive  Report  110–9  (Senate  Foreign  Rela-
tions Committee) is an important step to ensure that we can exercise the necessary 
leadership in international regime development across the full spectrum of concerns 
including international fisheries management and conservation. 

The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  develop  active  international  partnerships  through 
the  development  of  bilateral  enforcement  agreements  and  participation  in  multilat-
eral  groups  like  Regional  Fishery  Management  Organizations  (RFMOs)  and  the 
North Pacific Coast Guard Forum. Applying the principle of productive partnerships 
to  combating  IUU  in  an  international  context  requires  that  the  Coast  Guard  work 
closely with NOAA and the U.S. Department of State to develop and advance coop-
erative enforcement agreements and improve communications with industry and en-
vironmental  groups.  A  non-inclusive  list  of  RFMOs  in  which  the  Coast  Guard  par-
ticipates includes: the Western and Central Pacific Fisheries Commission, the North 
Pacific  Anadromous  Fish  Commission,  and  the  International  Commission  for  the 
Conservation  of  Atlantic  Tuna.  The  Coast  Guard  also  maintains  a  liaison  officer 
with  the  State  Department’s  Office  of  Marine  Conservation  to  advise  U.S.  delega-
tions to these organizations on the enforceability of proposed management regimes. 
We also provide a liaison officer to the NOAA Fisheries Office for Enforcement. 

Additionally,  the  Coast  Guard  engages  directly  with  our  international  enforce-
ment counterpart. For example, over the past year the Coast Guard harmonized ef-
forts  with  North  Pacific  Anadromous  Fish  Commission  and  North  Pacific  Coast 
Guard Forum partners including Canadian, Chinese, Japanese, and Russian surface 
and  air  patrols  to  cooperatively  deter  IUU  in  the  North  Pacific.  Much  of  the  oper-
ational  planning  for  the  2008  North  Pacific  high  seas  driftnet  (HSDN)  enforcement 
season recently took place at the North Pacific Coast Guard Forum Fisheries Work-
ing Group meeting in Seattle, Washington. There, we coordinated multilateral oper-
ational plans for upcoming North Pacific surface and air patrols. North Pacific Coast 
Guard  Forum  planning  efforts  overlap,  and  are  coordinated  with,  meetings  of  the 
North  Pacific  Anadromous  Fish  Commission.  These  two  forums  further  supplement 
the Coast Guard’s implementation of a bilateral U.S.-China Memorandum of Under-
standing  to  enforce  the  U.N.  moratorium  on  large-scale  high  seas  driftnet  fishing. 
Similar  HSDN  coordination  with  partner  agencies  from  Canada,  Japan,  Korea,  the 
Russian  Federation,  and  the  Peoples  Republic  of  China  took  place  in  2007  and  re-
sulted  in  the  interdiction  and  seizure  of  six  Chinese-flagged  driftnet  vessels  by  the 
Coast Guard Cutter BOUTWELL. 

Beyond  our  work  in  the  North  Pacific,  the  Coast  Guard  is  increasingly  involved 
with  West  Africa  and  Pacific  Island  nations  striving  to  develop  their  own  maritime 
safety,  security,  and  stewardship  forces.  As  another  example  of  global  maritime 
partnerships,  I  would  like  to  share  with  you  a  recent  success  story  in  international 
cooperation  and  effective  enforcement.  The  Coast  Guard  currently  makes  use  of  bi-
lateral  ‘‘ship-rider’’  agreements  with  a  number  of  Pacific  Island  Nations.  These 
agreements allow foreign enforcement personnel to embark U.S. Coast Guard assets 
to  exercise  their  authority  and  jurisdiction  from  the  deck  of  a  Coast  Guard  cutter. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

In  mid-February  of  this  year,  Coast  Guard  Cutters  ASSATEAGUE  and  SEQUOIA, 
with  embarked  Federated  States  of  Micronesia  ship-riders,  interdicted  two  Japa-
nese-flagged  fishing  vessels  in  the  Micronesian  EEZ,  160  nautical  miles  south  of 
Guam. Both Japanese fishing vessels were found to be fishing in violation of Micro-
nesian law. The Coast Guard cutters, acting under authority of their embarked Mi-
cronesian  fisheries  enforcement  officers,  escorted  these  suspected  IUU  fishing  ves-
sels  toward  Pohnpei,  Micronesia  for  further  investigation  and  prosecution.  The  en-
forcement  action  that  I  just  described  would  not  have  been  possible  without  sound 
regulations  and  productive  partnerships  such  as  developed  regimes  for  maritime 
governance including South Pacific Forum Fisheries Agency management measures, 
Micronesian  fisheries  regulations,  and  a  U.S.-Micronesian  bilateral  agreement  al-
lowing ship-rider operations. 

In June, the high endurance Coast Guard cutter DALLAS will deploy to West Af-
rica  under  the  operational  control  of  the  Department  of  Defense.  Planning  efforts 
are  underway  to  conduct  maritime  law  enforcement  operations  with  Cape  Verde, 
which  include  using  Cape  Verde  maritime  law  enforcement  officer  ‘‘ship-riders’’  as 
a  proof-of-concept  test.  If  successful,  the  Coast  Guard  and  Navy  may  consider  ex-
panding such operations to other West African nations with the interest and capac-
ity to participate. 

The  Coast  Guard  also  continues  to  establish  ever  more  comprehensive  Maritime 
Domain  Awareness  (MDA)  to  inform  decisions  on  how  best  to  employ  finite  re-
sources  to  deter  the  threat  of  IUU  fishing.  MDA  is  enhanced  through  application 
of  technologies  such  as  Vessel  Monitoring  Systems,  or  ‘‘VMS.’’  VMS  is  a  general 
term that applies to ship tracking systems used as part of a living marine resources 
regulatory  regime.  VMS  is  a  component  of  many  domestic  fishery  management 
plans  and  international  fishery  agreements  alike.  For  example,  the  Pacific  Forum 
Fishery Agency requires that that foreign fishing vessels seeking access to fish with-
in member EEZs must carry operable VMS. In the Fourteenth Coast Guard District, 
we  have  executed  agreements  with  Pacific  Forum  Fishery  Agency  countries  to  gain 
near-real time access to this VMS position data. We can see the movement of many 
U.S.  and  foreign-flagged  vessels  operating  in  the  non-contiguous  U.S.  EEZs  of  the 
Pacific,  which  provides  the  Coast  Guard  with  improved  visibility  on  what  is  hap-
pening  in  this  geographically  expansive  area.  VMS  is  also  a  provision  of  other 
RFMO  management  schemes,  including  the  Central  Bering  Sea  ‘‘Donut  Hole’’  Con-
vention  and  the  Western  and  Central  Pacific  Fisheries  Commission.  VMS  alone, 
however, is not enough to maintain MDA. It is not infallible, it is not part of every 
management measure, and it is not on board every potential IUU vessel. The Coast 
Guard  is  able  to  close  this  gap  in  some  key  areas  by  utilizing  national  resources 
to monitor foreign fishing vessel activity. 

The  Coast  Guard  also  continues  to  examine  potential  surveillance  contributions 
of Unmanned Aircraft Systems (UAS). The Coast Guard Research and Development 
Center is actively evaluating contributions of UAS to perform all Coast Guard mis-
sions,  including  fisheries.  The  Coast  Guard  is  currently  conducting  a  Gulf  Coast 
Maritime  Demonstration  to  assess  the  use  of  UAS  in  conducting  maritime  surveil-
lance.  However,  awareness  is  often  only  half  of  the  picture.  Effective  enforcement 
of the regulations necessary to combat IUU fishing ultimately requires that we put 
‘‘steel on target’’ and ‘‘boots on deck.’’ 

This  leads  me  to  the  fourth  Ocean  Guardian  principal,  effective  presence,  which 

has two main components. 

First,  the  Coast  Guard  requires  a  high  level  of  knowledge  and  professionalism 
from  all  of  our  Boarding  Officers  who  conduct  the  fisheries  enforcement  mission  at 
sea.  The  five  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Regional  Fisheries  Training  Centers  and  the  Mari-
time  Law  Enforcement  Academy  are  our  primary  means  of  maintaining  this  com-
petency. 

Second, we must sustain the ability to place capable resources on scene when and 
where they are needed. The U.S. EEZ is not only the largest in the world; it is also 
vulnerable because it is one of the most productive. The U.S. EEZ contains an esti-
mated 20 percent of the world’s fishery resources. Foreign fishers operating illegally 
in this area are, effectively, stealing U.S. resources. These vast patrol areas, coupled 
with  the  long  distance  from  U.S.  shores,  provide  a  compelling  requirement  for  a 
Deepwater  fleet  capable  of  providing  persistent  surveillance  and  presence  in  the 
open ocean expanses far from U.S. shores. As fish stocks throughout the world dwin-
dle  and  the  fleets  of  distant  water  fishing  nations  voyage  far  from  home  in  search 
of  lucrative  catches,  the  U.S.  EEZs,  along  with  those  of  coastal  states  everywhere, 
will  become  more  attractive  targets.  Preventing  illegal  encroachment  of  the  U.S. 
EEZ  by  foreign  fishing  vessels  is  vital  to  protecting  the  integrity  of  our  maritime 
borders. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Enforcement  of  international  fisheries  management  schemes  is  a  mission  largely 
conducted  by  Coast  Guard  deepwater  assets  our  cutters,  boats,  and  aircraft  must 
be up to this task. Most of the eight non-contiguous U.S. EEZs in the Western and 
Central Pacific require several days to over a week in transit time for a cutter from 
the nearest Coast Guard base. The centerpiece of the Coast Guard’s future capabili-
ties to address a projected increase in IUU threat and secure our Nation’s maritime 
borders is the Integrated Deepwater System. The capability that the Deepwater ac-
quisitions  are  designed  to  deliver  will  maintain  our  ability  to  enforce  international 
and domestic living marine resources regulations in distant reaches of the U.S. EEZ, 
and on the high seas beyond. 

The  Coast  Guard  needs  to  replace  aging  vessels,  aircraft,  and  shore  infrastruc-
ture,  and  sustain  these  assets  during  recapitalization.  The  cost  of  maintaining  and 
operating  out-dated  assets  is  continually  increasing,  as  are  major  unplanned  main-
tenance  evolutions  and  reductions  in  readiness.  Lost  cutter  days  within  the  legacy 
deepwater cutter fleet continue to mount. During the last 2 years, an average of 400 
scheduled deployment days were lost in Pacific Area due to unplanned maintenance 
and engineering casualties. In December 2007, the aging Medium Endurance Coast 
Guard Cutter ACUSHNET suffered a catastrophic mechanical casualty resulting in 
the  loss  of  a  significant  portion  of  the  propulsion  shaft  and  the  attached  propeller. 
The  ACUSHNET  is  a  World  War  II  veteran,  originally  commissioned  as  a  U.S. 
naval  salvage  vessel  in  1944.  Despite  her  64  years  of  valiant  service,  the 
ACUSHNET is a preeminent example of the Coast Guard’s need to recapitalize. Ul-
timately, the future operational success of the Coast Guard to help combat the glob-
al threat of IUU fishing is dependent upon a comprehensive recapitalization of front 
line assets and shore and support infrastructure. 

In  conclusion,  the  Coast  Guard  addresses  the  IUU  threat  to  living  marine  re-
sources  by  participating  in  a  concerted  international  effort  to  develop  necessary 
legal  regimes,  foster  partnerships,  expand  our  Maritime  Domain  Awareness,  and 
maintain an effective enforcement presence. The Coast Guard will continue to work 
closely with NOAA, the State Department, and our international partners to achieve 
national  and  international  objectives  affecting  fisheries  worldwide.  The  world’s 
oceans  are  truly  a  global  commons,  requiring  a  global  approach  toward  their  con-
servation  and  management.  In  the  face  of  increasing  resource  scarcity,  IUU  fishing 
is  a  growing  threat  to  the  long-term  viability  of  fish  stocks  around  the  globe  that 
the U.S. Coast Guard stands ready to confront. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today.  I  would  be  happy  to 

answer any questions you may have. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Admiral.  Let  me 

start with questions with you. 

I have just returned from Alaska, where I had some briefings by 
the International Arctic Research Center at the University of Alas-
ka in Fairbanks. And they inform me that it is true that the Arctic 
ice will continue to thin in the near period ahead. 

Now  in  order  to  enter  the  Arctic  Ocean,  a  vessel  has  to  go 
through  some  Nation’s  economic  zone.  It  is  the  one  area  of  the 
world  that  could  be  completely  controlled  if  we  had  an  agreement 
from  all  nations  that  no  vessel  could  proceed  through  their  eco-
nomic  zone  without  specific  controls,  such  as  having  a  beacon  that 
can be traced by satellite and such as examination of the gear that 
would  be  involved  and  such  as  examination  of  the  catch  as  they 
exited that Arctic Ocean. 

I  think  it  is  time  that  we  really  worked  on,  through  the  entities 
that  all  three  of  you  represent,  an  aggressive  approach  to  pro-
tecting the Arctic. If we are informed correctly, the thinning is tak-
ing  place  because  of  warm  water  that  is  coming  from  the  Atlantic 
into the Arctic Ocean and that our ice is thinning from the bottom, 
not from the top. 

Under those circumstances, it is very acute to the time before the 
ice  will  be  thin  enough  for  operation  in  the  Arctic  by  just  regular 
fishing  vessels  without  any  ice  protection  available  to  them.  I 
would  say  from  what  I  understand,  we  have  2  to  3  years  at  most 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

before  it  would  be  possible  to  operate  fishing  vessels  without  any 
protection, any ice capability in their construction. 

Do  you  think  that  it  is  a  possibility  that  the  law  enforcement 
mechanisms  of  the  various  States  that  have  entry  into  the  Arctic 
Ocean  could  get  together  and  initiate  this  kind  of  an  agreement? 
Admiral  BROOKS.  Yes,  Senator,  I  think  they  could.  I  think  the 
Arctic  nations  all  understand  the  opportunities  and  risks  of  the 
Arctic.  I  can—I  was  in  Kotzebue  and  Barrow  just  last  week  and 
was  surprised  to  see  clear  water  within  visual  range  offshore.  Of 
course, the shore ice is still there, but the ice is already retreating, 
and that means ships can come. Access is coming, the whale season 
accelerating. 

The  issue  for  us,  I  have  talked  with  my  Russian  counterpart  lo-
cally,  General  Lebedev  in  Kamchatka,  about  the  need  for  a  vessel 
traffic  management  scheme  through  the  Bering  Strait.  Because 
from  the  Pacific  side,  all  vessels  entering  the  Arctic  must  transit 
that narrow pass between Alaska and Russia where—between Lit-
tle  and  Big  Diomede  Island.  And  it  is  a  shallow  place,  relatively 
shallow,  and  we  are—I  am  concerned  about  navigational  safety, 
whether  we  need  a  way  to  control  these  ships  to  ensure  that  they 
don’t  run  aground  or  break  down  and  drift  ashore  in  Alaska  and 
give us a Selendang Ayu type of problem. 

And the Russians understand that whatever we did in the Bering 
Strait would have to be a joint U.S.-Russian venture, and we would 
have  to  pursue  that  through  the  international  maritime  organiza-
tion based on the needs that we would have to control vessels. 

Beyond that, I had not considered the idea of a fishing regulatory 
scheme  among  the  nations,  but  it  makes  perfect  sense.  It  is  some-
thing that could and probably should be pursued because for no one 
benefits  from  IUU  fishing,  and  I  think  the  nations  of  the  world 
could come together on this issue. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  think  the  interests  of  Congress  and 
what  is  going  on  in  the  Arctic  Ocean  is  demonstrated  by  the  num-
ber of people at this Committee table. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  STEVENS.  We  are  the  only  ones  that  have  the  direct 
knowledge  of  the  threat  and  only  ones  that  have  the  direct  impact 
on  our  people.  Our  indigenous  people  harvest  ocean  mammals  for 
their sustenance or their subsistence. There are not too many peo-
ple of the world that still do that, but ours do and under their own 
regimes, which we helped them create, which regulate their taking 
of those mammals. 

We know that the oil industry now is proceeding to have a great 
interest  to  try  to  keep  up  with  Russia  in  terms  of  what  is  going 
on on the ocean floor of the Arctic Ocean. And by the way, the Rus-
sians  will  be  here  next  week  over  at  the  Library  of  Congress  en 
masse,  and  I  think  we  ought  to  find  somebody  to  have  a  meeting 
with them while they are here to start talking about this. 

We  showed  what  the  U.N.  could  do  with  regard  to  driftnets.  It 
hasn’t  been  completely  effective,  but  it  has  been  an  enormous  im-
pact  on  their  use.  I  think  we  ought  to  try  to  think  about  how  to 
get  the  U.N.  into  aiding  us  to  protect  the  Arctic  Ocean  now  before 
it is raped by these IUU fisheries. I do appreciate your concern and 
your being here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Mr. Balton, I have really no problem with what the State Depart-
ment  is  doing.  I  do  think  that  you  are  really  very  much  aware  of 
it, of the threat. 

I  am  interested  in  some  of  the  things  that  you  mentioned  about 
the tools that are available now. I believe that was your statement, 
the tools that are available now. Can you describe that to us a little 
bit  more?  What  really  can  we  do  under  existing  arrangements  to 
initiate some firmer control over IUU fisheries in the Arctic Ocean? 
Mr.  BALTON.  Let  me  say  a  word  about  existing  fisheries  in  the 
Arctic  Ocean,  Senator.  The  Arctic  is  not  actually  a  single  region 
when  it  comes  to  fisheries.  In  the  area  of  the  Arctic  farthest  from 
Alaska,  namely  the  part  off  of  Norway,  there  already  are  major 
commercial  fisheries  underway  in  the  Barents  Sea  and  the  Green-
land Sea. 

Senator STEVENS. Are they regulated by Norway at all? 
Mr.  BALTON.  Yes,  not  only  by  Norway  within  its  exclusive  eco-
nomic  zone,  but  through  bilateral  and  multilateral  agreements 
among the countries in that area. We are not party to those. 

Senator STEVENS. Have they been effective agreements? 
Mr. BALTON. I would say the record is mixed. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Do  they  document  their  activities?  Is  there  a 
record some way to show what they actually have done in pursuing 
those agreements? 

Mr.  BALTON.  Yes,  I  could  provide  that  to  the  Committee  if  you 

are interested. 

[The information referred to follows:] 
The  North  East  Atlantic  Fisheries  Commission  (NEAFC)  regulates  fishing  activi-
ties  in  the  NEAFC  regulatory  area,  which  includes  portions  of  the  Arctic  Ocean,  in 
order  to  combat  IUU  fishing.  The  NEAFC  website  contains  records  of  its  efforts  in 
this respect. The website also contains facts, answers and questions that aid in sum-
marizing regulatory actions NEAFC has taken to combat IUU fishing. 

NEAFC  utilizes  a  wide  range  of  strategies  to  combat  IUU  fishing  activities,  in-
cluding  at-sea  monitoring  and  surveillance  of  fishing  vessels,  as  well  as  a  recently 
enacted suite of port State controls that will prevent vessels on IUU blacklists from, 
inter  alia,  using  port  services  and  landing  or  transshipping  fish  in  port.  The  com-
plete  scheme  for  enforcement  and  control  of  fishing  activities  in  the  NEAFC  regu-
latory  area  is  described  on  NEAFC’s  website.  NEAFC  also  maintains  a  Permanent 
Committee  on  Control  and  Enforcement  (PECCOE)  that  regulates  activities  in  the 
Convention  regulatory  area.  Recent  reports  from  PECCOE  shed  additional  light  on 
the regulatory efforts at combating IUU fishing activities in the NEAFC regulatory 
area. 

The  nations  of  Russia  and  Norway  have  also  undertaken  efforts  to  combat  IUU 
fishing  activities  in  the  Barents  Sea.  They  have  established  a  Joint  Fisheries  Com-
mission,  intended  to  work  in  conjunction  with  the  regulatory  schemes  employed  by 
NEAFC.  Their  efforts  are  not  as  well  documented  in  English  as  are  the  efforts  of 
NEAFC,  but  some  documentation  exists.  For  example,  I  can  refer  you  to  comments 
by John Erik Pedersen, political adviser at the Norwegian Ministry of Fisheries and 
Coastal  Affairs,  in  ‘‘Fisheries  cooperation  in  the  North:  a  Norwegian  perspective,’’ 
is  available  on  the  website  of  the  Norwegian  Ministry  of  Fisheries  and  Coastal  Af-
fairs. Also see Russian/Norwegian fisheries collaboration, including efforts to combat 
IUU  activities,  which  is  located  on  the  Norwegian  Fisheries  website.  In  addition, 
there  are  news  reports  that  Russian  and  Norwegian  coast  guards  have  agreed  to 
share  information  on  IUU  activities  and  vessels,  and  to  make  that  information 
available on an online data base. 

Here  are  links  to  information  on  the  North  East  Atlantic  Fisheries  Commission 
and the Joint Russian/Norwegian activities to combat IUU activities in Barents Sea: 

1. http://www.neafc.org/index.htm 
2. http://www.neafc.org/measures/iuulfaq.htm 
3. http://www.neafc.org/news/docs/30–april–07lpressreleaselpscliuu.pdf 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

4. http://www.neafc.org/rneasures/docs/scheme 2008.pdf 
5. http://www.neafc.org/reports/peccoe/index.htm 
6. http://www.neafc.org/reports/peccoe/docs/peccoe1lapril 2008.pdf 
7. http://www.neafc.org/reports/peccoe/docs/peccoeloct 2007.pdf 
8. http://www.neafc.org/reports/peccoe/docs/peccoelapril–2007.pdf 
9.  http://www.regjeringen.no/nb/dep/fkd/dep/politisklledelse/John-Erik-Pe-
dersen/taler-og-artikler/2008/fisheries-cooperation-in-the-north-a- 
nor.html?id=503822 
10.  http://www.fisheries.no/managementlcontrol/Norwegianlfisherieslcolla 
boration/Russia.htm 
11.  http://www.barentsobserver.com/joint-norwegian-russian-data  base-on-ille-
gal-fishing.4481078.html 

Yes,  they  have  very  good  documentation.  They  have  had  prob-
lems  with  IUU  fishing,  particularly  in  the  Barents  Sea  and  in  a 
high-seas  pocket  in  that  area  known  as  ‘‘the  loophole’’  in  years 
past.  But  they  have  made  major  strides  in  cutting  down  on  IUU 
fishing, including through port State measures. 

Now in the area of the Arctic closest to Alaska, there are not yet 
major commercial fisheries. But you are right to say that as the cli-
mate  changes,  the  ice  recedes,  the  water  warms,  we  should  be  ex-
pecting and anticipating that there could be major commercial fish-
eries  north  of  the  Bering  Strait  sometime  in  the  future.  We  are 
aware  that  the  Senate  has  passed  a  resolution  calling  on  us  to 
work  with  the  other  Arctic  countries  to  regulate  our  future  Arctic 
fisheries to prevent IUU fishing. 

Senator STEVENS. Ours is a virgin area, and my worry is not the 
entrance through the Bering Straits as much as it is this entrance 
from the fishing fleets of foreign countries that are dealing with the 
other part of the Arctic already. Ours is a virgin area. The ice has 
been thicker in the past than it will be in the near future, although 
I  have  been  told  to  expect  that  it  will  come  back  eventually,  and 
this  is  not  a  permanent  problem.  But  it  will  be  a  problem  for  the 
next couple of decades, that will be sure. 

But I am really interested to try and find out to what extent the 
vessels  that  are  out  there  now,  from  particularly  above  Norway, 
would have easy access to the waters off Alaska and Canada. 

Mr.  BALTON.  I  don’t  see  any  significant  threat  in  the  immediate 
future of vessels fishing in the North Atlantic area adjacent to the 
Arctic  coming  all  the  way  through  the  Arctic  to  reach  Alaskan 
waters.  And  we  have  regulatory  controls  already  in  place  for  our 
own EEZ. The North Pacific Council, for example, has proposed an 
Arctic  fisheries  management  plan  that  I  expect  will  be  finalized 
sometime soon. There are other—— 

ka? 

Senator STEVENS. That would only apply to the area above Alas-

Mr. BALTON. That is correct. 
Senator STEVENS. That does not apply above Russia yet? 
Mr. BALTON. Not yet. I have, however, in a meeting with Russia 
just  last  September,  presented  to  them  the  North  Pacific  Council 
decisions  and  urged  that  they  adopt  something  comparable  for 
their  area  adjacent  to  ours  and  that  we  work  with  them  for  any 
stocks that could straddle our zone and theirs. 

I similarly presented to Canada the Senate resolution calling for 
cooperative  work  on  Arctic  fisheries  and  urged  that  we  meet  with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Canada  to  talk  specifically  about  the  area  in  the  Arctic  that  the 
U.S.  and  Canada  both  border.  And  it  is  my  hope  and  expectation 
that  in  the  near  future  we  will  be  able  to  make  progress  with  our 
neighbors in that way. 

Senator STEVENS. I think you mentioned and I believe that ratifi-
cation of the Law of the Sea treaty would enable us to have greater 
control of the areas above our country. But some of the areas—the 
nations  that  have  boundaries  that  touch  in  the  Arctic  Ocean  al-
ready have ratified the Law of the Sea. 

Are there any mechanisms that they have used, pursuant to the 
Law of the Sea treaty, to enhance their ability to regulate fisheries 
in  the  Arctic  Ocean,  where  they  have  already  ratified  the  Law  of 
the Sea treaty? 

Mr. BALTON. You are right that all of the major fishing countries 
other than the United States are party to the Law of the Sea Con-
vention  already,  including  all  of  the  other  Arctic  nations,  and  that 
gives them a strong framework on which to build fisheries laws. It 
also  gives  them  a  clear  path  forward  for  defining  where  the  outer 
limit  of  their  continental  shelves  in  the  Arctic  and  elsewhere  may 
exist. As a non-party, we are at a disadvantage in those ways. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  know  we  are  at  a  disadvantage  now,  but  I 
wonder if they have been effective at all in using the powers of the 
Law  of  the  Sea  treaty  to  enhance  their  ability  to  manage  the  fish-
eries in an area of which those nations already have control? 

Mr. BALTON. Senator, I wouldn’t want to overstate it, but I would 
say that at least indirectly their being party to the Law of the Sea 
Convention has aided them in these endeavors. The Law of the Sea 
Convention  creates  a  general  framework  for  fisheries,  and  these 
countries, using that framework, have built fisheries rules for both 
their EEZ and in cooperation with each other for areas beyond na-
tional jurisdiction to deal with fisheries in their parts of the Arctic. 
Senator  STEVENS.  I  am  one  who  believes  that  our  control  over 
our economic zone has enabled us to lead the world in terms of the 
scientific  management  of  fisheries,  and  I  don’t  think  that  many 
areas of the world have been as aggressive as ours. I think our re-
gional council has been more aggressive than any area of the world 
in management on a scientific basis. 

Our  area,  which  has  half  the  coastline  of  the  United  States,  has 
no  endangered  species  that  are  harvested  by  any  fishery  and  has 
no  threatened  species  that  are  harvested  by  any  fishery.  That  was 
on my latest report, and I hope it is still the case. 

Mr. BALTON. I certainly agree that the North Pacific Council has 
a very well-deserved reputation for effective fisheries management. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  if  we  can  spread  that  throughout  the 
Arctic as quickly as possible, it may enhance the future of the fish-
eries  of  the  Arctic  Ocean.  Otherwise,  I  think  they  are  liable  to  be 
really harmed. 

Mr.  Balsiger,  there  may  be  some  seafood  products  that  we  do 
want to harvest in the Arctic Ocean in time. Do you think we have 
the capability through NOAA to have any influence on what fishing 
does take place in this area now? 

Dr. BALSIGER. Well, Senator, yes. Certainly in the U.S. EEZ just 
above  Alaska  that  any  regulations  that  would  allow  fishing  there 
would  be  recommended  by  the  North  Pacific  Fishery  Management 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Council through their Arctic FMP, and it would be approved or dis-
approved by NOAA. 

So we have a strong role in that regard, and I think that you are 
correct  that  the  North  Pacific  Council,  in  developing  their  Arctic 
FMP, has a very conservative outlook. I don’t think that there will 
be fishing regulations recommended that would put any of the fish 
stocks in jeopardy or the environment in jeopardy. So there is good 
control there. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, let me be bad and just ask you, and Mr. 
Balton, are State and NOAA ready to accept the jurisdiction of our 
regional council over the EEZ north of Alaska, as they have in the 
North Pacific? 

Dr. BALSIGER. Senator, I believe so. I think that is—— 
Senator  STEVENS.  We  have  assumed  that  is  our  authority,  but  I 
was just wondering, are you going to challenge the authority of the 
regional  council  in  the  Arctic  Ocean  that  might  be  available  to  be 
fished by anybody? 

Dr. BALSIGER. No, sir. 
Senator STEVENS. Well, if you have any hesitancy, I would appre-
ciate  if  you  would  report  back  to  us  if  there  is  any  indication  at 
all  that  State  and  NOAA  will  challenge  the  jurisdiction  of  the 
North  Pacific  Regional  Fisheries  Council  to  manage  the  resources 
within the U.S. EEZ north of Alaska. 

it. 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  Senator,  my  hesitancy  was  only  because  such  an 
idea never occurred to me that we would challenge that, but I take 
your point that we certainly would get back. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  appreciate  your  hesitancy,  and  I  agree  with 

[Laughter.] 
Dr. BALSIGER. And I—— 
Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much,  gentlemen.  There  may 
be  some  questions  that  my  colleagues  wish  to  submit.  I  would  ap-
preciate  it  if  you  would  answer  them  within  a  2-week  period. 
Thank you very much. Thank you, Admiral. 

And  now  we  will  turn  to  the  second  panel,  which  is  Mr.  Dave 
Benton,  Executive  Director  of  the  Marine  Conservation  Alliance; 
Mr.  James  Cook,  the  President  of  North  Pacific  Ocean  Producers 
LLC;  and  Ms.  Lisa  Speer  of  the  Natural  Resources  Defense  Coun-
cil. 

If it is agreeable, we will just proceed with the witnesses as they 
were listed on my list and proceed with you first, Dave, if you will. 
Mr. Benton? 

STATEMENT OF DAVID BENTON, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

MARINE CONSERVATION ALLIANCE 

Mr. BENTON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
For the record, my name is David Benton. I am the Executive Di-
rector  of  the  Marine  Conservation  Alliance.  The  Marine  Conserva-
tion Alliance is a coalition of seafood industry participants in Alas-
ka—harvesters,  processors,  coastal  communities,  CDQ  groups.  Col-
lectively,  the  membership  of  MCA  represents  probably  between  70 
to 80 percent of the seafood production off the coast of Alaska. 

And  Mr.  Chairman,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  come  before 
you  today  on  international  fisheries  issues.  It  has  been  quite  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

while since we have had a discussion about international issues in 
a Committee like this. My history goes back with the State of Alas-
ka and the initiatives that you generated back in the 1980s and the 
1990s  to  deal  with  the  threats  like  the  high  seas,  large-scale  high 
seas  driftnets,  overfishing  in  the  ‘‘Donut  Hole’’  by  the  fleets  from 
Japan  and  Poland  and  China  and  Korea,  the  need  to  get  a  U.N. 
fish stocks agreement to deal with straddling stocks and highly mi-
gratory fish stocks. 

All  of  those—all  of  those  initiatives,  Senator,  sort  of  originated 
in this room, and I noted your comment a little while ago that the 
interest in the Arctic is reflected by how many Committee members 
are here in the room. And it seems to me that I recall that the time 
when  we  had  to  deal  with  high  seas  driftnets,  we  had  just  about 
this  many  members  in  the  room  at  the  time  when  we  first  started 
that,  and  I  think  the  result  turned  out  pretty  good  at  the  end  of 
the day. And I think—— 

Senator  STEVENS.—comments,  but  I  understand  what  you  are 

saying. 

Mr. BENTON. Yes, it has really been quite an interesting process 
from my perspective and from the perspective of the seafood indus-
try. When you looked at what was going on in the 1980s and early 
1990s  in  the  North  Pacific,  there  was  a  high  seas  driftnet  fleet  of 
about  1,500  vessels  to  2,000  vessels  fishing  there.  They  were  fish-
ing  between  35,000  miles  in  net  a  night.  Estimates  were  a  million 
miles in net a year. 

During the summer, when they fished up there, those fleets then 
moved  down  to  the  south,  into  the  southern  Pacific  Ocean,  and 
were  hammering  tuna  stocks  and  migratory  species  down  there. 
Literally,  tens  of  thousands  of  sea  turtles,  hundreds  of  thousands 
of  marine  mammals,  estimates  of  up  to  maybe  a  million  some-odd 
sea  birds  were  being  decimated  by  those  fleets.  At  the  same  time 
that that fleet was operating, we had several hundred vessels oper-
ating  in  the  central  Bering  Sea  Donut  Hole  that  were  overfishing 
the  pollock  stocks  in  the  Aleutian  Basin,  and  we  had  some  real 
problems. 

But  this  Committee  took  charge  of  those  issues.  The  seafood  in-
dustry  worked  very  closely  with  you.  We  created  the  Bering  Sea 
Fisheries  Advisory  Body,  which  then  advised  State  Department  on 
U.S.-Russian matters. We initiated bilaterally with Russia joint ini-
tiatives  to  address  those  kinds  of  problems,  including,  I  failed  to 
mention,  high  seas  salmon  fishery  that  Japan  was  conducting  as 
well. 

And  within  a  very  short  space  of  time,  we  banned  high  seas 
driftnet fishing. We eliminated the INPFC, the International North 
Pacific Fisheries Commission, which authorized the high seas salm-
on  fleet,  eliminated  the  high  seas  salmon  fishery  of  Japan,  closed 
the Donut Hole, and established pretty much an entirely new order 
in the North Pacific. 

And  it  was  in  a  very  short  period  of  time,  and  there  were  large 
conservation benefits that have come about because from that. And 
I think it is important for us to remember that, that bit of history, 
because  we  are  facing  very  similar  challenges,  I  think,  today.  And 
some ways, we really need to make a renewed commitment to deal-
ing  with  problems  of  IUU  fishing  and  the  prospects  of  the  Arctic 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

opening  to  new  fisheries,  whether  they  are  IUU  fisheries  or  fish-
eries that are sponsored by nations that may be regulated, but not 
be—but may not be acceptable to us and our interests. 

So I want to talk a little bit about that, and I want to talk about 
it  in  the  context  of  both  the  North  Pacific  and  the  Arctic.  And  I 
want to start with the Arctic, Senator, because, as you know, obvi-
ously  that  is  very  close  to  our  home.  It  has  always  been  a  place 
that  has  been  very  important  to  our  coastal  communities  and  na-
tive peoples that live along our shoreline. They live off the sea. The 
sea is fundamental to their way of life. 

The  rapid  pace  of  change  up  there  that  may  bring  industrializa-
tion  and  commercial  fishing  into  those  waters  is  going  to  have  a 
very significant impact on the resources up there and also on those 
people.  And  I  think  that  the  United  States  has  an  obligation  to 
take  charge  of  that  matter,  not  let  it  happen  in  a  happenstance 
way, and take a very proactive approach to dealing with the Arctic. 
The resolution that came out of the Senate last year, I think, was 
a  very,  very  important  piece  of  work.  You  laid  out  a  chart—you 
charted  a  course  and  laid  out  a  way  for  the  United  States  to  pro-
ceed,  and  you  keyed  off  the  actions  that  the  North  Pacific  Fishery 
Management Council has been pursuing. 

Our  organization  and  the  seafood  industry  in  Alaska  fully  sup-
ported and, in fact, initiated the action at the North Pacific Council 
to  close  the  waters  of  the  U.S.  EEZ  north  of  the  Bering  Straits  to 
all commercial fishing until we understood better the effects of cli-
mate  change  and  had  a  fishery  management  plan  in  place  so  that 
we  would  go  up  there  if  fisheries  opened  up  in  an  orderly,  bio-
logically  sustainable  manner  and  a  way  that  was  respectful  to  the 
people and the resources of the Arctic Ocean. 

We believe that same policy needs to carry forward and that the 
United  States  needs  to  go  and  push  very  aggressively  with  our— 
at least our two closest Arctic neighbors, Canada and Russia, bilat-
erally—initially  bilaterally  and  get  those  two  countries  to  support 
a  similar  kind  of  policy  within  their  own  waters  and  then  to  work 
with  us  and  with  yourself  to  close  the  major  part  of  the  Arctic 
Basin. 

Ambassador  Balton  referred  to  what  is  going  on  in  the  Atlantic 
and that there are fisheries there that are technically in the Arctic. 
They  are  above  the  Arctic  Circle,  but  it  is  a  very  different  world 
over  there,  very  different  than  what  it  is  off  of  Alaska  and  Russia 
and Canada and very different than the world that is in the major 
part of the Arctic Basin in the international waters. 

If  those  waters  open  up  or  there  are  ways  for  vessels  from  the 
Atlantic  or  from  other  countries  to  come  into  the  Arctic  Basin  be-
cause  of  sea  ice  retreat,  then  that  is  going  to  have  a  dramatic  ef-
fect.  And  if  we  don’t  have  controls  on  that  ahead  of  time,  we  are 
going to be facing a situation that is going to be just like what we 
had  in  the  Bering  Sea  Donut  Hole  with  fleets  of  Japan  and  China 
and  Korea  and  Poland  were  fishing.  They  were  authorized.  They 
weren’t  IUU  fishing.  They  were  authorized  by  their  countries,  but 
they  overfished  those  stocks  very  much  to  the  detriment  of  Alas-
kans,  to  the  United  States,  and  to  the  resources  of  that  region.  So 
I think we really need to pursue that, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

With  regard  to  the  North  Pacific,  there  are  initiatives  to  deal 
with bottom fisheries on the seamounts in the northwest North Pa-
cific.  We  think  that  that  is  appropriate,  but  we  don’t  think  it  goes 
far enough. And frankly, it is somewhat disappointing the approach 
that the United States has taken in that regard. 

The—if  you  look  back  at  some  of  the  history  that  I  was  men-
tioning just a moment ago, we, working with you and working with 
State,  made  major  changes  in  North  Pacific  waters,  and  the  idea 
actually  was  that  we  should  have  a  comprehensive  single  inter-
national organization and series of institutions that were all coordi-
nated,  from  Asia  to  North  America.  And  choose  your  southern 
boundary, but at the time, we were looking at 33 degrees north and 
anything  north  of  there.  And  that  such  an  institutional  arrange-
ment should deal with all species and all fisheries. 

The  North  Pacific  Anadromous  Fish  Convention  and  the  Com-
mission  that  it  spawned  was  intended  to,  at  least  for  a  while,  fill 
that  role,  and  it  has  provisions  in  that  convention  to  do  that.  The 
United States has chosen to go down a different path and deal with 
just the northwestern Pacific Ocean for the time being. 

We  believe—and  I  note  that  you  sent  a  letter  to  Secretary  Rice 
last  fall  stating  that  there  should  be  a  comprehensive  treaty,  and 
we  agree  with  that.  We  think  that  such  a  comprehensive  treaty 
needs  to  be  simple  in  structure.  We  don’t  want  something  com-
plicated. We don’t need to create a new organization. We can use— 
to  the  extent  possible,  we  can  use  existing  international  instru-
ments to achieve that goal. 

A  good  example  is  the  enforcement  arrangements  that  Admiral 
Brooks  was  referring  to.  It  is  one  of  the  models  for  the  world  on 
how  international  enforcement  cooperation  can  proceed.  We  don’t 
want  to  disrupt  that.  We  want  to  maximize  the  benefits  we  get 
from that and use it better. 

We believe that such a new international instrument should pro-
hibit  new  fisheries  in  the  North  Pacific—not  just  bottom  fisheries, 
all  fisheries—until  such  time  as  there  is  a  management  plan  in 
place  to  manage  those  fisheries  and  that  they  develop  again  in  an 
orderly manner. 

And finally, Mr. Chairman, and this is perhaps a bit of a touchy 
subject. But we really believe that such a new international instru-
ment  needs  to  avoid  the  use  of  big,  ill-defined  terms  and  prin-
ciples—the  over  application  of  principles  that  perhaps  we  would 
not  apply  inside  our  own  waters.  We  should  be  promoting  sound 
management  practices  like  we  do  in  the  North  Pacific,  but  we 
should not try and impose on the high seas a lot of rhetorical prin-
ciples  that  aren’t  necessarily  going  to  get  us  there.  And  problems 
with  some  of  the  language  that  is  in  some  of  the  instruments  that 
have  been  discussed  these  days  has  actually  driven  wedges  be-
tween interests that should be natural allies. 

Those  successes  that  we  had  in  the  North  Pacific  in  the  1980s 
and  1990s  came  about  because  the  seafood  industry,  this  Com-
mittee,  NOAA,  and  the  Department  of  State  worked  together  very 
well. The environmental interests that Ms. Speer represents got in-
volved as well, and we were all able to work together because there 
was a good working relationship. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Adherence to rhetorical stances on some of the principles is going 
to get in the way of that unless we figure out how to work together. 
NOAA and Department of State need to forge the kinds of working 
relationships with the seafood industry, environmental interests so 
that  we  can  all  have  a  good,  strong  U.S.  presence  and  make  the 
success  work  that  you  are  trying  to  achieve  and  we  see  that  we 
need. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. This concludes my statement. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Benton follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID BENTON, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

MARINE CONSERVATION ALLIANCE 

Introduction 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for this opportunity to testify before you today regard-
ing  management  of  international  fisheries,  including  the  problem  of  illegal,  unre-
ported,  and  unregulated  (IUU)  fisheries,  and  the  need  to  improve  conservation  and 
management of marine resources on the high seas. 

My name is David Benton. I am the Executive Director for the Marine Conserva-
tion Alliance, based in Juneau Alaska. The MCA is a coalition of seafood harvesters, 
processors, coastal communities, Community Development Quota organizations, and 
others  interested  in  and  dependent  upon  the  groundfish  and  shellfish  fisheries  off 
Alaska.  Taken  together,  the  membership  of  the  MCA  represents  about  70  percent 
of the harvesting and processing of groundfish and shellfish off Alaska. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Alaska  has  high  stakes  in  the  successful  implementation  of  prac-

tical, effective management regimes on the high seas of the North Pacific. 

Alaska produces roughly half of the Nation’s commercial fisheries landings by vol-
ume and almost one third of the total value. The value of Alaska’s seafood products 
ranges  between  $3–4  billion  annually,  and  the  industry  employs  roughly  50,000 
workers.  If  Alaska  were  an  independent  nation,  it  would  rank  9th  among  seafood 
producing countries. 

Most importantly, the majority of our coastal communities are built around a fish-
eries based economy, and without a stable fishery resource base many of these com-
munities  would  not  exist.  It  is  because  of  this  dependence  upon  the  sea  and  its  re-
sources  that  Alaskans  work  hard  to  ensure  that  conservation  comes  first,  and  that 
fishery resources are managed for their long term sustainability. 

The record speaks for itself. There are no overfished stocks of groundfish in Alas-
ka.  Fisheries  are  managed  under  hard  caps  and  close  when  harvest  limits  are 
reached. Federal observers and Vessel Monitoring Systems (VMS) monitor the catch 
to ensure compliance with closures. Ecosystem considerations are taken into account 
in fishery management plans. For example, fishing on forage fish species is prohib-
ited,  and  measures  are  in  place  to  protect  marine  mammals  and  seabirds.  Close  to 
500,000 square nautical miles are closed to bottom trawling or other fishing to pro-
tect marine habitat. The North Pacific Fishery Management Council is also working 
on  measures  to  close  the  U.S.  Arctic  EEZ  to  commercial  fishing  until  the  effects  of 
climate  change  are  better  understood  and  appropriate  fishery  management  plans 
are developed. Taken together, the total for existing closures plus the Arctic waters 
off  Alaska  would  be  approximately  650,000  square  nautical  miles,  an  area  roughly 
5 times the size of the entire U.S. National Park system. 

It  is  this  record  that  caused  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  to  cite  Alaska 

as a potential model for the rest of the Nation. 

But the success of Alaska has not only been a result of how we manage fisheries 
within  our  own  waters,  but  has  also  required  diligent  action  in  the  international 
arena  to  ensure  that  marine  resources  are  protected  throughout  the  North  Pacific. 
Alaska  has  no  common  border  with  the  rest  of  the  United  States.  Rather,  Alaska 
is bounded on one side by the U.S. Canada international boundary, and on the other 
side with one of the world’s longest contiguous maritime boundaries, the U.S. Russia 
maritime  boundary.  However,  most  of  the  waters  off  Alaska  are  bounded  by  inter-
national waters of the North Pacific and Arctic oceans, and the international waters 
of the Bering Sea known as the donut hole. Living marine resources do not respect 
political  boundaries,  and  the  fish,  marine  mammals,  seabirds  and  other  resources 
important to Alaska range across all of these boundaries. 

This  fact  of  geography  has  dictated  that  Alaska  needs  to  be  deeply  involved  in 

international fisheries issues to protect its resources and its interests. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A Brief Historical Overview 

42 

For  Alaska,  foreign  fleets  have  long  played  a  major  role  in  the  fisheries  off  our 
shores.  Following  the  end  of  WWII  and  up  to  1976,  foreign  fishing  vessels  domi-
nated  the  waters  of  the  North  Pacific  and  Bering  Sea.  Fleets  from  Japan,  Korea, 
China,  Poland  and  the  Soviet  Union  came  here  for  salmon,  crab,  and  groundfish. 
For the most part, the only check on these fleets was the 12 mile limit, and for some 
countries  the  International  North  Pacific  Fisheries  Convention  (INPFC)  which  at-
tempted to control some of these fisheries. 

In  1976,  Congress  passed  the  law  we  now  know  as  the  Magnuson  Stevens  Act 
(MSA).  The  MSA  was  part  of  a  worldwide  shift  toward  coastal  state  management 
of  fishery  resources.  A  lot  has  been  written  about  the  period  immediately  following 
passage of the MSA. It was one of dynamic change, with the elimination of the for-
eign fleets operating within 200 miles of our coast, and the subsequent development 
of the U.S. domestic fishing fleet. 

But,  as  these  dramatic  changes  were  taking  place  within  the  U.S.  200  mile  zone, 
dramatic changes were also taking place on the high seas. Alaska watched with in-
creasing  alarm  the  unregulated  growth  of  international  fleets,  and  their  impact  on 
the conservation of a wide range of living marine resources. 

To  put  this  into  perspective,  we  have  to  look  at  what  was  going  on  in  North  Pa-
cific  on  the  high  seas  in  the  mid  1980s.  Despite  efforts  throughout  the  1960s  and 
1970s  to  control  and  eliminate  high  seas  fishing  for  salmon,  Japan  still  had  a  fleet 
of around 300 vessels using large scale driftnets fishing for salmon on the high seas 
beyond our EEZ as well as within the U.S. 200 mile zone. This fishery was author-
ized  by  the  INPFC,  a  treaty  between  Canada,  Japan,  and  the  U.S.  At  the  same 
time,  Japan’s  high  seas  salmon  fleets  were  also  fishing  for  salmon  in  waters  adja-
cent  to,  and  inside  the  Soviet  Union’s  200  mile  zone  under  a  separate  agreement. 
Meanwhile,  another  fleet  of  high  seas  driftnet  vessels  was  taking  shape,  with  no 
international controls whatsoever. Originating from Japan, Korea, and Taiwan these 
fleets totaled roughly 1500 vessels fishing in the North Pacific between Hawaii and 
the  Aleutians.  These  vessels  fished  for  squid  and  other  species  in  the  north  during 
our  summer,  and  moved  to  the  southern  hemisphere  in  the  winter  to  fish  for  tuna. 
In  the  North  Pacific  these  vessels  were  fishing  an  estimated  30,000  miles  of  net  a 
night, with attendant high bycatches of non-target fish as well as hundreds of thou-
sands of marine mammals and seabirds, and thousands of sea turtles. 

At the same time, a little further north, in the international waters of the Bering 
Sea,  fleets  of  large  factory  trawlers  from  Japan,  Poland,  China  and  Korea  began 
fishing  hard  for  pollock.  These  vessels  were  hugging  the  line  off  both  the  Soviet 
Union  and  the  U.S.  maritime  boundary.  The  pace  of  fishing  in  the  so  called  ‘‘donut 
hole’’  caused  great  concern  among  both  U.S.  and  Soviet  scientists,  who  were  pre-
dicting that these stocks would be drastically overfished in a short timeframe. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  while  the  fisheries  inside  the  U.S.  200  mile  zone  were  under-
going  dramatic  changes  with  attendant  conservation  benefits,  fisheries  in  inter-
national  waters  were  growing  dramatically  and  most  of  them  were  totally  unregu-
lated  or  governed  by  the  weak  rules  of  the  INPFC.  The  high  seas  driftnet  fisheries 
were  intercepting  large  numbers  of  salmon  and  decimating  seabirds  and  marine 
mammals. The donut hole fisheries were overfishing Aleutian Basin pollock and pos-
ing a major enforcement problem for the U.S., and the INPFC provided no effective 
monitoring  and  enforcement  mechanism.  By  all  appearances,  there  was  little  or  no 
chance to get control of these fisheries or mitigating the damages they were inflict-
ing on our fisheries or the resources of the North Pacific. 

But, through the leadership of this Committee, and especially Senator Stevens of 

Alaska and yourself Mr. Chairman, we began to make progress. 

Through your hard work, Congress passed several important pieces of legislation, 
including the Driftnet Act, the Anti-Reflagging Act, and legislation establishing the 
Bering  Sea  Fisheries  Advisory  Body  (BSFAB)  which  is  charged  with  providing  ad-
vice  to  the  Department  of  State  on  U.S./Russian  fisheries  issues.  Establishing  the 
BSFAB proved pivotal. President Gorbachev had come into power in the USSR, and 
relations began to thaw. The two rivals were searching for common ground, and one 
thing  the  two  super  powers  had  in  common  was  one  of  the  world’s  longest  contin-
uous maritime boundaries, and important fisheries in the North Pacific and Bering 
Sea that were being decimated by foreign fleets that were operating off their shores. 
The  doors  were  open  for  effective  cooperation.  Through  the  BSFAB  and  the  joint 
U.S./Russian fisheries agreement, the United States and Russia initiated several ac-
tions  to  address  fishery  conservation  issues  of  mutual  concern.  This  joint  effort  co-
ordinated  negotiations  at  bi-lateral  and  multi-lateral  treaty  talks  including  at  the 
U.N. 

The  result  was  impressive.  Over  a  period  of  just  a  few  years  several  new  inter-
national  treaties  were  put  in  place.  Through  the  urging  of  this  Committee  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

United States engaged in a major initiative to eliminate high seas driftnets. The re-
sult  was  the  U.N.  moratorium  banning  high  seas  driftnet  fishing  worldwide,  thus 
prohibiting  the  most  destructive  fishing  practice  employed  on  the  high  seas.  The 
INPFC  was  disbanded,  and  the  new  North  Pacific  Anadromous  Fish  Convention 
(NPAFC)  was  put  in  place.  The  NPAFC  prohibited  fishing  for  salmon  on  the  high 
seas of the North Pacific, included provisions to conserve ecologically related species, 
and  established  a  comprehensive  international  research  program.  The  NPAFC  also 
charted new ground on international fisheries enforcement. For the first time, major 
ocean powers moved from strict flag state enforcement to a cooperative enforcement 
regime. The original parties to the NPAFC are Japan, Canada, Russia, and the U.S. 
The  cooperative  enforcement  agreements  facilitate  joint  enforcement  actions  be-
tween  the  four  original  parties,  and  provide  an  effective  shield  for  marine  resource 
protection.  China  and  the  Republic  of  Korea  are  now  participants  as  well,  further 
strengthening these enforcement arrangements. 

In  addition,  the  Central  Bering  Sea  ‘‘donut  hole’’  was  closed  and  a  new  treaty 
adopted  by  Russia,  the  U.S.,  Japan,  Korea,  China,  and  Poland.  This  treaty  mirrors 
many  of  the  provisions  of  the  NPAFC,  including  most  importantly  the  enforcement 
provisions.  The  U.N.  also  adopted  the  Fish  Stocks  Agreement  to  implement  certain 
provisions of the U.N. Law of the Sea; and the U.S. and Russia adopted several bi-
lateral  agreements  including  an  agreement  to  protect  each  nation’s  salmon  within 
their  respective  200  mile  zones.  To  strengthen  international  cooperation  for  marine 
science, PICES was adopted, establishing a major new international science organi-
zation devoted to addressing marine science in the North Pacific. 

Taken together, the entire international fishery management regime in the North 
Pacific  was  rewritten  during  this  timeframe.  Every  treaty  now  in  place,  with  the 
exception  of  the  halibut  treaty  between  the  U.S.  and  Canada,  was  written  during 
this  period.  This  includes  the  Pacific  Salmon  Treaty  between  the  U.S.  and  Canada, 
the  U.S.  Russia  bilateral  agreement  on  fisheries  cooperation,  the  United  Nation’s 
moratorium  on  High  Seas  Driftnets,  the  U.N.  Fish  Stocks  Agreement,  the  Central 
Bering Sea Pollock Convention (aka the Donut Hole Convention), the PICES conven-
tion, and the North Pacific Anadromous Fish Convention (NPAFC). 

These successes could not have come about except for the very good working rela-
tionship between the seafood industry, the Department of State, and the leadership 
of the Congress. They are the result of forward thinking leaders, applying practical 
solutions  to  real  world  problems.  With  the  exception  of  rogue  vessels  fishing  ille-
gally, the high seas driftnet fleets are now gone from North Pacific waters. The high 
seas  directed  salmon  fishery  is  terminated,  and  the  donut  hole  trawl  fleets  are  no 
more.  Joint  enforcement  by  the  major  ocean  powers  of  the  region  are  a  model  for 
international cooperation. A new multi-national science program is providing sound 
scientific advice to fishery managers including important new insights into the chal-
lenges facing the marine environment. These new institutions, and their actions, are 
in  turn  providing  major  conservation  benefits  for  the  fish,  seabirds,  marine  mam-
mals and other components of the North Pacific and Bering Sea ecosystems. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  Committee,  and  especially  you  and  Senator  Stevens,  should 
take  pride  in  what  has  been  accomplished.  But  this  is  not  to  say  that  all  is  well 
on  the  high  seas,  and  that  there  are  no  problems  facing  us  in  our  quest  to  ensure 
that  North  Pacific  resources  are  protected  and  conserved.  We  all  know  that  serious 
challenges exist, and once again we need your help and leadership to chart a course 
for effective action. 
The Challenges Ahead 

Mr.  Chairman,  there  is  a  need  to  renew  our  commitment  to  taking  action  to  ad-
dress  real  world  problems  on  the  high  seas.  For  example,  despite  the  U.N.  morato-
rium  on  high  seas  driftnets  and  the  multi-lateral  enforcement  shield  that  exists  in 
the  North  Pacific,  there  is  a  significant  resurgence  of  high  seas  driftnet  fisheries. 
These are the ultimate IUU operations. They are outlawed by the U.N. moratorium, 
the  NPAFC,  and  the  national  laws  and  regulations  of  most  of  the  major  nations 
around the North Pacific rim. The treaties and laws are already in place prohibiting 
these  operations,  but  the  resources  are  not  there  to  effectively  police  such  a  vast 
area of the ocean. 

Similarly, while the Central Bering Sea is now closed to pollock fishing, maintain-
ing  our  enforcement  presence  along  the  U.S./Russian  maritime  boundary  is  taxing 
our enforcement capability. The distribution of Bering Sea fishery resources appears 
to  be  changing,  and  our  scientific,  monitoring,  and  enforcement  programs  will  all 
need  to  adapt  to  these  new  realities  The  prospect  of  loss  of  sea  ice  due  to  global 
climate  change  is  forcing  the  United  States  to  reassess  its  Arctic  policies  and  man-
agement capabilities in light emerging new international challenges. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

There are also problems with new and emerging fisheries further south. Fisheries 
on  the  seamounts  north  and  west  of  the  Hawaiian  Islands  raise  conservation  con-
cerns.  Application  of  measures  inside  our  zone  to  protect  sea  turtles  and  seabirds 
are placing U.S. fishermen at a disadvantage because similar measures are not ap-
plied  to  foreign  fisheries  operating  on  the  high  seas.  The  growth  of  the  Chinese 
economy  and  the  economies  of  Southeast  Asia  are  placing  new  pressures  on  North 
Pacific resources as demand for seafood increases in those regions. 

All  of  these  problems  argue  for  a  comprehensive  solution.  But  to  be  successful, 
that  solution  needs  to  be  simple,  practical  and  focused.  We  believe  that  this  could 
be  accomplished  using  existing  international  institutions  and  arrangements.  The 
U.S. Government would need to take the lead on such an initiative, with additional 
resources  to  ensure  adequate  funding  for  the  science,  monitoring,  and  enforcement 
programs that will be needed to ensure success. 

Another  option  would  be  a  new  Regional  Fishery  Management  Organization 
(RFMO) for the North Pacific. Ongoing talks regarding the northwest Pacific Ocean 
could  provide  a  valuable  opportunity  to  develop  a  long  term  agreement  for  such  an 
RFMO.  But  to  be  successful,  the  U.S.  needs  to  set  out  a  proposal  that  is  simple  in 
structure,  clear  in  its  intent,  and  cost  effective.  It  needs  to  focus  on  the  problems 
of  clearly  identifying  what  constitutes  IUU  fishing,  and  will  need  to  seek  coordina-
tion or integration with existing international institutions. 

The  U.S.  Government  may  wish  to  pursue  such  a  course  of  action.  If  that  is  the 
case,  then  there  are  certain  principles  which  we  believe  should  guide  U.S.  policy, 
and  our  support  for  such  an  approach  is  conditioned  on  U.S.  application  of  these 
principles.  If  the  U.S.  adheres  to  these  concepts,  then  we  believe  that  several  U.S. 
interests,  including  both  the  seafood  industry  and  the  environmental  lobby,  could 
come  together  in  support  of  a  new  agreement  covering  the  high  seas  of  the  entire 
North Pacific from Asia to North America. 

We  believe  it  important  that  the  new  agreement  be  simple  in  structure,  and  not 
result  in  creation  of  yet  another  international  bureaucracy.  There  are  several  mod-
els  for  such  an  agreement,  and  they  have  proven  cost  effective,  efficient,  and  suc-
cessful at achieving their conservation and management objectives. 

The new agreement should provide a mechanism to develop a registry of existing 
fisheries, fishing vessels and their owners, and the management measures currently 
in  place  that  govern  those  fisheries.  This  would  include  fisheries  under  existing 
international agreements including any interim measures where formal agreements 
are not yet in place. 

The  new  agreement  should  then  prohibit  any  new  fisheries  in  the  North  Pacific 
unless  a  management  plan  has  been  developed  and  approved  by  the  parties.  New 
fisheries would be authorized, and placed on the registry, once a management plan 
is  reviewed  and  approved.  Management  plans  should  include  provisions  for  observ-
ers, VMS, harvest limits, bycatch controls, or other management measures as appro-
priate to the fishery. 

The new agreement should recognize existing international agreements and man-
agement regimes, and minimize disruption to those arrangements. Existing fisheries 
operating  under  current  agreements  would  continue  to  be  regulated  by  such  ar-
rangements.  Where  there  are  existing  international  agreements  that  might  author-
ize  a  fishery  in  the  future  (i.e.  Central  Bering  Sea  Pollock  convention)  that  treaty 
would control how such a fishery might occur. 

The  new  agreement  should  also  have  clear  rules  for  new  entrants  into  a  fishery. 
In some instances, U.S. vessels have refrained from fishing on the high seas in com-
pliance  with  U.S.  policy  while  foreign  fleets  have  continued  to  fish.  In  such  in-
stances,  opportunity  should  be  provided  for  U.S.  fishermen  to  participate  in  high 
seas  fisheries,  with  appropriate  conservation  and  management  measures  in  place. 
This is necessary in order to level the playing field. 

Fisheries  not  on  the  registry  or  not  governed  by  an  existing  international  agree-
ment  would  be  defined  as  IUU.  This  would  greatly  simplify  enforcement  and  allow 
for efficient use of monitoring and enforcement assets for such a wide area. Enforce-
ment regimes under the new agreement should build upon and compliment existing 
international cooperative enforcement arrangements. 

And  finally,  the  new  agreement  should,  as  a  general  matter,  encompass  manage-
ment requirements similar to those we would employ in our own waters. The agree-
ment must avoid the use of ill defined terms, or the over-application of vague prin-
ciples such as the precautionary principle. It should be clear at the outset about the 
conservation  goals  for  habitat  protection.  In  our  view,  the  new  agreement  should 
mirror the recently revised MSA, and identify the bottom habitats that need protec-
tion as seamounts, hydrothermal vents, and unique or rare concentrations of corals. 
We  also  believe  that  the  United  States  needs  to  make  a  clear  statement  that  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

intent is for an agreement that recognizes the need for sustainable fisheries to meet 
the growing need for seafood products worldwide. 

Many  of  these  principles  were  outlined  last  fall  by  Senator  Stevens  in  a  letter 
dated  October  19,  2007,  to  Secretary  Rice,  and  we  wish  to  go  on  record  in  support 
of the framework he proposed for a new RFMO in the North Pacific. 

A related matter centers around the work of the U.N. Food and Agriculture Orga-
nization (FAO) on guidelines for management of deep sea fisheries in the high seas. 
The  draft  guidelines  are  intended  identify  characteristics  of  appropriate  manage-
ment  tools,  reporting  requirements,  enforcement  protocols,  and  other  proposed 
measures  for  the  management  of  these  fisheries.  However,  these  guidelines  spend 
a  lot  of  time  trying  to  identify  what  constitutes  ‘‘vulnerable  marine  ecosystems’’ 
(VMEs) and how to determine ‘‘significant adverse impacts’’ to these VMEs. 

To date, the United States has focused most of its efforts on the question of defin-
ing  VMEs  and  criteria  for  determining  significant  adverse  impacts,  and  less  time 
on  the  other  fundamentals  necessary  for  management  of  these  high  seas  fisheries. 
Unfortunately,  the  draft  guidelines  stray  far  from  some  of  the  principles  identified 
above,  employing  vague  references  to  the  need  to  protect  biodiversity,  or  the  overly 
broad  application  of  the  precautionary  principle.  The  guidelines  also  go  far  beyond 
the  guidance  found  in  the  MSA  that  identifies  seamounts,  hydrothermal  vents  and 
concentrations  of  cold  water  corals  as  the  bottom  habitats  to  be  protected.  We  be-
lieve that these guidelines will serve a more practical and useful purpose if the lan-
guage  is  focused  more  on  managing  deep  sea  fisheries  on  the  high  seas,  and  less 
on  the  use  of  vague  principles  that  are  subject  to  wildly  differing  interpretations. 
Effective  management  of  these  deep  sea  fisheries  is  a  critical  issue  that  needs 
careful  attention.  Much  work  remains  to  tighten  these  guidelines,  to  make  them 
practical and concise, and thereby produce a useful product. As such, we recommend 
that  the  United  States  support  provisions  in  these  guidelines  that  mirror  language 
in the MSA, and work to craft practical and effective guidelines for managing these 
fisheries.  The  United  States  should  also  ensure  that  the  guidelines  do  not  include 
any provisions that suggest that these measures should be enforced or applied with 
the  200  mile  zone.  Language  still  remains  in  the  draft  that  cause  concerns  in  this 
regard. 

An  additional  area  of  interest  to  Alaska  is  the  fate  of  the  high  Arctic,  and  how 
to  address  and  adapt  to  the  rapidly  changing  conditions  there  due  to  climate  im-
pacts. 

In recognition of the challenges posed by the projected loss of sea ice in the waters 
north of Bering Strait, the North Pacific Fishery Management Council, at the urging 
of the seafood industry, began a process to close U.S. Federal waters to commercial 
fishing.  The  closure  would  be  in  place  until  we  better  understand  the  effects  of  cli-
mate change on the marine environment of the Arctic, and appropriate fishery man-
agement  plans  have  been  developed.  We  believe  that  such  action  is  warranted  in 
order to protect the marine resources of our Arctic waters as well as the way of life 
of the small villages and communities along Alaska’s Arctic shores. 

Last  year,  Senate  Joint  Resolution  17  was  introduced,  calling  for  the  United 
States to seek international agreements mirroring the action being taken in the Arc-
tic by the North Pacific Fishery Management Council. MCA supports the action you 
have  taken  with  the  resolution,  and  hopes  that  the  U.S.  Government  will  actively 
pursue  such  agreements  with  our  Arctic  neighbors.  Marine  resources  in  the  Arctic, 
as  in  the  waters  of  the  North  Pacific,  do  not  respect  political  boundaries.  Effective 
conservation and management needs to be coordinated throughout the Arctic basin. 
To this end, we urge the Committee to continue in your efforts to get the U.S. Gov-
ernment to take a lead in such an initiative. 

As  a  final  matter,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  enter  a  note  of  caution  as  we 
pursue  initiatives  to  address  international  fisheries  issues,  recognizing  that  some-
times the law of unintended consequences comes into play. For example, the United 
States is involved in work at the World Trade Organization to use WTO authorities 
to  prohibit  certain  fishery  subsidies  to  control  IUU  fishing  and  to  reduce  the 
unsustainable level of fishing capacity in worldwide fleets. There should be no ques-
tion  that  such  subsidies  are  causing  significant  problems  in  many  parts  of  the 
world,  and  action  needs  to  be  taken  to  address  these  problems.  However,  while 
these are laudable goals, some provisions in the current draft proposals could be in-
terpreted  to  prohibit  U.S.  investment  in  ports  and  harbors  upgrades,  or  improve-
ments in fish landing or processing facilities, or the reconstruction or new construc-
tion  to  replace  aging  vessels  in  the  U.S.  fleet.  None  of  these  have  anything  to  do 
with either IUU fishing or overcapitalization of international fisheries, and the U.S. 
should  exercise  careful  judgment  when  negotiating  such  provisions  to  ensure  that 
the measures are specific to the problem to be addressed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

Application of port state measures to address IUU fisheries, including service ves-
sels,  can  also  have  unintended  consequences  for  the  U.S.  seafood  industry.  Use  of 
service vessels to transport seafood products legally caught in U.S. waters can have 
dire  economic  consequences  if,  unbeknownst  to  the  U.S.  companies  who  employ 
these  vessels,  the  vessels  are  blacklisted  by  other  nations  for  being  associated  with 
IUU fishing. Shipments of legal product can be seized while in transit, costing time 
and  money  if  not  the  loss  of  the  product  itself.  Similarly,  the  European  Union  is 
developing  port  state  measures  that  may  raise  ‘‘equal  treatment’’  questions  under 
world trade rules as well as resulting in a cumbersome and expensive chain of cus-
tody  process.  This  could  negatively  affect  U.S.  trade  with  the  EU,  and  we  need  to 
work closely with our trading partners to ensure that such unintended consequences 
are avoided. We appreciate that NOAA and the Dept. of State are working to resolve 
these  issues,  but  meanwhile  U.S.  seafood  companies  are  in  a  state  of  limbo  regard-
ing the rules and how they may be enforced. 

Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today. 

I will be happy to answer any questions. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Next  up,  Mr.  Cook.  James  Cook,  President,  Pacific  Ocean  Pro-

ducers. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES COOK, VICE PRESIDENT, 

PACIFIC OCEAN PRODUCERS, LLC 

Mr.  COOK.  Good  morning,  Senator  Stevens.  Aloha  from  Hawaii. 
My name is Jim Cook. I was born and raised in Hawaii and have 
participated  in  various  aspects  of  commercial  fishing  for  the  past 
40  years.  My  testimony  today  will  focus  on  the  management  and 
enforcement of tuna fisheries in the Pacific. 

The  major  tuna  species  are  considered  highly  migratory,  and  for 
that reason, tuna is managed by RFMOs. The ability of the RFMOs 
in  the  Pacific  to  manage  these  resources  is  far  from  reality.  In  the 
western and central Pacific, tuna and billfish are managed through 
the  Western  and  Central  Pacific  Fisheries  Commission  and  in  the 
eastern  Pacific  by  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Commission. 
Bigeye tuna have been determined to be experiencing overfishing 
in both the western, central Pacific and the eastern Pacific. Fishery 
scientists  have  recommended  a  25  percent  reduction  in  fishing.  To 
date,  neither  the  WCPFC  or  the  IATTC  have  been  able  to  reach 
consensus  on  measures  to  end  bigeye  overfishing.  Competing  eco-
nomic interests between distant water fishing fleets of Asian, U.S., 
and  European  nations  versus  the  independent  Pacific  island  coun-
tries  that  grant  access  rights  to  fish  in  their  EEZs  has  precluded 
any meaningful conservation for bigeye. 

Longliners for fishing for bigeye target large adult fish. They are 
valuable  in  sushi  and  sashimi  markets  around  the  world.  Purse 
seiners do not target bigeye, but incidentally catch them when tar-
geting  skipjack  and  yellowfin  for  the  canned  tuna  market.  Bigeye 
catches  from  purse  seiners  have  risen  dramatically  over  the  past 
decade  due  to  increased  purse  seine  sets  using  deeper  nets  on  fish 
aggregation  devices,  which  attract  juvenile  bigeye,  yellowfin,  skip-
jack as well as other marine bycatch species. 

In order to properly manage the resource, there needs to be accu-
rate  and  timely  catch  reports  by  member  nations,  a  cap  on  the 
number  of  longliners  authorized  to  fish  in  the  western  and  central 
Pacific,  and  effective  FAD  management  programs  for  purse  seine 
fisheries. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

In  2006,  the  western  and  central  Pacific  fisheries  requirement— 
excuse  me,  organization  required  all  members  to  develop  manage-
ment plans for the use of fish aggregation devices on the high seas. 
To  date,  only  Papua  New  Guinea  has  a  plan,  and  the  U.S.  should 
comply with this measure as soon as possible. 

To  address  capacity  issues  in  the  western  and  central  Pacific, 
vessels authorized to fish in the convention area need to be strictly 
regulated  within  the  economic  zones  of  member  nations  as  well  as 
on the high seas. Conservation and management measures require 
that total levels of fishing effort for bigeye and yellowfin tuna shall 
not be increased beyond current levels. However, there are already 
too  many  fishing  vessels,  and  new  vessels  are  being  built  that  are 
larger and more efficient. 

Another management issue involves the bycatch of marine mam-
mals, sea turtles, and sea birds. Since 1996 reauthorization of Mag-
nuson,  the  Western  Pacific  Fisheries  Management  Council  has  im-
plemented an effective bycatch reduction program. Key bird mitiga-
tions  have  reduced  sea  bird  bycatch  in  the  Hawaii  longline  fishery 
from thousands of sea birds annually to less than 100 per year. Re-
duction in sea turtle bycatch have also been realized, 90 percent re-
duction  in  loggerhead  and  87  percent  in  leatherback  sea  turtle 
interactions. 

Based  on  these  successes,  the  council  has  been  working  actively 
to  promote  these  measures  in  the  international  arena,  sponsoring 
a series of international fisheries forums and sea turtle workshops. 
Hawaii’s  longline  fishermen  have  been  active  participants  in  these 
efforts and have worked to engage foreign fishermen. 

Our  bycatch  measures  in  the  RFMOs  have  made  little  progress 
during  this  time.  Enforcement  issues  in  the  western  and  central 
Pacific  involve  a  lack  of  adequate  monitoring,  flag  of  convenience, 
at-sea  transshipment,  inadequate  port  State  measure,  catch  docu-
mentation, and loopholes for vessels having access agreements with 
island nations. 

While  effort  has  been  made  to  resolve  these  issues,  implementa-
tion is still far from a reality. A major problem facing small island 
nations  is  the  lack  of  enforcement  assets  to  patrol  their  economic 
zones.  The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  faces  similar  challenges  as  effective 
monitoring  of  the  U.S.  economic  zone  in  the  region,  especially  the 
Pacific island remote areas, requires significant resources. 

The U.S. economic zone around the remote areas is subject to il-
legal  fishing  by  foreign  vessels.  Recent  cases  involve  two  Ecua-
dorian-flagged  purse  seine  vessels  caught  fishing  illegally  in  the 
U.S.  EEZ  around  Howland,  Baker,  and  Jarvis  Islands.  The  U.S. 
Coast Guard needs more resources and assets to effectively monitor 
the U.S. economic zone in the western and central Pacific. 

The  reauthorization  added  a  provision  that  requires  all  fishing 
vessels without vessel monitoring systems transiting the U.S. EEZ 
seaward  of  Hawaii  and  the  Northern  Marianas,  American  Samoa, 
Guam, and the remote island areas to notify the Coast Guard with 
name  of  the  vessel,  flag  State,  location,  and  destination.  Congress 
intended  this  provision  to  require  notification  because  effective 
monitoring of the economic zone around the remote U.S. territories 
takes  nearly  daily  flyovers.  Unfortunately,  this  provision  has  not 
been enacted because of conflict with international law. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

Fisheries  observers  are  a  major  component  of  effective  moni-
toring.  At  the  last  WCPFC  meeting,  it  was  agreed  that  the  ob-
server  program  would  be  initiated  in  2008,  starting  with  national 
observer  programs  with  5  percent  coverage.  There  has  been  major 
resistance on this measure. 

Vessel  monitoring  systems  are  another  important  enforcement 
tool. Although the WCPFC conservation and management measure 
require  VMS  on  all  vessels  that  are  authorized  to  fish  in  the  area, 
the  VMS  program  and  implementing  details  have  yet  to  be  agreed 
on,  and  significant  work  needs  to  be  done  before  VMS  is  applied 
evenly  throughout  the  region.  The  Western  Pacific  Council  man-
dated the use of this equipment in 1991. 

At-sea  transshipment  is  a  major  concern  because  it  can  avoid 
port  State  monitoring,  and  catch  documentation  is  often  lacking. 
At-sea transshipment is prohibitive for purse seiners. However, at- 
sea  transshipment  remains  a  practice  for  large-scale  longline  ves-
sels. 

The  Hawaiian-American  Samoa  longline  fleets  combine  the  larg-
est  domestic  industrial  fleet  in  the  western  and  central  Pacific. 
These are model fisheries, employing high observer coverage, vessel 
monitoring system, limited entry programs, spatial management to 
minimize fisheries interactions, and innovative turtle and sea catch 
bycatch reduction methods. The Hawaii fishery was recently evalu-
ated and found to be 94 percent complaint with the United Nations 
Code for the Conduct of Responsible Fisheries. 

Responsible, well-managed fisheries can also be profitable. Hono-
lulu  was  ranked  fourth  nationally  in  2006  with  $54  million  worth 
of  landed  value,  and  in  2007,  the  value  of  landed  fish  in  Hawaii 
exceeded $71 million. 

Overall,  I  believe  the  Department  of  State,  the  National  Marine 
Fisheries Service, and the Coast Guard are working well on imple-
menting  the  international  provisions  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Re-
authorization  Act.  For  these  agencies,  it  is  often  a  tiring  and  frus-
trating  experience.  They  deserve  our  appreciation  and  financial 
support.  The  focus  on  IUU  fishing  is  important  but  pales  in  com-
parison to the challenges faced by the U.S. in attempting to get the 
Pacific RFMOs to adopt monitoring and compliance along with ade-
quate conservation measures. 

In the western and central Pacific, the Hawaii longline fleet rep-
resents  less  than  2.5  percent  of  total  bigeye  catch.  Yet  it  provides 
87 percent of the total observer-monitored fishing in the region. As 
previously mentioned, we have had VMS for nearly 20 years in our 
fishery.  However,  such  measures  essential  to  the  monitoring  and 
compliance  have  a  long  way  to  go  before  being  fully  implemented 
in the Western and Central Pacific Fisheries Commission. 

As a small, well-managed fishery, there is little overall impact in 
the larger picture of fishing in the western and central Pacific. We 
stand  ready  to  adopt  conservation  measures  recommended  by 
science.  We  ask  only  that  when  the  U.S.  Government  acts  to  re-
strict  us  within  the  context  of  international  agreements  that  it  re-
sults  in  lower  fishing  mortality,  which  benefits  the  resource,  and 
not  simply  a  shift  to  imports  from  countries  without  proper  moni-
toring and compliance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

While the Hawaii longline fishery maintains a solid working rela-
tionship  with  the  Western  Pacific  Fisheries  Management  Council, 
Department  of  State,  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service,  and  the 
Coast  Guard,  we  recognize  that  further  coordination  and  dialogue 
amongst these groups is required in order to formulate or consider 
appropriate  management  and  enforcement  measures  for  inter-
national fisheries in which we participate. 

Senator  Stevens,  thank  you.  It  has  been  my  honor  to  testify 

today. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Cook follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES COOK, VICE PRESIDENT, 

PACIFIC OCEAN PRODUCERS, LLC 

Chairman  Inouye,  Committee  Members,  aloha  from  Hawaii  and  the  Western  Pa-
cific. My name is Jim Cook . I was born and raised in Hawaii and have participated 
in various aspects of commercial fishing for the past forty years. I own and operate 
five vessels in the Hawaii longline fishery and for the last twenty-five years I have 
been  involved  in  the  design,  sales,  and  installation  of  the  high-tech  tuna  longline 
systems throughout the Pacific. We currently have projects in Korea, China, Mexico, 
Fiji,  French  Polynesia,  and  the  Maldive  Islands.  I  served  9  years  on  the  Western 
Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council,  with  three  of  those  years  as  chair.  My  testi-
mony today will focus on the management and enforcement of tuna fisheries in the 
Pacific. 

The  major  tuna  species  bigeye,  albacore,  yellowfin,  and  skipjack  are  considered 
highly migratory and their populations are assessed on large geographic scales. For 
that  reason  these  fisheries  should  be  managed  within  international  arrangements 
such as Regional Fishery Management Organizations (RFMOs); however, the ability 
of these RFMOs to effectively manage the resource is far from reality. In the West-
ern  and  Central  Pacific  Ocean  (WCPO),  tuna  and  billfish  are  managed  through  the 
Western  and  Central  Pacific  Fisheries  Commission  (WCPFC),  and  in  the  Eastern 
Pacific  Ocean  (EPO),  by  the  Inter  American  Tropical  Tuna  Commission  (IATTC).  I 
believe  the  U.S.  Department  of  State,  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service,  and  the 
U.S. Coast Guard (USCG) are doing their best to implement the international provi-
sions of the Magnuson-Stevens Reauthorization Act of 2006 (MSRA) within the con-
text of these RFMOs. 

Figure 1: International management of highly migratory fish stocks in the Pacific Ocean 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
K
O
O
C
3
0
4

50 

Management Issues 

Bigeye tuna (Thunnus obesus) has been determined to be experiencing overfishing 
in both WCPO and EPO, and fishery scientists have recommended a 25 percent re-
duction in fishing mortality of this species. To date, neither the WCPFC nor IATTC 
have  been  able  to  reach  consensus  on  conservation  and  management  measures  to 
end bigeye overfishing. In the WCPO, the competing economic interests between dis-
tant  water  fishing  fleets  of  Asian,  U.S.  and  European  nations  versus  the  inde-
pendent  Pacific  Island  countries  that  grant  access  rights  to  fish  resources  in  their 
Exclusive  Economic  Zones  (EEZs)  has  precluded  any  meaningful  conservation  for 
bigeye tuna. The issue is complicated in that two very different types of industrial- 
scale  fishing,  longline  and  purse  seine,  are  harvesting  the  same  resource,  with  nei-
ther type wanting to yield in reducing harvests. Longliners fishing for bigeye target 
large,  adult  fish  that  are  valuable  in  sushi  and  sashimi  markets  around  the  world. 
Purse seiners do not target bigeye tuna, but catch juvenile bigeye incidentally when 
targeting skipjack and yellowfin tuna for the global, canned tuna market. 

Figure 2: Size distribution of bigeye tuna catch, longline vs purse seine 
Source: Secretariat of the Pacific Community-Oceanic Fisheries Program 
Bigeye  catches  from  purse  seiners  have  risen  dramatically  over  the  past  decade 
due  to  increased  purse  seine  sets  using  deeper  nets  on  Fish  Aggregation  Devices 
(FADs), which attract juvenile bigeye, yellowfin, and skipjack tuna, as wells as other 
marine bycatch species. 

Figure 3: WCPO Bigeye Tuna Catch by Longline and Purse Seine Fisheries 
Source: Secretariat of the Pacific Community-Oceanic Fisheries Program 
In order to properly manage the bigeye tuna resource, there needs to be: (1) accu-
rate  and  timely  submissions  of  catch  reporting  by  all  member  nations,  (2)  a  cap  on 
the  number  of  longliners  authorized  to  fish  in  the  WCPO,  and  (3)  effective  FAD 
management  programs  for  purse  fisheries.  In  2005  (and  for  years  2006–2008),  the 
WCPFC  agreed  on  bigeye  longline  catch  limits  for  nations  not  exceed  their  average 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
K
O
O
C
3
0
4

s
p
e
.

2
K
O
O
C
3
0
4

51 

annual catch between 2001–2004. In 2006, the WCPFC required all members to de-
velopment  FAD  management  plans  for  the  use  of  FADs  by  member  nations  on  the 
high  seas.  To  date  only  Papua  New  Guinea  has  a  plan,  whereas  the  U.S.  has  not 
developed a FAD management plan and therefore not in compliance with the above 
mentioned  measure.  The  U.S.  needs  to  address  purse  seine  fishing  on  FADs,  espe-
cially since in 69 percent of the U.S. purse seine fishing effort in 2006 was in asso-
ciation with FADs. Furthermore, the U.S. purse seine fleet is undergoing expansion, 
with  8–12  Taiwanese-built,  U.S.  flagged  seiners  to  be  fishing  within  the  next  few 
years,  bringing  the  total  number  of  U.S.  purse  seiners  to  around  30.  The  Western 
Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council  recently  recommended  to  prohibit  purse  seine 
fishing  in  association  with  FADs  in  the  entire  U.S.  EEZ  around  American  Samoa, 
CNMI,  Guam,  Hawaii,  and  the  U.S.  Pacific  Remote  Island  Areas  (PRIA),  which  in-
clude  Johnston  Atoll,  Howland  Island,  Baker  Island,  Jarvis  Island,  and  Palmyra 
Atoll, Wake Island, and Kingman Reef. 

To address capacity issues in the WCPO, the vessels authorized to fish in the con-
vention  area  need  to  be  strictly  regulated  within  the  EEZs  of  member  nations  as 
well  as  on  the  high  seas.  WPCPFC  Conservation  and  Management  Measures  re-
quire  that  total  levels  of  fishing  effort  for  bigeye  and  yellowfin  tuna  in  shall  not  be 
increased  beyond  currently  levels.  However,  as  indicated  in  Figures  2  and  3  below, 
there  may  be  too  many  fishing  vessels  to  begin  with,  so  even  if  no  more  effort  is 
expended,  there  is  already  likely  excessive  capacity  in  the  WCPO.  Moreover,  new 
fishing  vessels  being  built  are  bigger,  more  efficient,  and  able  to  stay  out  fishing 
much longer than older vessels. 

Figure 4: Number of longline vessels operating in the WCPFC area. 
(Source: WCPFC SC3–2007/GN WP–1) 

Figure 4: Number of purse seine vessels operating in the WCPFC area. 
(Source: WCPFC SC3–2007/GN WP–1) 
Currently,  each  member  nation  is  required  to  annually  provide  the  WCPFC  with 
a  list  of  fishing  vessels  authorized  to  fish  in  the  convention  area.  However,  most 
member  countries  have  provided  only  general  lists  of  vessels  that  may  or  may  not 
be  actively  fishing  in  the  WCPFC  area,  therefore  the  list  needs  further  refinement 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

5
K
O
O
C
3
0
4

s
p
e
.

4
K
O
O
C
3
0
4

52 

and categories such as ‘‘active/inactive’’ which would serve to indicate a clearer pic-
ture of overall capacity in the region. 

Another management issue involves bycatch of marine mammals, sea turtles, and 
seabirds.  Since  the  1996  reauthorization  of  the  MSA,  the  Western  Pacific  Fishery 
Management  Council  has  implemented  an  effective  bycatch  reduction  program.  Sea 
bird mitigation measures (e.g., night-setting, side-setting, blue-dyed bait, line shoot-
ers,  etc.)  have  reduced  seabird  bycatch  in  the  Hawaii  longline  fishery  from  thou-
sands  of  seabirds  annually  to  less  than  100  per  year.  Reductions  in  sea  turtle  by-
catch  have  also  been  realized  from  the  required  use  of  circle  hooks  and  mackerel 
bait  in  the  Hawaii  longline  swordfish  fishery—90  percent  reduction  in  loggerhead 
sea  turtles  and  87  percent  reduction  in  leatherback  sea  turtle  interactions.  Based 
on  these  successes,  the  Western  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council  has  been 
working  actively  to  promote  these  measures  in  the  international  arena,  sponsoring 
international  meetings  such  as  the  series  of  International  Fishers  Forums  and  sea 
turtle workshops. Hawaii’s longline fisherman have been active participants in these 
efforts and have worked to engage foreign fisherman in promoting bycach reduction, 
examples being the Tri National Exchange bringing fishermen from Hawaii, Japan, 
and Mexico together to reduce loggerhead sea turtle interactions. Bycatch measures 
in  the  WCPFC  have  taken  a  back  seat  as  member  states  struggle  over  the  design 
and  implementation  of  basic  monitoring  and  compliance  and  accurate  catch  docu-
mentation issues. 
Enforcement Issues 

Enforcement  issues  in  the  WCPO  involve  lack  of  adequate  monitoring,  flags  of 
convenience,  at-sea  transshipment,  inadequate  port  state  measures,  catch  docu-
mentation,  and  apparent  loop  holes  for  vessels  with  access  agreements  with  island 
nations. While effort has been made to resolve these issues, such as requiring VMS 
and  observers  in  the  WCPFC,  full  implementation  of  these  measures  is  still  far  off 
in the future. 

A  major  problem  facing  small  island  nations  is  the  lack  of  enforcement  assets  to 
patrol  their  EEZs.  The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  faces  similar  challenges  in  the  WCPO  as 
effectively monitoring the U.S. EEZ in the region, especially the PRIA, requires sig-
nificant resources. The U.S. EEZ around the PRIA, for example, is subject to illegal 
fishing  by  foreign  vessels.  Recent  cases  involve  two  Ecuadorian  flagged  purse  seine 
vessels  caught  fishing  in  the  U.S.  EEZ  around  Howland/Baker  Islands  and  Jarvis 
Island.  Although  the  USCG  was  able  to  detect  this  illegal  activity  by  air  and  were 
able to pursue one of these vessels with a cutter at sea, the USCG was unable con-
trol  and  board  this  vessel  while  in  the  U.S.  EEZ.  The  cases  were  recently  settled 
for  $117,000  each;  however,  there  are  suspicions  that  these  vessels  were  illegally 
fishing  in  the  U.S.  EEZ  for  2  weeks,  instead  of  for  making  one  set  as  the  penalties 
were  assessed.  The  USCG  needs  more  resources  and  assets  to  effectively  monitor 
the U.S. EEZ in the WCPO. 

The  Ecuadorian  vessels  were  fishing  within  the  WCPFC  convention  area  without 
authorization as Ecuador is not a member of the WCPFC. Ecuador, in 2007, sought 
cooperating non-member status within the WCPFC, but their application was rejec-
tion by the member nations. This issue highlights a loophole for foreign fishing ves-
sels—potential  IUU  vessels—that  fish  in  the  WCPO  as  they  are  not  subject  to 
WCPFC  conservation  and  management  measures  because  the  state  flag  under 
which the vessel operates is not a member of the Commission. 

The  MSRA  added  a  provision  (Sec.  510)  that  requires  all  foreign  fishing  vessels 
transiting  the  U.S.  EEZ  seaward  of  Hawaii,  CNMI,  American  Samoa,  Guam,  and 
the  PRIA  without  VMS  capable  of  communicating  with  USCG  or  NMFS  Office  of 
Law  Enforcement  (OLE)  to  notify  the  USCG  or  OLE  the  name  of  the  vessel,  flag 
state, location, and destination of the vessel. Section 510 also requires that all fish-
ing  gear  on  the  board  the  foreign  fishing  vessel  be  stowed  below  deck  or  removed 
from  the  place  where  it  is  normally  used  for  fishing.  Congress  intended  this  provi-
sion  to  require  notification  of  foreign  vessels  because  the  USCG  and  NMFS  Office 
of Law Enforcement do not have access to VMS data of foreign fishing vessels, and 
that  effective  monitoring  of  the  EEZ  around  the  PRIA  and  other  remote  U.S.  terri-
tories takes nearly daily fly-overs by USCG air assets. The Bush Administration in 
signing  the  MSRA  indicated  that  they  would  implement  section  510  of  the  MSRA 
only  as  appropriate  under  international  law,  and  to  date,  the  USCG  nor  OLE  have 
not pursued this enforcement tool. It seems the Bush Administration interprets sec-
tion  510  to  be  inconsistent  with  existing  international  treaties  or  agreements  relat-
ing to freedom of navigation. While this may or may not be true, the Administration 
should  push  this  approach  in  international  fora  as  a  means  to  deter  illegal  foreign 
fishing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Fisheries  observers  are  a  major  component  of  effective  monitoring  of  tuna  fish-
eries in the WCPO. At the last WCPFC meeting it was agreed that the WCPFC ob-
server program would be initiated in 2008, starting with national observer programs 
and  with  a  goal  of  5  percent  coverage.  There  has  been  major  resistance  in  the 
WCPFC  from  several  member  nations  on  determine  what  vessels  will  be  subject  to 
observers and when and who is going to pay for the implementation and administra-
tion  of  the  observer  programs.  To  put  this  in  context,  our  local,  Hawaii-based 
longline  fishery  targeting  swordfish  is  subject  to  100  percent  coverage  and  the  Ha-
waii  longline  deep-set  tuna  fishery  is  at  20  percent  observer  coverage,  costing  over 
$6  million  per  year—we  hope  to  utilize  video  monitoring  technology  in  the  near  fu-
ture to reduce these costs in our fishery. 

VMS  is  another  important  enforcement  tool  for  effective  conservation  and  man-
agement.  Although  WCPFC  conservation  and  management  measures  require  VMS 
on  all  vessels  that  are  authorized  to  fish  in  the  WCPFC  area,  the  VMS  program 
and  implementing  details  have  yet  to  be  agreed  on  and  significant  work  needs  to 
be done before VMS is applied evenly throughout the region. Through management 
regulations  recommended  by  the  Western  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council  in 
1991, the Hawaii-based longline fishery was the first fishery in the Nation to be re-
quired  to  use  VMS,  and  thereby  pioneering  it  use  as  an  effective  enforcement  tool. 
At-sea  transshipment  is  a  major  IUU  and  management  concern  because  it  can 
avoid  port-state  monitoring  and  catch  documentation  is  often  lacking.  At-sea  trans-
shipment  is  prohibited  for  purse  seiners  by  the  WCPFC;  however,  at-sea  trans-
shipment  remains  a  practice  for  large-scale  longline  vessels  (mostly  freezer  vessels 
fishing for albacore). 

Consistent  port-state  measures  are  important  and  require  rigorous  procedures  to 
verify  catch  and  catch  locations.  Measures  to  deny  port-entry  by  vessels  suspected 
of  IUU  fishing  can  be  problematic  as  it  would  then  eliminate  port-state  control  of 
an IUU vessel that if denied port-entry, would likely offload at another, less strictly 
controlled port. 

An  important  point  is  that  U.S.  fisheries  operating  in  the  WCPFC  are  the  most 
tightly managed, closely monitored fisheries in the world. What is troublesome from 
a U.S. fishing prospective, is that what the U.S. agrees to in the WCPFC and carries 
out  through  domestic  regulations,  the  same  will  likely  not  be  replicated  by  other 
member  nations.  In  effect,  the  U.S.  could  over-regulate  its  fisheries  while  other 
member  nations  do  little  in  terms  of  accountability,  thereby  setting  U.S.  vessels  at 
a  competitive  disadvantage.  In  this  respect,  if  member  nations  do  not  adequately 
monitor  and  enforce  their  own  vessels  to  comply  with  agreed  to  conservation  and 
management  measure,  the  U.S.  has  little  option  other  than  to  impose  trade  sanc-
tions. 
Fisheries  Development 

in  the  U.S.  Pacific  Island  Territories  and 

Commonwealth 

The  U.S.  Pacific  Island  Territories  of  American  Samoa  and  Guam  and  the  U.S. 
Commonwealth of Northern Mariana Islands need support to develop their fisheries, 
and existing law such as the Central, Western, and South Pacific Fisheries Develop-
ment Act of 1972 is an appropriate vehicle to render such support. The U.S., under 
the  South  Pacific  Tuna  Treaty  (SPTT),  provides  $18  million  annually  to  members 
nations  of  the  Forum  Fisheries  Agency  (FFA)  including  the  Republic  of  the  Mar-
shalls  Islands,  Federated  States  of  Micronesia,  Republic  of  Palau  (which  are  all 
Former  Trust  Territories  of  the  Pacific  Islands)  for  40  U.S.  purse  seine  access  per-
mits  to  fish  within  the  EEZs  of  FFA  member  nations.  Because  around  25–30  per-
mits have gone largely unused by the U.S. purse seine fleet in recent years, the FFA 
has sold the latent amount of permits to other nations, thereby receiving double rev-
enues  as  the  U.S.  fleet  is  rebuilding.  Guam  and  the  Northern  Mariana  Islands  do 
not receive any benefit from the SPTT to develop their fisheries. 

Given  the  strategic  location  of  Guam  and  the  Northern  Mariana  Islands  in  the 
Western  Pacific,  both  have  great  potential  to  provide  needed  infrastructure  to  the 
WCPFC  (its  Secretariat  is  located  in  Pohnpei,  FSM)  as  well  as  be  international 
transportation hubs for fishing fleets air-freighting fish to the U.S. and Asia. Guam 
used to be a major transshipment location for both purse seine and longline vessels, 
however,  over  the  last  5  years  there  has  been  a  major  reduction  in  port  calls  by 
these  vessels.  A  possible  reason  for  this  decline  is  linked  to  a  suggestion  that  the 
Federated  States  of  Micronesia  (FSM)  is  requiring  all  their  foreign  fishing  access 
agreements  to  land  their  fish  in  the  FSM.  Nonetheless,  Guam  and  the  Northern 
Mariana  Islands  are  working  to  establish  small-scale  longline  fleets  and  the  U.S. 
should support fisheries development efforts in these areas. 

The American Samoa tuna canneries are vital to the territory’s economy. In 2004, 
according  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Labor,  the  canneries  directly  employed  4,738 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

workers  (38.6  percent  of  all  surveyed  workers  in  the  territory),  paid  an  average 
hourly  wage  rate  of  $3.60,  and  accounted  for  24.5  percent  of  the  territory’s  total 
wage  bill  for  all  workers.  However,  the  influence  of  the  canneries  goes  well  beyond 
purely  domestic  impacts.  Ready  access  to  the  canneries  by  countries  surrounding 
American  Samoa  (Cook  Islands,  Niue,  Tonga,  Samoa)  has  supported  the  growth  of 
domestic  longline  fishing  in  these  countries.  Further,  as  revealed  at  a  recent  West-
ern  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council  workshop  on  albacore  longline  fisheries, 
most  countries  across  the  entire  South  Pacific,  including  those  with  canneries  such 
as Australia, New Zealand, Papua New Guinea, Solomon Islands and Fiji, ship alba-
core  to  Pago  Pago  for  canning.  The  development  of  the  albacore  longline  fisheries 
in  the  central  South  Pacific  have  also  provided  benefits  to  those  Pacific  Island  na-
tions  that  have  the  majority  of  the  skipjack  resource  but  do  not  receive  the  lion’s 
share  of  the  SPTT  funds.  Thus,  the  SPTT  is  a  key  component  for  the  U.S.  in  the 
Pacific  Islands  through  this  mosaic  of  inter-connections  to  other  fisheries,  and  for 
this  reason,  it  does  not  simply  represent  U.S.  purse  seine  access  to  skipjack  in  the 
equatorial Pacific. 

The Hawaii and American Samoa longline fleet comprise the largest U.S. domestic 
industrial fishing fleet in the WCPO. The Hawaii and American Samoa fisheries are 
model fisheries in terms of ecologically sustainable longline fishing, employing high 
observer  coverage,  vessel  monitoring  systems,  limited  entry  programs,  spatial  man-
agement to minimize fishery interactions, and innovative turtle and seabird bycatch 
reduction methods. Indeed, the Hawaii fishery was recently evaluated and found to 
be overall 93 percent compliant with the United Nations Food and Agriculture Orga-
nization’s  Code  of  Conduct  for  Responsible  Fisheries.  Responsible,  well-managed 
fisheries  can  also  be  profitable.  This  is  evident  from  Honolulu  being  ranked  4th 
($54,600,000)  nationally  in  terms  of  landed  fish  value  for  2006,  and  in  2007,  the 
value of landed fish in Honolulu is in excess of $71 million. 

Our  longline  fisheries,  therefore,  serve  as  the  model  for  other  nations  within  the 
WCPO.  Countries  neighboring  American  Samoa,  such  as  the  Cook  Islands,  Samoa 
and  Niue,  have  taken  a  serious  interest  in  U.S.  longline  fisheries  management  and 
seek to emulate our successes. Moreover, longline fishing seems poised to begin de-
veloping  in  the  Guam  and  the  Northern  Mariana  Islands,  where  if  successful,  will 
provide an additional role model for neighboring Micronesian countries, such as the 
Federated States of Micronesia and Palau. 
Closing 

Overall,  I  believe  the  Department  of  State,  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service, 
and the USCG are working well on implementing the international provisions of the 
MSRA.  For  these  agencies  it  is  often  a  tiring  and  frustrating  experience  and  they 
deserve  our  appreciation  and  financial  support.  The  focus  on  IUU  fishing  is  impor-
tant,  but  pales  in  comparison  to  the  challenges  faced  by  the  U.S.  in  attempting  to 
get the Pacific RFMOs to adopt monitoring and compliance along with adequate con-
servation  measures.  In  the  WCPO,  the  Hawaii  longline  fleet  represents  less  than 
2.5  percent  of  the  total  bigeye  catch,  but  provides  87  percent  of  the  total  observed 
(use  of  fishery  observers)  fishing  effort  in  the  region.  As  previously  mentioned,  we 
have VMS for nearly twenty years in our fishery; however, such measures essential 
to  monitoring  and  compliance  have  a  long  way  to  go  before  fully  implemented  in 
the  WCPFC.  As  a  small,  well-managed  fishery  that  has  little  overall  impact  in  the 
larger  arena  of  fishing  in  the  WCPO,  we  stand  ready  to  adopt  whatever  conserva-
tion measures are recommended by science. 

We ask only that when the U.S. Government acts to restrict us within the context 
of international agreements, that it results in lower fishing mortality which benefits 
the  resource  and  not  a  simple  shift  to  imports  from  countries  without  proper  moni-
toring  and  compliance.  While  the  Hawaii  longine  fishery  maintains  a  solid  working 
relationship  with  the  Western  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council,  DOS,  NMFS, 
and  the  USCG,  we  recognize  that  further  coordination  and  dialogue  amongst  these 
groups  is  required  in  order  to  formulate  or  consider  appropriate  management  and 
enforcement measures for international fisheries for which we participate in. 

Chairman Inouye and Members of the Committee, it has been my honor to testify 

today and I will gladly accept and questions. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  will  have  some  ques-

tions. 

Ms. Speer, thank you for being here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

STATEMENT OF LISA SPEER, DIRECTOR, WATER AND OCEANS 

PROGRAM, NATURAL RESOURCES DEFENSE COUNCIL 

55 

Ms. SPEER. Thank you very much, Senator Stevens. 
Senator STEVENS. Can you pull that mike up toward you, please? 
Ms.  SPEER.  Yes,  sure.  I  want  to,  first  of  all,  echo  Mr.  Benton’s 
sentiments,  thanking  you  for  your  extraordinary  leadership  over 
the  last  two  decades  in  terms  of  the  Fish  Stocks  Agreement,  the 
Driftnet  Moratorium,  the  recent  U.N.  General  Assembly  resolution 
calling  for  regulation  of  currently  unregulated  bottom  fisheries 
throughout  the  world.  All  of  those  and  many  more  major  inter-
national  instruments  to  govern  high  seas  fishing  have  resulted  di-
rectly  from  your  leadership,  and  the  world  owes  you  a  big  thanks. 
My written testimony focuses on a lot of different issues. I would 
like  to  address  my  comments  today  on  the  North  Pacific  and  the 
Arctic. 

As  you  know,  as  a  direct  result  of  the  resolution  you  sponsored, 
Senate Resolution 610, the U.N. General Assembly passed a resolu-
tion in October of 2006 calling on States to establish regional fish-
ery  management  organizations  to  govern  fisheries  that  are  cur-
rently unregulated throughout the world. And there has been good 
progress  since  2006  in  implementing  that  resolution  in  many 
places.  But  unfortunately,  one  of  those  places  is  not  the  North  Pa-
cific. 

There  are  a  couple  of  problems  here.  The  first  is  in  the  current 
Northwest Pacific negotiations that are ongoing right now between 
the  United  States,  Korea,  Russia,  and  Japan.  There  have  been  a 
number of different meetings. Interim measures have been adopted 
for the Northwest Pacific. But unfortunately, a lot of those interim 
measures are not being implemented. 

For  example,  one  of  the  key  interim  measures  that  was  agreed 
to  was  to  ‘‘freeze  the  footprint,’’  to  have  no  new  fishing  in  this  re-
gion  until  a  management  regime  can  be  established.  But  the  par-
ties  have  not  yet  submitted  the  information  needed  to  determine 
where  that  footprint  is.  So  it  is  pretty  hard  to,  in  fact,  implement 
a  ‘‘freeze  the  footprint’’  agreement  if  you  don’t  know  where  that 
footprint is. 

And  second,  with  respect  to  the  other  measures  that  have  been 
adopted,  in  the  absence  of  100  percent  observer  coverage  as  we 
have  in  the  North  Pacific  within  the  U.S.,  there  are  always  going 
to  be  questions  about  whether,  in  fact,  the  other  parties  are  com-
plying with whatever measures, no matter how good they are, that 
have been adopted. 

Of  even  greater  concern  is  the  draft  treaty  text  that  has  been 
prepared  by  Japan  that  would  govern  fisheries  in  the  future.  This 
treaty, in our view, falls way short of what U.S. fishermen have to 
comply  with  under  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act,  as  well  as  the  Fish 
Stocks Agreement and other international agreements. 

Our view is that the Northwest Pacific agreement has to undergo 
a  complete  overhaul,  and  if  that  is  not  possible,  we  would  rec-
ommend  that  the  United  States  withdraw  from  the  negotiations, 
because  for  us  to  sign  on  to  a  treaty  that  is  that  deficient  would 
send  a  terrible  message  to  the  world  about  our  commitment  to 
modern fisheries management and promoting the ideas that are in 
the Magnuson-Stevens Act beyond U.S. borders. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

So  why  does  the  North  Pacific  agreement  matter  to  the  United 
States?  There  is  a  chain  of  volcanoes  under  the  sea  that  stretches 
from  the  northern  part  of  Hawaii  up  to  the  Aleutians.  It  is  sort  of 
a  string  of  pearls,  if  you  will,  that  connects  Hawaii  and  Alaska. 
And  those  volcanoes  are  stopping  points  for  a  number  of  different 
migratory species. 

They are also covered with corals. The Chinese fishery in that re-
gion  for  many  years  was  exclusively  for  corals,  and  there  are  still 
very large aggregations remaining in many places. 

Unfortunately, the Japanese and the Russians fished out most of 
those  seamounts  for  pelagic  armorhead  and  alfonsin  in  the  1960s 
and 1970s. And one thing we learned in Hawaii at the most recent 
meeting of the northwest fishery negotiations is that overfishing is 
continuing  on  those  seamounts,  and  it  is  having  an  impact  within 
the  zone,  within  our  zone,  on  the  Hancock  seamounts,  which  are 
the  northern-most  seamounts  within  the  U.S.  zone.  Before  1976, 
they  used  to  be  in  the  high  seas.  They  were  overfished.  The  U.S. 
claimed jurisdiction, and shut the fishery down in 1984. There has 
been  a  moratorium  on  all  bottom  fishing  on  the  Hancock 
seamounts since 1984, and the fish have not come back. 

And NOAA’s Hawaii office thinks the reason they are not coming 
back  is  because  overfishing  is  continuing  on  the  high  seas  in  the 
northern  seamounts  that  are  providing  the  feed  stock  for  bringing 
those fish back again. So overfishing on the high seas is having an 
impact  within  our  zone,  and  that  is  a  really  important  element  to 
address. 

The Northeast Pacific, turning to that for a moment, as you prob-
ably  know,  is  completely  unregulated.  There  are  no  efforts  right 
now to establish an RFMO, and we are very concerned that as the 
noose  tightens  around  unregulated  fishing  in  other  parts  of  the 
world, that we are going to start attracting all kinds of people who 
seek to evade regulated fishing to the Northeast Pacific. 

We  recommend  that  the  United  States  initiate  something  to  get 
into place a management plan for the Northeast Pacific as soon as 
possible. We would prefer to see one regime cover the entire North 
Pacific.  But  given  the  drawbacks  that  I  mentioned  with  respect  to 
the Northwest Pacific, that may not be possible. 

I  wanted  to  turn  to  the  Arctic  for  a  moment  and  to  say  that  the 
actions  that  the  North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council  has 
taken  have  been  extraordinarily  foresighted,  and  we  strongly  sup-
port what they have done and agree that they ought to be exported 
beyond  our  zone.  And  time  is  not  on  our  side  on  this.  If,  in  fact, 
as  you  mentioned  earlier,  we  have  2  or  3  years,  we  really  need  to 
get cracking. 

I  have  spoken  to  a  number  of  people  in  the  State  Department. 
As was noted earlier, there have been overtures both to Russia and 
to Canada to see whether there is interest in moving this forward. 
And  frankly,  I  understand  the  response  has  been  from  tepid  to 
lukewarm,  and  I  think  that  is  going  to  continue  to  happen  unless 
we  start  elevating  the  level  of  diplomatic  engagement  by  a  bunch 
of rungs up the ladder. In fact, we may want to just ditch the lad-
der  and  get  in  the  elevator  and  raise  this  at  a  much  higher  level. 
And I would encourage you, sir, to consider doing what you have 
done  in  the  past  so  successfully,  which  is  start  talking  about  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

in  international  fora.  Come  to  the  United  Nations.  Start  talking 
about the need to protect the Arctic, the need to come together and 
develop  an  agreement  that  will  regulate  commercial  fishing  before 
those commercial fisheries get established. If we wait until they get 
established, it will be much more difficult. 

Thank you for the opportunity. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Speer follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LISA SPEER, DIRECTOR, WATER AND OCEANS PROGRAM, 

NATURAL RESOURCES DEFENSE COUNCIL 

Mr. Chairman, Members of the Committee: 
My  name  is  Lisa  Speer.  I  am  Director  of  the  Water  and  Oceans  Program  at  the 
Natural  Resources  Defense  Council  (NRDC),  a  national  conservation  organization 
dedicated  to  protecting  natural  resources  and  public  health.  My  work  over  the  last 
10 years at NRDC has focused on the conservation and management of fisheries and 
the marine environment in areas beyond national jurisdiction.1 We welcome the op-
portunity  to  testify  today  on  issues  related  to  international  fisheries  management 
and enforcement. 

I  would  like  first  to  thank  Senators  Inouye  and  Stevens  for  their  outstanding 
leadership  on  fisheries  issues.  For  more  than  two  decades,  Senators  Stevens  and 
Inouye have led the way in promoting sound fisheries management both here in the 
United  States  and  beyond  our  borders.  Their  decades-long  bipartisan  cooperation 
has  yielded  extraordinary  results,  including  the  1991  U.N.  moratorium  on  large 
scale  driftnets  on  the  high  seas,  the  groundbreaking,  legally  binding  conservation 
provisions  of  the  U.N.  Agreement  on  Straddling  and  Highly  Migratory  Fish  Stocks 
(‘‘Fish  Stocks  Agreement’’),  the  FAO  International  Plan  of  Action  (IPOA)  on  illegal, 
unreported and unregulated (IUU) fishing, the 2006 U.N. General Assembly Resolu-
tion 61/105 on unregulated fishing, and a host of other key agreements, instruments 
and resolutions. The oceans, and the planet, owe them an enormous debt. 
Overview of International Fisheries 

There  is  no  longer  any  doubt  that  we  are  rapidly  reaching,  and  in  many  cases 
have  exceeded,  the  limits  of  ocean  ecosystems  and  the  fisheries  they  support.  Ac-
cording  to  the  U.N.  Food  and  Agriculture  Organization  (FAO),  roughly  seventy-five 
percent  of  the  world’s  marine  fish  populations  are  fully  fished,  overfished,  or  de-
pleted.  Sea  turtles,  marine  mammals  and  seabirds  are  threatened  by  incidental 
catch  in  fishing  gear,  as  are  many  species  of  commercial  and  non-commercially  im-
portant  fish.  Destructive  fishing  practices  such  as  unregulated  bottom  fishing  dam-
ages the habitat on which marine life, including important commercial fish species, 
depend.  Overcapacity  and  subsidies—on  the  order  of  $10–15  billion  annually—con-
tinue  to  propel  short  term  overexploitation  at  the  expense  of  long  term  sustain-
ability. 

The  depletion  of  the  seas  has  enormous  implications  for  the  human  environment 
as well as the natural one. Globally, over a billion people get a major portion of their 
protein from the sea. Marine fisheries employ roughly 20 million people worldwide, 
many  from  developing  countries  where  fishing  provides  a  critical  source  of  income 
as well as food. 

Climate change and acidification of the oceans lends new urgency to these perva-
sive  problems.  Scientists  believe  that  healthy,  diverse  marine  ecosystems  are  the 
best  insurance  against  the  profound  changes  in  store  as  the  planet  warms  and  the 
oceans  acidify.  Like  people,  the  healthier  our  oceans  and  fisheries  are,  the  better 
able they will be to cope with potentially devastating changes. 
Increasing Pressure on the High Seas 

Faced  with  declining  stocks  in  nearshore  coastal  waters,  fishermen  now  venture 
far  out  into  previously  untouched  areas  of  the  deep  sea,  home  to  exceptionally  vul-
nerable  species  and  habitats.  According  to  FAO,  the  catch  of  oceanic  species  typi-
cally  found  on  the  high  seas  has  tripled  since  the  mid–1970s.  And  the  pressure  is 
growing.  Just  last  week  the  chief  of  the  Russian  State  Committee  for  Fisheries  an-
nounced  a  plan  to  expand  the  Russian  open  ocean  fish  catch  by  50  times  current 

1 This  testimony  uses  the  terms  ‘‘high  seas’’  and  ‘‘areas  beyond  national  jurisdiction’’  inter-

changeably, recognizing that they are not completely congruent in aerial coverage. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

levels,  from  30,000  tons  to  1.5  million  tons  by  the  end  of  next  year.2 While  the 
amount may represent wishful thinking, the direction is unmistakable and is shared 
by other high seas fishing nations. 

Conservation  and  management  of  high  seas  fisheries  is  important  to  the  United 
States for several reasons. Many high seas fish stocks, such as tuna, swordfish and 
squid, are important to U.S. fishermen and consumers. Mismanagement, illegal fish-
ing,  unregulated  fishing  and  the  use  of  damaging  fishing  practices  harms  those 
stocks,  damages  marine  wildlife  and  destroys  important  ocean  habitat.  In  addition, 
poor  or  absent  management  of  high  seas  fishing  puts  U.S.  fishermen,  who  must 
comply  with  the  requirements  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  and  other  statutes,  at 
a  serious  competitive  disadvantage  against  unregulated  or  poorly  regulated  foreign 
fleets. 

For these and other reasons, the U.S. has an important interest in the governance 
of high seas fishing. Unfortunately, the international regime governing such fishing 
has  not  kept  pace  with  the  expansion  of  fleets  and  technology,  as  discussed  below. 
Gaps in International Fisheries Governance 

Gaps  in  fisheries  governance  include  geographical,  implementation  and  enforce-

ment gaps. 
a. Geographical gaps 

RFMO/As  with  authority  to  manage  highly  migratory  species  such  as  tuna  and 
swordfish  cover  most  of  the  world’s  oceans.  This  is  not  the  case  for  other  high  seas 
fisheries,  including  those  for  sharks,  many  non-tuna  or  tuna-like  pelagic  species, 
and  non-straddling  deep  sea  fish.  The  remainder  of  this  testimony  focuses  on  the 
latter category. 

Prompted  by  Senate  Resolution  610,  introduced  by  Senators  Stevens  and  Inouye 
in September, 2006, and a following directive by President Bush, the United Nations 
General Assembly passed a resolution in December 2006 to address the gaps in bot-
tom fisheries governance. UNGA Resolution 61/105 calls on States to establish new 
RFMOs and to adopt interim measures to regulate bottom fisheries and protect vul-
nerable marine ecosystems on the high seas by December 31, 2008. 

Important  progress  in  implementing  Resolution  61/105  has  been  made  in  South 
Pacific,  where  parties  negotiating  a  new  South  Pacific  RFMO  have  adopted  strong 
interim measures and have made steady headway in negotiating treaty text. We are 
grateful  for  the  leadership  role  played  by  the  United  States  in  the  development  of 
interim measures. 

The  South  Pacific,  along  with  CCAMLR,  stands  out  among  RFMO/As  with  com-
petence  to  regulate  bottom  fisheries.  Most  other  RFMOs  lag  far  behind  these  two 
regions in implementing Resolution 61/105. Of particular concern is the direction of 
negotiations  in  the  Northwest  Pacific,  and  the  lack  of  any  meaningful  progress  to-
ward establishing a management regime in the Northeast Pacific. 
The Northwest Pacific 

Negotiations to establish a new RFMO/A in the North West Pacific began in 2006 
and involve the U.S., Korea, Japan and Russia. The parties agreed on interim meas-
ures  for  the  management  of  bottom  fisheries  on  the  high  seas  of  the  region  in  Feb-
ruary  2007,  and  agreed  to  a  further  set  of  measures  to  implement  the  February 
2007  agreement  in  October  2007.  While  good  progress  has  been  made  on  interim 
measures,  a  key  issue  with  regard  to  observer  coverage  was  not  resolved,  and  sev-
eral  important  issues  were  left  open  pending  the  development  of  the  FAO  Guide-
lines on implementing key elements of UNGA Resolution 61/105. These include the 
definition of vulnerable marine ecosystems and significant adverse effects. 

Of  much  greater  concern  is  the  draft  convention  text  prepared  by  Japan.  In  our 
view, the current draft of the convention text does not meet the most basic require-
ments of modern international fisheries agreements, including the U.N. Fish Stocks 
Agreement,  the  FAO  Code  of  Conduct,  the  FAO  Compliance  Agreement,  and  other 
international instruments. Nor does it impose requirements anywhere close to those 
required here in the United States under the Magnuson-Stevens Act.3 

U.S.  approval  of  this  draft  in  anything  like  its  current  form  would  send  a  very 
negative  message  to  the  rest  of  the  world  about  our  commitment  to  improving  im-

2 Kazinform, March 22, 2008. 
3 The  major  areas  in  which  the  draft  convention  text  falls  short  in  our  view  include  its  weak 
or absent provisions on transparency, new fishing in the absence of a management plan, registry 
of  vessels  and  vessel  owners,  port  state  duties,  capacity  controls,  flag  state  obligations,  trans-
shipment,  boarding  and  inspection  procedures,  decisionmaking,  performance  reviews,  conserva-
tion  and  management  measures  for  target  and  non-target  species,  implementation  of  the  pre-
cautionary approach, observer coverage, and data sharing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

plementation of high seas fisheries management principles and instruments, in par-
ticular the commitment to the effective implementation of the 1995 U.N. Fish Stocks 
Agreement.  We  trust  the  U.S.  will  do  everything  necessary  to  strengthen  the  draft 
so that foreign vessels operating on the high seas in the Pacific are subject to stand-
ards at least as stringent as those in place in the U.S. under the Magnuson-Stevens 
Fishery Conservation and Management Act. If the other participants to the negotia-
tions do not agree to dramatically strengthen the draft text, we recommend the U.S. 
withdraw from the negotiations. 
The Northeast Pacific 

As the noose tightens around unregulated fishing across the globe, the Northeast 
Pacific  is  one  of  a  dwindling  number  of  places  left  where  high  seas  bottom  fishing 
can  proceed  unregulated,  unmanaged,  and  unreported.  At  the  moment,  there  does 
not  appear  to  be  much  high  seas  bottom  fishing  taking  place  in  the  Northeast  Pa-
cific. But there is no doubt that will change as fisheries become depleted or subject 
to  tighter  regulation  elsewhere.  The  Northeast  Pacific  should  not  be  permitted  to 
become  a  haven  for  foreign  fleets  seeking  to  prosecute  fisheries  without  controls, 
oversight or enforcement. 

For many reasons, we believe a single RFMO covering bottom fishing on the high 
seas of the entire North Pacific would be an ideal outcome. One possibility is to ex-
tend  the  Northwest  Pacific  agreement  to  the  east  and  south  so  that  it  covers  the 
entire North Pacific. Unfortunately however, as discussed above the draft Northwest 
Pacific  agreement  does  not  come  close  to  meeting  the  standards  set  in  either  the 
Magnuson Stevens Act or the Fish Stocks Agreement. Unless that agreement is fun-
damentally  revised  and  improved,  we  do  not  support  expanding  its  coverage  to  in-
clude the Northeast Pacific. 

If  strengthening  the  NW  Pacific  agreement  is  not  possible,  we  believe  the  U.S. 
should  pursue  a  new  agreement  for  the  Northeast  Pacific  without  delay.  It  is  far 
easier to negotiate strong conservation, management and enforcement measures be-
fore  foreign  fisheries  become  entrenched  and  stocks  are  depleted.  Deep  sea  fish 
stocks  are  typically  slow  growing  and  easily  overfished,  and  the  history  of  over-
fishing  and  depletion  in  high  seas  seamount  fisheries  throughout  the  Pacific  is  so-
bering. Therefore, recognizing that negotiating a new agreement is a large and cost-
ly undertaking, we nevertheless recommend the U.S. move quickly to close this gap. 
The Arctic 

Fish  distribution  and  abundance  in  the  Arctic  is  changing  as  the  ocean  warms, 
and  fishing  conditions  are  becoming  more  favorable.  But  our  scientific  under-
standing of evolving fish population dynamics in the region, and the impact of fish-
ing on the broader ecosystem, remains extremely limited. The North Pacific Fishery 
Management Council recently adopted precautionary restrictions on Arctic commer-
cial  fishing  to  allow  scientists  to  better  understand  the  changing  dynamics  of  the 
region,  and  to  permit  managers  to  develop  an  informed  fishery  management  plan 
to ensure sustainability of any future fishery. 

We  applaud  this  precautionary  approach,  and  support  a  similar  approach  for 
transboundary,  migratory  and  straddling  fish  stocks  that  may  be  subject  to  fishing 
by  other  Arctic  nations.  The  Arctic  fisheries  resolution  (S.J.  Res  17),  introduced  by 
Senator Stevens and passed by the Senate last summer, promotes the idea of a new 
international  fisheries  management  organization/s  for  the  region  to  manage  shared 
Arctic  stocks.  We  urge  the  U.S.  to  promote  restrictions  on  commercial  fishing  of 
shared stocks along the lines of what the North Pacific Council adopted for domestic 
Arctic fisheries. 

Finally,  negotiating  an  agreement  for  the  Arctic  should  be  a  top  priority  for  the 
United States. We cannot afford delay given the very rapid changes taking place in 
the  Arctic  marine  environment  and  the  clear  intent  of  some  Arctic  nations  to  in-
crease fishing capacity. 
Other regions 

Deep  sea  fisheries  remain  unregulated  in  a  number  of  other  high  seas  areas,  in-
cluding  the  northern  Indian  Ocean,  central  Atlantic  (south  of  the  NAFO  and 
NEAFC areas), and the south west Atlantic. In at least some of these areas unregu-
lated  bottom  fishing  targeting  seamounts  is  occurring.  In  addition,  some  RFMOs 
have  yet  to  make  satisfactory  progress  toward  meeting  the  mandates  of  U.N.  Reso-
lution  61/105.  The  U.S.  can  play  a  helpful  role  within  NAFO,  which  is  holding  an 
extraordinary meeting in May to discuss needed measures in this regard. 

In  2009,  the  U.N.  General  Assembly  will  review  progress  toward  meeting  the  re-
quirements of Resolution 61/105. The results of the review will lay the groundwork 
for  further  international  action  to  fill  the  holes  in  high  seas  fisheries  governance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

We  strongly  urge  the  United  States  to  play  an  active  role  in  organizing  the  review 
with  the  goal  of  ensuring  that  it  is  conducted  in  a  timely  and  meaningful  manner. 
b. Performance gaps 

The  performance  of  RFMOs  in  meeting  the  mandates  of  the  Fish  Stocks  Agree-
ment  and  other  relevant  instruments  varies  tremendously.  Without  accountability 
or  oversight,  there  is  little  incentive  for  RFMOs  to  improve  their  performance.  We 
have therefore supported efforts by the United States and others to initiate regular 
reviews of RFMO performance. 

The United States has been a leader in developing and beginning to apply criteria 
for such reviews. However to date these reviews have largely been self-audits. While 
those audits have yielded helpful information, we believe it is important for RFMOs 
to be reviewed by an independent body without a stake in the outcome. Just as few 
corporations  permit  employees  to  review  themselves,  or  schools  allow  students  to 
grade  themselves,  we  believe  RFMOs  would  benefit  from  regular  outside  review. 
Such  reviews  would  help  improve  performance,  harmonize  approaches  to  fisheries 
conservation and management and provide for greater exchange of strategies, meth-
odologies and regulatory approaches among RFMOs. 
c. Enforcement Gaps: Illegal, Unreported and Unregulated (IUU) Fishing 

FAO reports that IUU fishing activities are increasing, and now accounts for some 
30 percent of the catch in some important fisheries. IUU fishing contributes to over-
fishing,  habitat  destruction,  harmful  bycatch,  and  deprives  legitimate  fishermen  of 
harvest  opportunities.  Some  estimates  put  the  worldwide  value  of  illicit  catches  at 
least as high as $10 billion per year.4 

There  are  a  host  of  important  initiatives  under  way  to  address  IUU  fishing,  in-
cluding  those  mandated  by  the  2006  reauthorization  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act, 
and Section 113 of the 2007 Omnibus Appropriations Bill (H.R. 2764), both of which 
came about as the result of leadership by this Committee. 

Four international initiatives stand out as important elements of an international 

solution to IUU fishing. 

1. A global record of fishing vessels 

One of the greatest obstacles faced by fisheries enforcement authorities is the abil-
ity  of  IUU  fishing  vessels  to  rapidly  change  names,  ownership,  and  flag  to  evade 
enforcement. 

Work  is  now  underway  under  the  auspices  of  FAO  to  develop  a  global  record  of 
fishing  vessels  with  unique  identifiers  that  stay  with  the  vessel  forever,  regardless 
of  changes  in  ownership,  flag,  or  type  of  fishing.  Such  identifiers  would  greatly  fa-
cilitate  MCS,  and  go  a  long  way  to  prevent  and  deter  IUU.5 Combined  with  other 
measures,  such  as  those  envisioned  in  the  draft  Port  State  Agreement  and  an  ex-
panded MCS network, have the potential to foil efforts to avoid enforcement through 
renaming,  reflagging  and  changing  ownership  of  vessels.  The  estimated  cost  is 
$2.5m  for  the  development  phase  of  the  global  record  and  $600,000  per  year  for 
maintenance;  an  option  for  the  U.S.  to  consider  is  contributing  to  this  effort  finan-
cially. 

2. Centralized, tamper-proof VMS 

The  2006  UNGA  Fisheries  Resolution  (para  49)  urges  flag  states  to  require  VMS 
on  all  vessels  fishing  on  the  high  seas  as  soon  as  practicable  and  in  the  case  of 
large-scale  fishing  vessels  no  later  than  December  2008.  One  option  the  U.S.  could 
consider  is  to  either  prohibit  importation  of  fish  caught  by  such  large  scale  vessels 
without VMS after December 2008. Another option would be to subject all such ves-
sels to inspection once they enter U.S. ports. 

3. Port State Agreement 

Port  state  measures  are  aimed  at  vessels  engaged  in  IUU  fishing  that  seek  to 
avoid applicable conservation and management measures by landing catches outside 
the region in which the fish was caught and where officials have little or no knowl-
edge about the fish landed or applicable management measures. The U.S. is leading 
negotiations  to  develop  a  binding  Port  State  agreement.  The  current  draft  Agree-
ment,  which  will  be  finalized  next  year,  would  require  parties  to  deny  use  of  their 
ports for landing, transshipping or processing of fish if a foreign vessel: 

4 Closing the Net: Stopping Illegal Fishing on the High Seas, HSTF March 2006 at 3. 
5 Report  of  the  Expert  Consultation  on  the  Development  of  a  Comprehensive  GloblRecord  of 

Fishing Vessels, Rome, Italy, 25–28 February, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

—has been fishing in an RFMO area when that vessel’s flag state is not a mem-
ber of that RFMO (note the port state does not need to be a member of the rel-
evant RFMO); 
—has been sighted engaged in or supporting IUU fishing activities 
—is included in an RFMO IUU vessel list, or 
—has not been authorized to fish in the area by the competent RFMO or coastal 
state. 

The  Agreement  relies  on  advance  notification  of  detailed  information  by  vessels 
seeking  to  land  fish,  including  the  vessel’s  authorization  to  fish,  its  transshipment 
records,  relevant  regional  RFMO,  and  other  information.  It  is  up  to  the  Port  State 
to verify this information. One option for the U.S. to consider is pressing for manda-
tory flag State verification of a vessels’ information (as drafted the agreement allows 
verification  through  the  flag  State  but  does  not  require  it).  Repeated  failures  by  a 
flag State to provide verification could provide grounds for action against that State, 
which  may  in  turn  provide  an  effective  tool  against  flag  of  convenience  States  and 
thus have a broader impact on IUU fishing. 

4. EU-type Catch Documentation 

The European Commission has proposed a new catch certification scheme that fo-
cuses  on  the  fish  rather  than  on  the  vessel  as  in  the  Port  State  Agreement.  The 
proposal, which will be considered for approval by the European Council this June, 
aims to track fish ‘‘from the net to the plate.’’ Under this proposal, all fisheries prod-
ucts  imported  into  the  EU,  whether  fresh,  frozen  or  processed,  would  be  required 
to have validated catch certificates provided by the flag state that certifies the prod-
ucts are legal and that the vessel concerned holds the necessary licenses and quotas. 
This  would  facilitate  verification  that  fish  have  been  caught  legally,  even  if  they 
pass through a number of territories or processing before arriving in the EU market. 
One area worth considering is whether such an approach could work in the U.S.. 
Attacking IUU from both ends—the vessel and the catch—may be more effective at 
blocking IUU products from entering the U.S. market. Considering that the EU and 
the  U.S.  represent  two  of  the  three  largest  seafood  markets  in  the  world,  this  ap-
proach has the potential to make a major dent in IUU fishing. 
Conclusions and Recommendations 

The magnitude of the problems facing high seas fisheries calls for a major initia-
tive  to  chart  a  new  course.  As  a  major  fishing  nation,  as  a  leader  on  these  issues, 
and  as  one  of  the  world’s  largest  consumers  of  seafood,  the  U.S.  is  in  an  important 
position  to  lead  such  an  effort.  We  recommend  such  an  initiative  include  the  fol-
lowing elements. 

1. The U.S. should accede to the United Nations Convention on the Law of the 
Sea; 
2. Continued vigorous advocacy at the WTO to reduce and eventually eliminate 
the estimated $10–12 billion annual subsidies for fishing that fuel overcapacity 
and overfishing; 
3.  Fill  governance  gaps  for  species  and  areas  that  are  currently  unregulated, 
with a particular focus on the north Pacific and the Arctic; 
4. Address performance gaps through institution of regular independent review 
of RFMO performance against internationally accepted criteria; 
5. Play an active role in the UNGA 2009 review of the implementation of UNGA 
Resolution  61/105  regarding  unregulated  bottom  fisheries  with  the  goal  of  en-
suring that it is conducted in a timely and meaningful manner; 
6.  Provide  financial  and  political  support  for  the  establishment  of  a  global 
record of fishing vessels with unique identifiers; 
7.  Consider  import  or  other  restrictions  on  large  scale  vessels  without  VMS 
after December 31, 2008; 
8. Consider an EU-type catch documentation scheme; 
9.  Consider  pressing  for  mandatory  flag  state  verification  of  information  pro-
vided by foreign vessels under the draft Port State agreement; 
10. Lead by example: encourage NMFS to (a) promptly issue proposed revisions 
to  the  current  National  Standard  1  guidelines  to  ensure  that  overfishing  does 
not  occur  and  that  overfished  stocks  are  rebuilt  as  required  by  the  MSRA,  and 
(b) effectively implement the MSRA’s provisions on rebuilding, which if properly 
implemented  would  create  tens  of  thousands  of  additional  jobs,  increase  catch 
levels by 64 percent, and add more than $1 billion to the U.S. economy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

In closing, we again thank you and your staffs for your leadership on both domes-
tic and international fisheries. We look forward to working with you to address the 
challenges ahead. Thank you for the opportunity to testify. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  look  forward  to  dis-
cussing your latest comment. There is just a scarce amount of time 
to deal with this issue, and I hope that we can get together. 

To  the  great  credit  of  Secretary  Albright,  she  saw  the  problem 
and  went  with  us  when  we  went  to  the  U.N.  before.  I  hope  that 
Secretary  Rice  will  similarly  see  the  problem  with  regard  to  the 
Arctic, and I have not had a chance to really discuss that with her 
yet. But you are right. We can’t wait on that subject at all. 

Let  me  turn  to  Mr.  Cook,  though.  Mr.  Cook,  Senator  Inouye 
wanted  to  ask  a  couple  of  questions.  You  have  already  discussed 
part  of  his  question;  the  effectiveness  of  the  Western  and  Central 
Pacific  Fisheries  Commission  to  establish  conservation  and  man-
agement  efforts.  Do  you  think  they  have  been  successful  so  far  in 
their efforts? 

Mr. COOK. Senator, I am sorry to say I don’t. This is a relatively 
new  organization.  It  has  been  in  the  formative  stages  for  several 
years, but it still is relatively new. As you know, the island nations 
of  the  Pacific,  the  fisheries  there,  the  tuna  fisheries  are  really  the 
only  natural  resource  that  they  have.  They  want  to  sell  that  re-
source to the highest bidder. It makes that a very, very difficult sit-
uation to operate in. 

I  think  that  the  U.S.  brings  the  conservation  ethic  to  the 
WCPFC,  and  I  think  that  it  will  take  a  long  time  because  other 
members do not necessarily share that same ethic, and it will take 
a long time and a lot of convincing on our behalf to make these or-
ganizations  work.  It  is  simply  a  battle  that  we  have  to  fight,  and 
it will be a while getting it won. 

Senator  STEVENS.  He  said  he  wanted  to  know  whether  the 
WCPFC  has  cooperated  with  and  consulted  with  the  Inter-Amer-
ican  Tropical  Tuna  Commission.  Do  you  see  such  cooperation  tak-
ing place now? 

Mr. COOK. I believe there is some cooperation there. I am not an 
expert  in  that  area,  and  I  really  can’t  comment  on  it  extensively. 
Senator  STEVENS.  You  mentioned  the  council.  Does  the  council 
interact  with  both  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Commission 
and the WCPFC? 

Mr. COOK. Yes, they do. I think they do a very effective job work-
ing with both of those commissions. We have people from the coun-
cil that attend meetings at both of those commissions, and we keep 
constantly  up  with  them.  As  you  may  be  aware,  we  operate  under 
quotas for certain species under both of those, and so we are very, 
very  actively  engaged.  And  I  think  the  council  does  a  terrific  job 
representing  the  interests  of  the  U.S.  on  both  of  those  organiza-
tions. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Would  you  submit  to  us,  if  you  would,  any 
comments  you  might  have  on  what  might  be  done  to  increase  the 
effectiveness of the WCPFC and whether or not we might be in po-
sition to bring about a better relationship with the council? 

Mr. COOK. I will. Thank you. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Let  me  go  back  to  you,  Mr.  Benton.  Based  also  on  what  Ms. 
Speer  has  said,  I  think  we  have  acted  quickly  enough  to  put  down 
some  roadblocks  to  really  entering  into  the  zone  directly  north  of 
our  own  State.  But  I  don’t  think  we  have  been  very  effective  with 
looking at the whole Arctic Ocean as it might impede on that area 
once we take down the barriers. Now am I right? 

Mr.  BENTON.  Thank  you,  Senator  Stevens.  Yes,  I  think  you  are 
absolutely  dead-on.  I  think  that  the  fishery  management  council 
took  a  very  bold  step.  There  was  some  trepidation  there  for  a  bit 
on  their  part  when  they  first  did  it.  But  they  stepped  up  to  the 
plate,  as  they  have  often  done  for  conservation,  and  that  is  a  good 
step. 

But  when  you  look  at  the  Arctic  Basin,  sort  of  look  at  the  map 
looking  down  from  the  top,  we  have  got  a  real  challenge  ahead  of 
us here. As Ambassador Balton pointed out, there are fisheries oc-
curring  on  the  Atlantic  side  now,  and  a  lot  of  players  over  there, 
those  arrangements  over  there,  even  though  they  have  arrange-
ments, aren’t working all that well. It is my understanding. 

Our  relationship  with  our  Russian  neighbor  is  not  what  it  was 
a  decade  or  so  ago,  to  be  quite  honest.  And  I  have  also  heard,  as 
Ms.  Speer  mentioned,  that  overtures  had  been  made  to  both  Can-
ada  and  to  Russia  and  that  Russia  and  Canada  both  were  luke-
warm.  And  it  seems  to  me  that  we  do  need  to  up  the  ante  here. 
But I don’t think that we can do it just from a top-down approach. 
I like the idea of you taking—taking charge of this Arctic issue and 
giving it the profile it needs because it does need it. 

We  also,  though,  need  to  find  the  right  people  to  talk  with  the 
people  on  the  ground  on  the  Russian  side  to  get  some  support  in 
Russia for that kind of action as well. That is how we did it before. 
We worked both from the top and the bottom, and we got industry- 
to-industry  discussions  going  on.  We  had—you  know,  the  State  of 
Alaska  took  a  real  role  in  working  with  folks  in  Vladivostok  and 
Petropavlovsk  to  get  support  in  the  region  for  some  of  the  initia-
tives we took in the past. 

I  think  that  if  we  explained  it  correctly  and  if  we  had  an  initia-
tive such as Ms. Speer mentioned and you have hinted at of maybe 
you  taking  charge  of  this  and  taking  it  to  the  United  Nations  and 
taking  it  to  the  Secretary  of  State,  I  think  we  could  be  very  suc-
cessful,  and  I  think  we  could  turn  it  around.  I  don’t  see  that  kind 
of  aggressive,  coordinated  strategy  developing  yet,  and  it  needs  to 
do that very quickly because you are right. Time is not on our side. 
Senator STEVENS. Well, we are planning to do just that. But one 
of  the  problems  we  have  is  the  oil  and  gas  development  is  coming 
at us, too, with the Chukchi Sea sale and the interests of Shell now 
in the Arctic Ocean. I don’t know if you realize it, but the revenue- 
sharing  provisions  of  the  bill  that  passed  in  the  last  Congress  ex-
cluded  Alaska  from  participating  in  any  of  the  revenues  from  the 
outer continental shelf off our State. 

Strangely  enough,  the  revenues  from  any  development  off  our 
State  will  go  into  this  fund  that  was  created  by  that  legislation 
that  is  shared  by  Florida  and  Louisiana  and  Texas  and  parts  of 
California.  I  think  that  is,  right  now,  an  impediment,  and  I  have 
had  meetings  with  the  oil  industry.  They  agree.  They  think  there 
should be a portion of the revenues that go to the Federal Govern-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

ment  dedicated  to  the  basic  resource  protection  that  comes  from  a 
revenue-sharing concept. 

We  are  going  to  try  to  deal  with  that,  but  the  representatives  of 
the  oil  industry  also  recognize  the  fisheries  issues  are  acute  and 
want  to  be  involved  in  approaching  the  people  to  make  sure  that 
the  protection  measures  are  in  place.  So  if  there  is  any  damage 
that  comes  about  from  an  initiation  of  harvesting  of  the  fisheries, 
that they won’t be blamed for that, frankly. And I understand their 
fear  because  that  is  a  totally  virgin  area  for  any  kind  of  fishing. 
And  if  the  IUU  people  get  in  there,  it  is  going  to  be  an  over-
whelming damage immediately. It would harm the future of the oil 
and gas prospects, I think. 

Ms.  Speer,  do  you  have  any  knowledge  of  what  happened  in  the 
Norwegian area? There has been oil and gas development there, as 
I  understand  it.  In  the  same  areas  there  has  been  some  of  the  in-
trusion of the IUU fisheries. Ms. Speer, are you familiar at all with 
that area? 

Ms.  SPEER.  I  am  not.  Unfortunately,  not  with  respect  to  the  oil 
and gas interests there. But I think you are raising a really impor-
tant issue. The thing that worries us most is the oil and gas devel-
opment that is conducted on the Russian side. 

It  is  not  subject  to  the  same  kind  of  controls  we  have  here,  and 
a devastating event on the Russian side could have implications for 
the  entire  Arctic,  including  our  zone,  including  our  fisheries.  And 
I think having a larger engagement with the Russians over the fu-
ture of the Arctic is going to be very important. 

I  don’t  know  how  to  make  that  happen  other  than  to  have  a 
much higher-level engagement than we have right now. The Presi-
dent, you know—I know your friend Sylvia Earle was at the Easter 
Egg  Roll  with  the  President  a  few  weeks  ago,  and  she  mentioned 
this. And she is very interested in trying to pursue this. 

Maybe there is a way to get interest in engagement at the White 
House  for  moving  forward  with  this,  linked  to  the  Law  of  the  Sea 
and other related issues. 

Senator  STEVENS.  You  are  right.  She  has  a  very  great  approach 

to all these issues, and I enjoy working with her. 

You  have  mentioned  overfishing  on  the  high  seas,  and  I  assume 
you  are  speaking  of  the  Gulf  of  Alaska.  Where  are  you  talking 
about, your comments about overfishing in the high seas? 

Ms.  SPEER.  I  was  talking  about  overfishing  on  the  seamounts  of 
the  Northwest  Pacific,  which  is  the  subject  of  the  current  negotia-
tion  going  on  between  Japan  and  the  United  States,  Russia,  and 
Korea  to  negotiate  a  fisheries  agreement  as  a  result  of  the  U.N. 
General  Assembly’s  resolution.  This  is  a  chain  of  seamounts  that 
extends  from  the  northwest  Hawaiian  Islands  up  to  the  Aleutians, 
and  it  is  really  an  extraordinary  area.  And  it  has  been  overfished 
for a long, long time. 

And it is continuing, and we are now learning that the effects of 

that are—— 

Senator STEVENS. What vessels are involved? Are these IUU ves-

sels, or are these tuna fleets? 

Ms.  SPEER.  Well,  they  are  U  vessels.  They  are  unregulated  ves-
sels  in  terms  of  international  control.  There  are  somewhere  be-
tween two and eight Japanese vessels. There is one Korean vessel, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

and there is an unknown number of Russian vessels. The Russians 
don’t seem to have a good grip on how many vessels they have. 
Senator STEVENS. Is that the area you mentioned, too, Dave? 
Mr.  BENTON.  Yes,  Senator,  that  seamount  chain  that  stretches 
from  Hawaii  up  toward  the  Aleutian  Islands  is  where  those  fish-
eries  are  occurring  now,  and  the  fishing  that  is  going  on  there  is 
a definite concern. 

The  problem  that  I  see  and  I  think  the  problem  that  Ms.  Speer 
also  sees  is  the  piecemeal  approach  to  dealing  with  this.  There  is 
equally  large  and  important  seamount  provinces  in  the  eastern 
North Pacific Ocean that extend up into the Gulf of Alaska and up 
into our own waters. Right now, it is not a really large fishery that 
is  going  on  there.  As  Ms.  Speer  pointed  out,  there  is  probably 
maybe  20  vessels  that  are  over  there,  but  they  are  having  a  very 
significant effect. 

And  if  we  have  sort  of  a  situation  where  we  squeeze  the  balloon 
in the Northwest Pacific, then they are going to move over into our 
part  of  the  world  or  other  fleets  potentially  can.  That  is  why  we 
support a comprehensive solution, one that covers the entire Pacific 
Ocean and deals with protecting areas like seamounts. 

You know, the North Pacific Council closed the seamounts in our 
own  waters,  and  we  did  that  in  recognition  that  seamounts  are  a 
very  unique  habitat.  Seamount  fishing  in  other  parts  of  the  world 
is  an  important  way  of  doing  it,  but  I  think  off  of  Hawaii  inside 
our own zone, we have pretty adequate controls on how you do that 
without damaging seamount resources. 

But  we  won’t  see  that  in  the  international  waters  unless  we  get 
a  comprehensive  agreement  and  we  get  regulations  put  in  place. 
But  if  we  don’t  do  that  for  the  entire  area  between  Asia  and  the 
Americas,  we  are  not  solving  the  problem.  We  are  just  moving  the 
problem. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Do  we  have  any  information  at  all  about  any 
fishing  that  is  up  in  the  area,  the  Baffin  Islands  on  the  Canadian 
side? 

Mr. BENTON. Up on the Arctic side? 
Senator STEVENS. Yes. 
Mr.  BENTON.  There  is,  I  think,  some  small  near-shore  coastal 
subsistence  fisheries  that  are  occurring  up  in  that  area,  but  noth-
ing of any consequence. 

Senator STEVENS. You haven’t heard of any commercial fisheries 

up there, have you? 

Mr.  BENTON.  No.  I  don’t  believe  there  are  any.  And  there  is  a 
very small semi-commercial fishery at the mouth of the Mackenzie 
River as well. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I thank you very much, and I thank the 
Chairman  for  allowing  us  to  have  this  hearing  in  his  absence  be-
cause  I  think  it  is  important  for  us  to  get  a  record  and  proceed  on 
it. I do plan to approach the Secretary and to try to enlist not only 
the  Secretary  of  State,  but  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  in  terms  of 
a concept of trying to dig into this issue. 

As  I  said,  the  area  north  of  our  State,  I  think  it  is  totally  virgin 
territory,  and  north  of  Wrangel  Island  and  Russia,  too,  I  don’t 
think  there  has  been  much  commercial  fishing  up  there  either.  I 
do  think  that  we  have  a  chance  to  show  what  scientific  manage-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

ment could bring and maybe hold as an example to the other coun-
tries  of  the  Arctic  what  can  be  done  if  they  really  assert  their  au-
thority to protect the fishery resources of the Arctic Ocean. 

Most  people  seem  to  think  the  ice  is  going  to  disappear  alto-
gether. It will be there in the wintertime. We are not going to have 
any wintertime fisheries I am told, but the summer fisheries could 
be  just  zip  in  and  zip  out  if  we  are  not  careful.  If  there  is  unregu-
lated access to the Arctic Ocean through the Bering Straits, we are 
going to be in trouble. 

The  concepts  of  freedom  of  navigation  would  apply  to  that  area, 
and  we  have  to  find  ways  to  limit  that  with  regard  to  vessels  that 
could do a great harm to fishery resources. We have not mentioned 
the  basic  problem  that  a  lot  of  the  basic  food  chain  for  the  fishery 
resources  of  the  North  Pacific  originate  in  the  Arctic  area.  That  is 
my  information,  and  I  do  think  that  we  ought  to  pursue  it  and 
make sure that information is correct. 

Mr.  Cook,  the  Chairman  gives  you  his  apologies,  and  I  spoke  to 
him. He deserves to be where he is, and I hope he stays in bed be-
cause he had a bad cold. 

Ms. Speer? 
Ms. SPEER. I just wanted to say one more thing. The United Na-
tions  is  a  terribly  dysfunctional  body,  but  it  is  a  place  where  you 
can make progress, and people remember you. They really do. And 
I  think  there  is  a  lot  of  discussion  of  Arctic  issues,  but  people  are 
looking for a leader. And I think if you came to the United Nations, 
it would have a very big impact in elevating this issue. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I thank you for that. That is why I asked 
the  Chairman  to  allow  us  to  have  this  hearing.  You  don’t  go  up 
there  until  you  are  ready,  and  you  have  to  be  sure  you  have  your 
own  people  with  you.  The  reason  we  succeeded  in  terms  of  the 
driftnet  fishery  was  that  we  went  from  the  hearing  to  Secretary 
Albright and then to the U.N. together. 

A  Senator  can’t  rush  up  to  the  U.N.  and  say,  ‘‘Look,  guys,  listen 
to  me.’’  It  has  to  be  as  a  representative  of  his  country.  They  have 
to be behind the Senator before that takes place. So I hope that we 
can go from here and to the Cabinet and then to the President and 
then  to  the  U.N.  And  it  would  be  much  better  if  I  had  the  Presi-
dent of the United States speaking to the U.N. about protecting the 
Arctic Ocean. I hope we can convince him to do that. 

So  thank  you  all  very  much.  As  I  said,  there  may  be  questions 
submitted by any members of the Committee. There is a debate on 
the floor about housing. So I understand why they are not here and 
I am. But I am where I want to be. 

Thank you very much. 
[Whereupon, at 11:25 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Americans are among the top consumers of seafood products in the world. Despite 
the  strength  of  the  U.S.  seafood  industry,  the  majority  of  these  products  are  im-
ported.  Yet  all  too  often  we  are  completely  unaware  of  the  product  history  of  the 
seafood we consume: where it has been, how it was harvested and whether it is safe. 
With  respect  to  seafood  safety,  Senator  Stevens  and  I  have  recently  introduced 
legislation  to  help  ensure  that  imported  seafood  products  are  properly  inspected, 
deemed safe, and meet the food safety standards that American consumers deserve. 
Along with ensuring that seafood is safe for consumption, it is critically important 

that we ensure fish are harvested in a sustainable manner. 

The  problems  of  illegal,  unreported,  and  unregulated  (IUU)  fishing,  coupled  with 
global overfishing in general, have had a significant impact on our marine environ-
ment and on our economy. 

With  the  reauthorization  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and 
Management  Act,  the  United  States  is  committed  now,  more  than  ever  before  to 
thwart destructive fishing practices. 

Marine science tells us, however, that many fish stocks know no boundaries, and 
in fact traverse across national maritime borders and into the high seas. We there-
fore need responsible, cooperative, balanced and enforceable international conserva-
tion and management agreements for fisheries. 

With  this  goal  in  mind,  I  am  especially  concerned  with  the  inability  of  the  Inter- 
American Tropical Tuna Convention (IATTC) and the Western Central Pacific Fish-
eries  Commission  (WCPFC)  to  reach  consensus  on  establishing  and  enforcing  man-
agement and conservation measures for tuna, specifically bigeye tuna, in the Pacific. 
I  am  also  concerned  that  while  our  fishermen  are  stepping  up  to  the  plate,  an  un-
even playing field is being created because of the members of the Commissions that 
will  not  make  decisions  and  are  allowing  their  fishermen  to  continue  in  an  unfet-
tered manner with bad practices. 

To the extent that conservation and management measures are currently in place, 
I have significant concerns regarding the ability of the responsible agencies to effec-
tively  enforce  existing  mandates.  I  hope  that  today’s  witnesses  can  help  us  identify 
gaps  in  enforcement  that  exist  under  the  current  regime,  and  recommend  how  we 
can  better  position  these  agencies  and  our  country  to  address  foreign  fishing  incur-
sions  into  our  waters,  and  how  can  we  increase  our  role  in  combating  IUU  both  at 
home and on the high seas. 

Responsible and enforceable conservation and management will help ensure a sus-
tainable  supply  of  fish  both  within  our  Exclusive  Economic  Zone  (EEZ)  and  on  the 
high seas. 

I  look  forward  to  working  with  the  witnesses  before  the  Committee  today  to 

strengthen the role of the United States on these crucial fisheries issues. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 
I’d like to thank Chairman Inouye and Co-Chairman Stevens for holding this im-

portant hearing today. 

I  would  like  to  start  out  by  expressing  my  sorrow  for  the  recent  tragedy  of  the 
Alaska  Ranger,  which  sank  near  the  Aleutian  Islands  on  February  23.  My  condo-
lences  go  out  to  the  families  and  friends  of  the  five  crewmembers  who  were  lost, 
and to the rest of the crew who endured this harrowing ordeal. 

I  would  also  like  to  recognize  the  courage  of  the  Coast  Guard  members  who 
braved  extremely  difficult  conditions  to  conduct  a  heroic  rescue—saving  dozens  of 
crewmembers’ lives. 

The  results  of  the  investigations  into  the  Alaska  Ranger  incident  will  be  of  the 
utmost  importance  as  we  learn  what  went  wrong  so  we  can  determine  what  steps 
to take to make sure such tragedies are not repeated in the future. 

(67) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

International Fisheries 

68 

By  its  very  nature,  fishing  is  a  truly  international  endeavor.  Fish  don’t  restrict 
their  movement  to  geopolitical  borders,  and  the  health  of  international  fish  stocks 
is critical to the livelihood of fishermen in the Pacific Northwest and throughout the 
world. 

Last  year,  more  than  $1  billion  worth  of  seafood  was  imported  into  the  Port  of 
Seattle  from  dozens  of  other  countries,  including  Ecuador,  Greenland,  Malaysia, 
Canada, Sri Lanka, China, and Russia. We also exported over $1.1 billion of seafood 
to just as many countries. 

Because  of  this  international  nature,  what  happens  in  high  seas  fisheries  is  both 
everyone’s  responsibility  and,  at  the  same  time,  nobody’s  responsibility.  We  cannot 
let this fact tempt us into inaction. 

We  must  hold  ourselves  accountable  to  play  an  active  role  in  ensuring  that  the 
world’s fisheries are managed in a responsible, sustainable way that preserves their 
integrity for future generations. 
Fisheries Management 

Effective fisheries management is a complicated and difficult job. 
Our experience tells us, though. that it requires a few key building blocks: 

1.  It  Requires  an  Effective  Management  Authority—There  must  be  a  manage-
ment organization with a clear mandate, clear lines of authority, and the ability 
to effectively regulate, control, and limit harvest. 
2. It Requires Reliable Scientific Data—We must be able to reliably and consist-
ently  track  changes  in  fish  populations,  and  understand  when  they  are  going 
up, down, or sideways so we can take wise management actions that the fishing 
industry will believe and accept. 
3.  It  Requires  the  Long-term  Interest  of  Stakeholders  in  Conservation—Fisher-
men need to believe that maintaining the health of the fisheries is in their best 
interest. From time to time, catches will inevitably need to be reduced, and get-
ting cooperation and buy-in from the fishermen to do this is essential. 

These three prerequisites are only a starting point, but they are an important and 

necessary foundation. 

If we don’t get these building blocks right, there is little hope that we will achieve 

the sustainable fishing practices that our oceans deserve. 
Fisheries in International Waters 

Unfortunately,  the  international  community  has  largely  failed  to  achieve  these 

few key building blocks for international fisheries. 

Management  of  international  fisheries  is  done  through  a  patchwork  of  regional 
fishery management organizations. A glance at a map of these organizations shows 
that they are a confused and disorganized mess of overlapping jurisdictions. 

Famous for their ineffectiveness, these organizations are far from the strong inter-

national management authorities we need. 

Scientific data on international fisheries is often lacking, leaving scientists to rely 

on uncertain models (and sometimes guesswork) to make management decisions. 

Where data do exist, it is often questionable or incomplete. 
Nations that do provide reliable data usually demand anonymity on who is fishing 
where,  preventing  scientists  from  understanding  which  nations  are  acting  respon-
sibly, and which are causing damage. 

On  conservation,  the  international  fishing  community  has  not  yet  accepted  that 
conservation is in their long-term best interest. The business of international fishing 
is still too focused on short-term interests and dollars-and-cents. 

This  means  that  responsible,  conservation-minded  fishing  practices  in  inter-

national waters are the exception—not the rule. 
Moving Forward 

There  are  many  issues  to  complain  about  with  international  fisheries,  and  many 

of these topics will undoubtedly be raised here today. 

I believe, though, that it is important to understand that the United States is just 

There  is  only  so  much  that  we  can  actually  control,  and  there  are  limits  to  what 

the United States alone can achieve. 

We can, however, play an active and productive role. 
To do this, we must focus on the things that lie within our control, and push the 
international  community  to  develop  a  basic  foundation  upon  which  all  sustainable 
fisheries must be based. 

one player. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

We  must  ask  how  we  can  be  more  effective  players  in  the  international  fisheries 

nizations? 

• How can we help foster the development of effective regional management orga-
• What can we do to improve the science of international fisheries and to encour-
• And how can our government convince others that conservation is in their best 
interest—encouraging  them  to  adopt  fishing  practices  that  are  less  destructive, 
more sustainable, and reduce bycatch? 

age the open, transparent collection and sharing of reliable scientific data? 

We must also look ahead to the challenges facing us in the coming years and dec-

world: 

ades. 

We must consider the future role of rapidly growing nations like China. As China 
continues  to  industrialize,  it  has  the  potential  to  play  a  major  role  in  the  future  of 
fisheries in the high seas. 

It  is  also  essential  that  the  international  community—including  the  United 
States—find a way to more effectively deal with illegal, unregulated, and unreported 
fishing. 

Achieving  effective  international  management  will  mean  nothing  if  people  don’t 

follow the rules. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  convening  today’s  hearing  on  International  Fish-
eries: Management and Enforcement. As Ranking Member on the Subcommittee on 
Oceans,  Atmosphere,  Fisheries,  and  Coast  Guard,  I  am  fully  aware  of  the  vital  im-
plications of these issues not only for our domestic industries, but in some cases for 
the global viability of entire species. 

In a seminal article first published in the journal Science in 1968, Garrett Hardin 
described the ‘‘tragedy of the commons’’—a scenario in which the freedom of individ-
uals  to  exploit  commonly  held  property  must  inherently  lead  to  its  ruin.  Hardin 
based his theory on the assumption that individuals will seek to increase their yield 
from  the  common  property  because  in  the  absence  of  regulation,  if  they  don’t  do  it, 
someone  else  will.  As  pressure  increases  the  resource  is  used  up  faster  and  faster 
until it is completely destroyed. 

Part of passage of the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management 
Act  in  1976  was  Congress’  recognition  that  the  tragedy  of  the  commons  was  occur-
ring  in  the  fisheries  of  the  United  States.  Fish  stocks  were  declining,  fishing  pres-
sure  was  increasing,  and  catch  rates  were  spiraling  into  an  abyss  from  which  we 
feared  our  stocks  might  not  recover.  Today,  I  see  that  tragedy  once  more  playing 
itself  out,  this  time  on  a  global  stage,  and  while  the  United  States  cannot  manage 
this  crisis  alone,  we  can  and  must  be  world  leaders  in  the  fight  to  protect  the  fish-
eries  that  put  food  on  our  tables,  and  to  safeguard  the  species  that  are  in  danger 
of abject collapse. 

I would point to the example of bluefin tuna, a species that has been a vital com-
ponent  of  the  New  England  fishing  industry  for  decades.  In  recent  years,  demand 
for  this  fish,  prized  by  sushi  connoisseurs,  has  skyrocketed  leading  to  dockside 
prices  that  can  reach  tens  of  thousand  dollars  per  fish.  Despite  out  best  efforts  to 
manage  bluefin  stocks  under  an  international  agreement,  the  world’s  population  is 
estimated to have declined by over ninety percent in the last 30 years. These figures 
are  reflected  in  New  England  where  the  catch  in  2006—the  most  recent  year  in 
which figures are available—was just 124.3 metric tons, less than 10 percent of the 
fishery’s  peak  of  1,390  metric  tons.  In  Maine,  the  problem  was  even  more  acute, 
with  just  9.1  metric  tons  landed  in  2006,  a  level  of  futility  that  exceeds  anything 
we have experienced in the past half century. 

We  in  the  U.S.  are  doing  our  part  to  prevent  overharvesting  of  bluefin,  but  this 
is  a  problem  that  extends  beyond  our  waters,  across  the  Atlantic  Ocean,  and  into 
the  Mediterranean  Sea.  And  until  the  other  countries  that  share  this  valuable  fish 
stock stop overfishing and start managing the resource for the long term, the bluefin 
population will continue to dwindle. 

The  bluefin  tuna  fishery  is  just  one  example  of  the  struggles  our  fisheries  cur-
rently  face  to  meet  the  rising  demand  for  seafood  while  maintaining  sustainable 
harvest levels and healthy fishing communities. The U.S. cannot go it alone, but we 
can  influence  global  policy  through  more  than  a  dozen  Regional  Fishery  Manage-
ment  Organizations  to  which  we  belong.  To  enhance  our  efforts  in  this  regard,  I 
worked alongside many of my colleagues on this Committee—Senator Stevens nota-
ble  among  them—to  include  in  the  most  recent  reauthorization  of  the  Magnuson- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

Stevens  Act  several  provisions  enhancing  our  authority  to  enforce  international 
treaties and agreements to which the U.S. is a party, and to impose import restric-
tions on nations that fail to adhere to these standards. 

And as we strive to protect the world’s dwindling fish stocks, we must also protect 
our  domestic  fisheries.  The  fishing  industry  has  been  integral  to  my  home  state  of 
Maine  for  generations,  and  in  2006,  Maine’s  fishery  landings  were  valued  at  over 
$368  million.  Given  our  state’s  reputation,  it  should  surprise  no  one  that  the  vast 
majority  of  that  figure,  nearly  $300  million,  came  from  a  single  species:  lobster. 
Today,  Maine’s  lobster  industry  faces  numerous  challenges,  but  paramount  among 
them  are  new  regulations  that  will  require  our  lobstermen  to  fish  using  sinking 
rope,  ostensibly  to  protect  endangered  species  of  whales.  The  Maine  Lobstermen’s 
Association  has  estimated  that  these  regulations  will  cost  each  fisherman  $10  to 
$15,000  in  the  first  year  alone,  and  will  pose  a  serious  safety  risk  in  some  areas. 
Meanwhile, lobstermen working just across the Maritime Boundary Line in Cana-
dian  waters  face  no  similar  restrictions  despite  plying  the  same  type  of  ocean  bot-
tom  for  the  same  lobsters  and  interacting  with  the  same  endangered  whales.  This 
blatantly flawed system creates a double-standard for the lobster industry, allowing 
Canadian lobstermen to pocket additional profits, and to the extent that lobster gear 
poses  a  risk  to  whales,  it  fails  to  protect  these  critically  endangered  species  on  one 
side of a line that is entirely meaningless from an ecological perspective. This is why 
I introduced a resolution calling for the U.S. to enter into bilateral negotiations with 
Canada  to  develop  a  joint  management  system  that  will  level  the  playing  field  for 
our  fishermen  while  affording  increased  protection  to  our  endangered  species  of 
whales. 

Ultimately,  if  the  world  is  to  avoid  turning  its  high  seas  into  a  vast  ‘‘tragedy  of 
the  commons,’’  it  will  require  a  legitimate  commitment  from  all  fishing  nations  to 
recognize  that  the  future  of  fishing  lies  not  in  vacuuming  the  life  out  of  our  seas 
today,  but  in  responsible,  forward-thinking  management  practices  that  allow  fish 
populations  to  regenerate  themselves  tomorrow.  I  want  to  thank  Deputy  Secretary 
Negroponte, and all of our witnesses for taking the time to be here today to address 
these  critical  issues  and  to  help  find  a  way  toward  a  sustainable  future  for  the 
world’s fish stocks and our fishing communities. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

HON. JOHN NEGROPONTE 

Question 1. The absence of sanction measures within the Regional Fisheries Man-
agement  Organizations  (RFMOs)  appears  to  be  a  significant  challenge  in  enforcing 
any  strong  fisheries  management  measures  within  those  organizations.  Do  you 
agree  that  this  is  a  problem?  Will  the  U.S.  propose  more  stringent  sanction  meas-
ures within the RFMOs that it plays an active role in? 

Answer. The United States has been a leading proponent of ensuring that RFMOs 
have a comprehensive suite of tools to enforce compliance with agreed conservation 
and  management  measures.  We  developed  the  first  schemes  within  the  Inter-
national  Commission  for  the  Conservation  of  Atlantic  Tunas  (ICCAT)  to  use  trade 
measures  to  address  actions  by  non-members  whose  vessels  were  undermining 
ICCAT  measures.  We  later  worked  to  expand  these  measures  to  members  as  well, 
and developed a process by which members would be automatically subject to quota 
reductions  when  they  exceed  their  annual  limits.  In  the  Northwest  Atlantic  Fish-
eries  Organization  (NAFO),  we  drafted  the  first  measures  to  restrict  vessels  engag-
ing  in  illegal,  unreported,  or  unregulated  (IUU)  fishing  from  landing  or  trans-
shipping  catch  taken  in  contravention  of  NAFO  rules  in  members’  ports.  Other 
RFMOs, including the Commission for the Conservation of Antarctic Living Marine 
Resources  (CCAMLR)  and  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Commission  (IATTC) 
have since adopted similar trade or landing restrictions, and almost all RFMOs have 
adopted  schemes  for  identifying  and  sanctioning  vessels  that  are  engaged  in  IUU 
fishing. 

But  the  strong  tools  already  available  within  most  RFMOs  can  only  be  effective 
if  all  parties  have  the  will  and  the  capacity  to  use  them.  While  there  may  be  addi-
tional steps we can take to strengthen and expand existing sanctions measures, our 
main  concern  is  the  lack  of  political  will  by  all  RFMO  members  to  take  the  nec-
essary actions to comply with agreed rules. 

Another key element is ensuring that all RFMOs develop comprehensive schemes 
to improve the monitoring, control, and surveillance of the fisheries under their pur-
view.  Measures  intended  to  deal  with  compliance  problems  that  have  already  oc-
curred  are  most  effective  when  they  complement  an  appropriate  mix  of  control 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

measures  including  effective  observer  schemes,  high  seas  or  port  inspection  pro-
grams, catch and trade tracking systems, or transshipment regulations. 

71 

Question 2. I understand that the U.S. is playing a lead role in negotiating a new 
global  agreement  under  the  auspices  of  the  Food  and  Agricultural  Organization  of 
the  United  Nations  (FAO)  to  restrict  access  to  ports  to  vessels  that  cannot  certify 
that their catch has been caught legally or that have a history of illegal fishing. Can 
you  provide  an  update  on  those  negotiations?  Do  you  expect  these  agreements  to 
apply  to  only  fishing  vessels,  or  carrier  vessels  as  well?  What  actions  can  the  U.S. 
take in the meantime—domestically as well as through the RFMOs—to deny access 
to U.S. markets to illegally-caught fish? 

Answer.  The  United  States  joined  with  other  members  of  the  Food  and  Agri-
culture Organization of the United Nations (FAO) in agreeing to negotiate a legally 
binding  instrument  on  Port  State  Measures  to  control  IUU  fishing.  The  United 
States  hosted  an  expert  consultation  in  September  2007,  which  produced  a  first 
draft of such a treaty. This first draft covers all vessels—catcher vessels and carrier 
vessels—that are bringing to port fish that has not been previously landed and sets 
minimum  standards  for  port  States  to  prohibit  landing  or  transshipment  of  fish 
caught  in  a  manner  that  undermines  international  conservation  and  management 
efforts. The final scope of the agreement will be the subject of negotiations that will 
begin  at  FAO  headquarters  in  Rome  in  June.  The  goal  is  to  produce  a  treaty  that 
can  be  adopted  at  the  next  meeting  of  the  FAO  Committee  on  Fisheries  in  March 
2009. 

We  believe  that  this  goal  can  be  achieved.  Most  governments  and  interested 
stakeholders  recognize  the  desirability  of  having  a  minimum  set  of  port  State  con-
trols  that  apply  on  a  worldwide  basis.  The  FAO  has  already  developed  a  Model 
Scheme  on  Port  State  Measures,  which  has  usefully  influenced  the  development  of 
port controls by individual nations and by regional fisheries management organiza-
tions  (RFMOs).  But  a  treaty  would  increase  the  chances  that  port  States,  individ-
ually  and  through  RFMOs,  will  harmonize  such  controls  and  raise  the  costs  of  en-
gaging in IUU fishing. 

In the meantime, we understand that NOAA fisheries is completing the final rule-
making  process  to  ensure  the  United  States  can  implement  its  commitments  under 
the  RFMO  IUU  vessel  listing  schemes  to  which  we  are  bound.  This  will  allow  us 
to  prevent  use  of—or  in  some  cases  even  access  to—our  ports  by  listed  vessels.  We 
also  helped  to  develop  an  expedited  process  by  which  NAFO  may  add  IUU  vessels 
listed  by  the  North  East  Atlantic  Fisheries  Commission  (NEAFC)  to  its  IUU  list, 
and  we  later  helped  to  develop  a  similar  measure  in  ICCAT  to  allow  the  reciprocal 
inclusion  of  vessels  listed  by  any  tuna  RFMO  on  the  ICCAT  list.  These  measures 
give the United States the ability to act against IUU vessels identified even by orga-
nizations,  such  as  NEAFC,  to  which  the  United  States  is  not  a  party  and  substan-
tially increase our ability to restrict entry of IUU-caught fish into the United States. 
Question  3.  What  steps  is  the  U.S.  taking  within  the  RFMOs  to  ensure  that  vul-

nerable seafloor habitats are protected from bottom trawling? 

Answer.  The  United  States,  at  its  highest  levels  of  government,  recognizes  that 
the effects of destructive fishing practices on vulnerable marine ecosystems (VMEs) 
in  all  parts  of  the  oceans  are  a  serious  problem.  As  such,  we  strongly  support  the 
2006 United Nations General Assembly resolution (61/105) that calls for specific ac-
tions by States and regional fisheries management organizations and arrangements 
(RFMO/As) to protect VMEs by the end of 2008. The United States has been a lead-
er  in  protecting  VMEs  from  significant  adverse  impacts  (SAIs)  of  certain  types  of 
fishing  activities,  including  bottom  trawling,  both  domestically  and  through  RFMO/ 
As. 

The United States is party to two RFMO/As with the competence to regulate bot-
tom  fisheries  and  protect  VMEs:  the  Commission  for  the  Conservation  of  Antarctic 
Marine  Living  Resources  (CCAMLR)  and  the  Northwest  Atlantic  Fisheries  Organi-
zation (NAFO). 

At the 2007 Annual CCAMLR Commission meeting, the U.S. proposed a conserva-
tion measure to implement UNGA resolution 61/105, which was ultimately adopted 
by  a  consensus  of  the  Parties.  The  measure,  which  covers  all  bottom  fishing  activi-
ties  (the  use  of  any  gear  that  interacts  with  the  bottom),  freezes  the  footprint  of 
such  activities  to  areas  currently  approved  for  bottom  fishing  through  November 
2008. Then, starting December 1, all individual bottom fishing activities are subject 
to  assessment  by  Scientific  Committee.  The  measure  will  be  reviewed  in  2008  and 
in 2009, and biennially thereafter, to assess its effectiveness. 

In NAFO, the United States participated in the development of a measure adopt-
ed  in  2006  that  resulted  in  the  closure  of  four  seamounts  to  all  demersal  gear  for 
period of 2007–2010, with an option for exploratory fishing based on Scientific Com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

mittee  advice.  In  2007,  the  U.S.  worked  to  secure  further  protections  in  NAFO 
through  the  establishment  of  a  Coral  Protection  measure  that  closed  certain  areas 
to all fishing from January 2008 to December 2012. The United States actively par-
ticipated  in  the  recent  special  NAFO  Intersessional  Meeting  to  develop  further 
measures  for  VMEs  to  implement  resolution  61/105.  We  are  pleased  that  at  that 
Meeting the Parties were able to adopt a measure that is fully consistent with reso-
lution 61/105. We look forward to working with Contracting Parties at the upcoming 
Annual NAFO Commission Meeting to further elaborate certain aspects of the meas-
ure. 

In addition, the United States is an active participant in two ongoing negotiations 
to  establish  regional  fisheries  management  arrangements  for  non-highly  migratory 
high  seas  fisheries  in  the  Northwest  Pacific  and  the  South  Pacific  Ocean.  In  Feb-
ruary  2007,  the  participants  in  the  Northwest  Pacific  negotiations  adopted  a  set  of 
interim  measures  that  are  consistent  with  UNGA  resolution  61/105.  These  interim 
measures  were  further  strengthened  in  October  2007.  As  discussions  continue  to-
ward a more permanent management arrangement for this area, the U.S. delegation 
has  proposed  expanding  the  scope  to  include  a  broader  area  of  the  North  Pacific, 
including the area adjacent the U.S. EEZ off Alaska and the west coast of the conti-
nental  United  States,  so  that  this  area  is  not  left  unregulated.  In  May  2007,  the 
United  States  brokered  the  adoption  of  interim  measures  for  South  Pacific  region 
that are also fully consistent with resolution 61/105, and which will apply until per-
manent measures are adopted by the future RFMO. 

Further, the United States has continually called upon other nations to take simi-
lar  actions  within  areas  under  their  respective  national  jurisdiction,  much  as  the 
United States has done and continues to do. The United States has the largest EEZ 
in  the  world  and  has  taken  very  significant  steps  to  protect  VMEs,  including 
seamounts, hydrothermal vents and cold-water corals, from destructive fishing prac-
tices, including bottom-trawling, that has adverse impacts on VMEs. 

Question  4.  The  European  Community  has  proposed  a  certification  scheme  which 
would  require  that  all  seafood  products  imported  into  the  EU  receive  prior  certifi-
cation from the appropriate flag state that the products are legal and that the vessel 
holds  the  necessary  licenses,  permits  and  quotas.  Does  the  U.S.  have  any  plans  for 
implementing a tracing or certification system? Would a system like the EU’s work 
for the United States? How do we ensure that certification systems actually reduces 
IUU fishing, rather than just directing IUU products to other markets without simi-
lar certification systems in place? 

Answer.  In  October  2007,  the  European  Commission  introduced  a  suite  of  pro-
posed  regulations  intended  to  close  European  markets  to  IUU-caught  fish  and 
strengthen  tools  to  combat  IUU  fishing  by  vessels  and  nationals  from  both  EU 
Member  States  and  third  countries.  The  centerpiece  of  the  plan  is  a  new  require-
ment  that  all  fisheries  products  imported  into  the  EU,  whether  fresh,  frozen,  or 
processed,  must  be  accompanied  by  prior  certification  from  the  flag  State  of  the 
catching  vessel  that  the  products  are  legal  and  that  the  vessel  concerned  held  the 
necessary  licenses  and  quotas.  These  catch  certificates  may  either  be  established 
under  a  bilateral  arrangement  or  pursuant  to  a  multilateral  catch  documentation 
scheme, and they will follow the fish or fish products throughout the market chain. 
We understand the proposals are undergoing considerable discussion among Mem-
ber  States,  and  support  is  mixed.  They  are  now  scheduled  to  be  taken  up  by  the 
EU Council of Fisheries Ministers in June. 

The  United  States  has  already  implemented  catch  or  trade  tracking  systems 
adopted  by  CCAMLR  for  toothfish  species,  by  ICCAT  and  IATTC  for  frozen  bigeye 
tuna,  and  by  ICCAT  for  swordfish,  as  well  as  the  tuna  tracking  program  of  the 
Agreement for the International Dolphin Conservation Program (AIDCP) that docu-
ments  purse-seine  harvested  tuna  from  the  time  of  capture  forward.  We  are  also 
working to implement the new bluefin tuna catch documentation system adopted by 
ICCAT.  NOAA  Fisheries  has  recently  begun  the  process  to  incorporate  these 
schemes  into  the  U.S.  International  Trade  Data  System,  the  ‘‘single  window’’ 
through  which  government  agencies  may  collect,  store,  and  disseminate  all  inter-
national  trade  data.  This  will  allow  for  faster  and  more  seamless  import  tracking 
of fish covered under the multilateral schemes above. 

We  are  not  aware  of  any  intention  to  implement  a  general  U.S.  fisheries  import 
certification  scheme  such  as  the  one  being  contemplated  in  the  EU.  Certainly,  any 
such  scheme  would  have  to  be  carefully  tailored  to  ensure  that  it  would  be  con-
sistent  with  our  trade  obligations,  would  not  put  an  undue  burden  on  U.S.  busi-
nesses, and would provide a meaningful deterrent to IUU fishing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

Question  5.  I  understand  that  discussions  are  underway  within  the  WTO  to  re-
duce  or  eliminate  fisheries  subsidies.  Can  you  provide  us  with  an  update  on  those 
negotiations? Do you believe this is an important step in reducing IUU fishing? 

Answer. The negotiations on fisheries subsidies are part of the WTO Doha Round 
‘‘rules’’ negotiations, and are being conducted in a series of sessions taking place in 
Geneva  on  establishing  a  subsidies  discipline.  The  Doha  mandate  contains,  for  the 
first  time,  a  mandate  to  establish  a  set  of  rules  to  discipline  fishery  subsidies  that 
contribute  to  overcapacity  and  overfishing,  leading  to  the  depletion  of  fish  stocks 
around the world. In November 2007, the Chair of the negotiating group addressing 
fisheries  subsidies  released  an  ambitious  draft  text,  which  would  prohibit  a  broad 
list  of  potentially  harmful  fisheries  subsidies,  with  some  exceptions  (including  for 
developing countries). 

If the prohibition on subsidies is strong enough, and the exemptions or allowable 
subsidies  are  clearly  defined  and  appropriately  applied  within  the  WTO  member-
ship,  then  they  could  allow  the  international  community  to  focus  on  those  vessels 
or  flag  states  that  have  not  been  following  the  rules  or  that  realize  incentives  in 
acting  outside  of  the  agreed  frameworks  and  management  regimes.  However,  this 
step would only be effective if we considered it as part of a larger suite of measures, 
agreements  and  approaches  that  the  United  States  and  others  in  the  international 
community are taking at both global and regional fora to address the multiple chal-
lenges associated with, and solutions to, IUU fishing. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

JAMES W. BALSIGER, PH.D. 

Question 1. Dr. Balsiger, what is the status of implementing the ‘‘equivalent con-

servation measures’’ section in the reauthorized Magnuson-Stevens Act? 

Answer. In preparation for the first identifications of nations required under Sec-
tion  610  (‘‘Equivalent  Conservation  Measures’’)  of  the  Moratorium  Protection  Act, 
NOAA Fisheries has been collecting information from the public and will be seeking 
to  corroborate  such  information.  On  March  21,  2008,  NOAA  Fisheries  published  a 
notice  in  the  Federal  Register  soliciting  information  from  the  public  regarding  na-
tions whose vessels are engaged in the bycatch of protected living marine resources. 
The information request has been circulated broadly within our constituent groups. 
NOAA  Fisheries  is  also  in  the  process  of  drafting  a  proposed  rule  for  the  identi-
fication and certification of nations under the Moratorium Protection Act. In prepa-
ration  for  the  development  of  the  proposed  rule,  NOAA  Fisheries  published  an  Ad-
vanced  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  in  June  2007  and  the  agency  held  several 
public  meetings  in  July  2007  to  solicit  public  comments  on  this  process.  The  pro-
posed  rule  that  is  currently  under  development  will  outline  what  equivalent  con-
servation  measures  nations  must  have  in  place  to  address  the  bycatch  of  protected 
living  marine  resources  in  order  to  receive  a  positive  certification.  NOAA  Fisheries 
anticipates that the rule will be available for public comment this summer. 

Under the authority of Section 610 of the Moratorium Protection Act, NOAA Fish-
eries has been involved in various international efforts to support capacity building 
through  agreements  and  bodies,  including  the  United  Nations  (UN)  Fish  Stocks 
Agreement, U.N. General Assembly and various regional fishery management orga-
nizations (RFMOs). 

NOAA  Fisheries,  in  cooperation  with  its  Federal  partners,  has  assisted  other  na-
tions in addressing IUU fishing activity and reducing the bycatch of protected living 
marine  resources,  by  hosting  and  supporting  workshops  on  techniques  and  tools  to 
strengthen enforcement and prevent IUU fishing; on employing methods to prevent 
and  mitigate  the  incidental  take  of  marine  turtles,  mammals,  seabirds,  and  other 
marine resources; and on the proper response to marine mammal strandings. NOAA 
Fisheries  has  also  provided  technical  and  other  assistance  to  developing  countries 
to  improve  their  capabilities  for  the  monitoring  and  control  of  fisheries  and  has 
sought to promote the development of effective fisheries observer programs in other 
countries.  NOAA  Fisheries  will  continue  to  reach  out  to  other  nations  and  provide 
the assistance and tools necessary to help them reduce the bycatch of protected liv-
ing  marine  resources  and  increase  their  capacity  for  sustainable  fisheries  manage-
ment. 

Question  2.  Dr.  Balsiger,  what  is  being  done  to  expand  the  capacity  of  the  MCS 

network to developing countries? 

Answer. The Director of NOAA Fisheries Office of Law Enforcement (OLE) is cur-
rently  serving  as  the  Chairman  of  the  Monitoring,  Control  and  Surveillance  (MCS) 
network and OLE is working to enhance the network through various initiatives in-
cluding updating the MCS Network website, planning the 2nd Global Fisheries En-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

forcement  Training  Workshop,  and  increasing  network  membership.  The  recent  ad-
dition of an MCS Network coordinator and ongoing efforts to hire fisheries analysts 
and a training coordinator will further improve the capabilities of the International 
MCS network in 2008. 

In  April  2008,  the  MCS  Network  and  NOAA  Fisheries  OLE  participated  in  the 
Global Oceans Forum in Hanoi, Vietnam in an effort to increase membership of the 
network  and  publicize  the  role  and  opportunities  the  MCS  network  can  provide  to 
the Global community. The MCS Network hosted a workshop on illegal, unreported 
and unregulated (IUU) fishing during the Forum and fostered international dialogue 
on  the  challenges  and  potential  solutions  to  combat  IUU  fishing  in  both  developed 
and  developing  countries.  Through  this  effort,  contacts  with  MCS  practitioners  in 
developing countries in Africa has led to discussions on joint projects with the MCS 
Network  and  several  African  nations  to  conduct  operational  training  and  enforce-
ment  efforts  in  portions  of  Western  Africa.  Additionally,  NOAA  Fisheries  OLE  is 
working closely with NOAA Fisheries Office of International Affairs on MCS capac-
ity  building  in  Central  America  and  is  working  with  the  MCS  Network  to  increase 
its role in Central America. 

Question  3.  Dr.  Balsiger,  what  is  being  done  to  ensure  that  foreign  nations  will 
be  prepared  to  meet  international  requirements  negotiated  pursuant  to  the  reau-
thorized Magnuson Stevens Act? 

Answer. NOAA Fisheries has been diligent in communicating the international re-
quirements of the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Reau-
thorization Act to other countries at every possible opportunity. To illustrate, NOAA 
Fisheries has engaged in ongoing communication with other nations about these re-
quirements  at  workshops  and  multilateral/bilateral  meetings.  In  addition,  NOAA 
Fisheries has provided information to U.S. Commissioners of RFMOs to ensure that 
our  delegations  are  aware  of  and  communicate  these  requirements  to  other  coun-
tries  at  international  meetings.  NOAA  Fisheries  will  continue  to  take  advantage  of 
every opportunity to communicate these new requirements to RFMOs and other na-
tions. 

As discussed in more detail in the response to question #1 above, NOAA Fisheries 
has  also  provided  assistance  to  other  nations  to  help  them  address  IUU  fishing  ac-
tivity  and  the  bycatch  of  protected  living  marine  resources.  NOAA  Fisheries  will 
continue  to  actively  work  with  other  nations  to  help  achieve  the  goals  set  forth  in 
the  international  provisions  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and 
Management Reauthorization Act. 

Question  4.  What  are  the  likely  effects  that  these  requirements  will  have  on  the 

importation of seafood into the United States? 

Answer. Under the Moratorium Protection Act a vessel of a nation that has been 
identified  as  having  vessels  engaged  in  IUU  fishing  and/or  bycatch  of  protected  liv-
ing  marine  resources  may  be  denied  entry  into  U.S.  ports  to  which  they  currently 
have access if such nation does not receive a positive certification from the Secretary 
of  Commerce.  An  identified  nation  that  fails  to  receive  a  positive  certification  may 
also  be  prohibited  from  importing  certain  fish  or  fisheries  products  into  the  United 
States or be subject to other measures. 

Question 5. What is the percentage of nations that are aware of the MSA require-

ments? 

Answer.  NOAA  Fisheries  is  making  every  effort  to  communicate  these  require-
ments to other countries at workshops and bilateral/multilateral meetings. However, 
it  is  unclear  what  percentage  of  nations  is  aware  of  the  international  requirements 
under Title IV of the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Re-
authorization Act. 

Question  6.  Dr.  Balsiger,  what  steps  need  to  be  taken  to  further  strengthen  the 
relationship between NOAA and the Coast Guard to improve enforcement and pros-
ecution capabilities? 

Answer. NOAA Fisheries OLE and the U.S. Coast Guard (USCG) continue to have 
a  strong  working  relationship  and  routinely  collaborate  on  fisheries  enforcement 
issues. The USCG maintains a full time liaison position within the NOAA Fisheries 
OLE  which  greatly  enhances  communications  and  coordination  between  the  two 
agencies.  In  addition,  close  coordination  is  routine  throughout  the  Nation  between 
NOAA  Fisheries  OLE  field  offices  and  staff  and  the  USCG  personnel  in  their  geo-
graphic  areas  of  responsibility.  Other  relationships  between  USCG  legal  staff,  as 
well  as  operational  fisheries  law  enforcement  personnel,  and  the  NOAA  Office  of 
General  Counsel  for  Enforcement  and  Litigation  (GCEL)  are  continuing  to  increase 
effectiveness of the two agencies in the arena of fisheries enforcement and prosecu-
tion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

Question 7. Dr. Balsiger, what tools do you need to strengthen your ability to exe-

cute the follow-on investigation and prosecution of violators? 

Answer.  NOAA  Fisheries  Office  of  Law  Enforcement  (OLE)  staff,  including  148 
sworn Federal agents and officers, continues to work closely with international, Fed-
eral and state law enforcement partners in effort to detect, apprehend and prosecute 
those involved in the illegal importation of IUU product into the United States and/ 
or  its  territories  and  to  attack  the  global  trade  of  IUU  fisheries  product.  There  are 
some  tools  needed  to  address  current  gaps  in  enforcement  capabilities  to  effectively 
combat IUU fishing: 

Significantly  increased  civil  monetary  penalties—under  many  of  our  statutes, 
civil penalty limits prevent assessment of penalties adequate to deter illegal im-
portation of fish product into the United States. Modernization of the civil pen-
alties  to  a  level  beyond  a  ‘‘cost  of  doing  business’’  is  essential  to  address  illegal 
product being imported into the United States. 
Improved capability to share information—confidentiality provisions and limita-
tions  on  information  sharing  with  international  fishery  management  organiza-
tions  and  the  governments  of  other  nations  currently  reduce  NOAA’s  ability  to 
work collaboratively with other governments to track IUU product and conduct 
joint  enforcement  operations.  In  addition,  NOAA  would  benefit  from  enhanced 
access to data currently being collected by other Federal law enforcement agen-
cies  and  the  agencies  that  constitute  the  intelligence  community.  OLE  is  al-
ready  working,  within  its  existing  authority  and  through  on-going  initiatives 
(such  as  CBP’s  International  Trade  Data  System  (ITDS))  to  share  information 
and  collaborate  with  other  Federal  agencies  in  the  effort  to  detect  IUU  fishing 
but additional congressional authority would assist in this effort. 
Increased  criminal  authority  to  allow  for  criminal  fines  and  penalties  for  sub-
stantive violations—An expansion of available enforcement tools to allow for the 
option  of  criminal  prosecution  of  substantive  violations  will  significantly  en-
hance the deterrent effect of enforcement actions and increase the penalty level 
beyond  a  ‘‘cost  of  doing  business’’  for  those  engaged  in  illegal  trade  of  fish  and 
fish product. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

JAMES W. BALSIGER, PH.D. 

Question  1a.  Fisheries  management  in  the  Pacific  Northwest  and  Alaska  are  re-
nowned  for  being  some  of  the  best-managed  fisheries  in  the  world.  The  fish,  how-
ever,  don’t  exactly  recognize  international  borders  in  the  ocean.  While  we  often  do 
a  great  job  managing  the  fisheries  within  our  borders,  our  fish  resources  are  also 
impacted  by  irresponsible  fishing  outside  our  border  How  important  is  effective 
management of international fisheries for the U.S. fishing industry? 

Answer. Effective management of international fisheries is very important for the 
U.S.  fishing  industry.  Effective  conservation  and  management  of  international  fish-
eries  is  very  important  for  the  U.S.  fishing  industry.  Many  of  the  marine  resources 
of interest to the U.S. fishing industry are resources the United States shares with 
other nations. As a result, the United States must engage internationally to advance 
U.S.  objectives  for  the  effective  conservation  and  management  of  the  marine  re-
sources. 

Question  1b.  What  are  the  main  tools  and  levers  that  we  have  for  helping  push 

for better international management? What are the main obstacles? 

Answer.  Bilateral  and  multilateral  arrangements  through  regional  fisheries  man-
agement organizations (RFMOs) are the basic tools for improving international fish-
eries management. 

Because  the  resources  covered  by  these  management  arrangements  are  shared, 
Parties are cognizant that irresponsible fishing behavior has a destructive effect on 
their  own  fisheries  and  that  conservation  and  management  cooperation  result  in 
mutual benefits. 

One of the main obstacles in all international (as well as domestic) fisheries man-
agement is the availability of complete and reliable data on which to base conserva-
tion  and  management  regimes.  Due  to  the  enormous  size  and  remoteness  of  the 
ocean, access to data is a significant obstacle. 

Question 1c. Would you say that NOAA is doing enough to push for more effective 

fisheries management? 

Answer.  Achieving  effective  international  fisheries  management  is  a  constant 
challenge  and  NOAA  strives  to  improve  this  process.  For  example,  in  the  Pacific 
Northwest  and  Alaska,  NOAA  is  currently  involved  in  the  negotiation  of  a  North-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

west Pacific RFMO to address the adverse effects of fishing gear on vulnerable ma-
rine ecosystems. NOAA is also anticipating the possible need to negotiate an Arctic 
RFMO  to  conserve  and  protect  Arctic  living  marine  resources  as  the  ice  recedes  in 
the Arctic Ocean. 

Question  2a.  U.S.  law  prohibits  foreign  fishing  vessels  and  cargo  vessels  from 
landing  their  catch  in  U.S.  ports.  American  Samoa,  Guam,  and  the  U.S.  Virgin  Is-
lands  are  exempt  from  this  law,  so  foreign  cargo  vessels  that  accept  at-sea  trans-
shipments  of  fish  species  and  foreign  flagged  fishing  vessels  can  land  product  in 
these  U.S.  ports.  How  do  we  ensure  that  the  fish  landed  at  these  ports  were  not 
harvested in an illegal, unregulated, or unreported (IUU) manner? 

Answer. Vessels are subject to NOAA Fisheries Office of Law Enforcement (OLE) 
inspection upon arrival in port in the United States’ territories. Inspections are con-
ducted  based  on  the  availability  of  law  enforcement  resources  and  are  specifically 
designed to detect suspected IUU activity and areas for additional investigation. En-
forcement action may be pursued by NOAA Fisheries OLE and our law enforcement 
partners at any time. 

Very  few  cargo  (fish  carriers)  vessels  land  fish  in  Guam  or  American  Samoa  and 
most  of  those  that  do  are  used  to  receive  fish  from  local  plants.  Carriers  operating 
in  the  territories  of  the  Pacific  tend  to  transport  fish  from  the  fishing  grounds  to 
processing plants such as canneries and loining plants. 

Since  there  is  a  cannery  in  American  Samoa,  carriers  occasionally  enter  port  to 
off  load.  However  these  carriers  come  from  other  ports  in  the  Pacific  such  as 
Pohnpei,  Honiara,  or  Majuro  and  they  do  not  typically  carry  fish  transshipped  at 
sea. These carriers are generally registered with the Forum Fisheries Agency (FFA), 
and  thus  they  are  monitored  by  the  FFA  Vessel  Monitoring  System  (VMS).  Trans-
fers  of  purse  seine  caught  fish  at  sea  typically  takes  several  days  and  loitering  of 
a  vessel  equipped  with  VMS  would  be  detected  and  investigated  as  potentially  sus-
picious activity. 

ports? 

Question  2b.  Why  are  these  locations  exempt  from  the  law  that  applies  to  U.S. 

Answer.  The  Nicholson  Act  prohibits  foreign  vessels  from  landing  fish  in  most 
United  States’  ports  however  it  does  allow  for  foreign  vessels  to  unload  in  the 
United  States’  territories.  It  is  our  understanding  that  the  exemption  to  the  off-
loading  of  fish  product  in  the  territories  was  in  part  due  to  an  interest  in  encour-
aging  economic  growth.  NOAA  is  not  certain  of  other  reasons  for  the  exemption  of 
the territories from the Nicholson Act provisions which apply to all other U.S. ports. 

Question 2c. Do we have any idea if IUU fish are landed in these territories? 
Answer. IUU fish and/or fish product does come into the United States’ territories 
occasionally, and NOAA Fisheries OLE and our law enforcement partners have uti-
lized the provisions of the Lacey Act to prevent IUU fish from being introduced into 
the  United  States.  As  recently  as  March  2008,  NOAA  Fisheries  OLE  initiated  an 
investigation  of  a  foreign  flagged  vessel  landing  in  American  Samoa  that  was  sus-
pected  of  various  illegal  fishing  activities.  To  date,  this  ongoing  investigation  has 
yielded numerous instances of IUU fishing activity by this vessel. However, the IUU 
fish  landed  in  the  United  States’  territories  of  the  Pacific  comes  almost  exclusively 
from  fish  harvesting  vessels  and  not  freight  carrier  vessels.  NOAA  Fisheries  OLE 
and  our  law  enforcement  partners  are  aware  of  the  potential  use  of  these  ports  for 
IUU  product  and  have  used  the  Lacey  Act  successfully  for  several  years  to  combat 
it. The establishment of the Western-Central Pacific Fisheries Commission, and sub-
sequent  implementation  of  their  conservation  and  management  measures  (VMS  re-
quirements,  observer  requirements,  etc.),  are  significantly  enhancing  NOAA  Fish-
eries  OLE’s  ability  to  monitor,  detect  and  intercept  IUU  activity.  The  current  chal-
lenge  we  face  is  being  able  to  adequately  respond  to  the  increased  demands  for  in-
vestigation and monitoring of fishing vessel activity in the Western and Central Pa-
cific area. 

Question 3a. One of the key steps necessary for achieving sustainable fisheries is 
developing management organizations with clear mandates, clear lines of authority, 
and  the  authority  to  reduce  catch  and  regulate  harvest.  Taking  a  look  at  a  global 
map  of  the  world’s  international  fishery  management  organizations,  though,  it 
seems like they are more like a disorganized mess. How would you grade the inter-
national  community’s  success  in  developing  management  organizations  with  clear 
mandates and clear lines of authority to regulate fishing harvest? 

Answer. In most cases where an RFMO exists, there are few problems with lines 
of  authority.  The  RFMO  has  the  authority  to  make  conservation  and  management 
decisions,  and  RFMO  members  have  the  duty  to  carry  them  out.  Unfortunately, 
RFMOs  do  not  always  have  the  information  or  political  support  necessary  to  make 
the appropriate conservation and management decisions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ing us back? 

77 

Question  3b.  What  is  the  U.S.  Government  doing  to  help  improve  the  situation? 
Answer.  The  United  States  has  been  at  the  forefront  of  efforts  to  conduct  RFMO 
performance assessments, and several of these are being currently carried out. Our 
intention has been to call the public’s attention to problems, such as you have iden-
tified, to help increase awareness and generate pressure to correct them. 

Question 3c. Can the United States play a greater role? What roadblocks are hold-

Answer. Developing states often need assistance in meeting their obligations with-
in RFMOs. Such needs can range from data collection to effective domestic manage-
ment programs to enforcement. Title IV of the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conserva-
tion  and  Management  Reauthorization  Act  recognizes  these  needs  and  authorizes 
NOAA Fisheries provide assistance to address them with available resources. 

Question  3d.  To  what  extent  has  not  ratifying  the  Law  of  the  Sea  impacted  the 

United States’ ability to participate internationally in these issues? 

Answer. The Status of the United States as a non-party to this vital treaty under-
mines our credibility with other major fishing nations, virtually all of which are par-
ties to the Convention. The Administration appeals to the Senate to provide its ad-
vice and consent to U.S. accession to this treaty. 

Question 4a. In order to manage fisheries responsibly, we need to be able to track 
fish  stocks  effectively.  Good,  solid  science  is  necessary  not  just  to  help  in  making 
wise management choices, but also for getting cooperation and buy-in from the fish-
ermen  who  are  impacted  by  those  management  choices.  What  is  the  United  States 
doing to help coax other nations into providing better data on international fishing? 
Answer.  As  noted  above,  the  United  States  has  been  working  actively  in  the 
RFMO  context  to  encourage  other  nations  to  provide  better  data  on  international 
fishing  activities,  including  data  on  harvest  and  bycatch.  NOAA  Fisheries  is  also 
providing  assistance  and  expertise  to  developing  nations  to  improve  their  capacity 
to collect and provide such data. 

Question  4b.  In  your  view,  what  are  the  countries  that  need  to  make  the  largest 

improvements in providing quality fisheries data? 

Answer.  It  is  difficult  to  say  which  countries  need  to  make  the  largest  improve-
ments  in  this  area.  We  are  working  diligently  with  our  counterparts  in  other  na-
tions, both bilaterally and multilaterally, to make such improvements. Particularly, 
some developing states have the greatest need for resources to make improvements 
in fisheries data collection. 

Question  4c.  To  date,  little  is  known  about  the  impacts  of  IUU  fishing  on  open- 
ocean  and  deepwater  ecosystems.  What  research  is  NOAA  currently  conducting  to 
address these gaps in our knowledge? 

Answer.  Understanding  the  ecosystem  effects  of  fishing  is  a  high  priority  for 
NOAA.  Collaborating  with  our  international  partners  through  global  science  bodies 
and  RFMO/As,  NOAA  will  continue  to  examine  the  impact  of  fishing  activities  on 
non-target  fish  stocks,  protected  species  and  their  related  habitats.  For  example, 
NOAA plans to collaborate with international partners on assessments of the impact 
of  bottom  fishing  activities  in  the  North  Atlantic,  Pacific  and  Southern  Oceans  to 
ensure  the  protection  of  vulnerable  marine  ecosystems,  including  seamounts,  deep 
sea corals, and hydrothermal vents. At a time when human activities are expanding 
into deeper waters, it is crucial to document the effect of such activities on seafloor 
habitat  to  provide  a  foundation  for  developing  sound  policy  and  making  wise  man-
agement decisions. 

Question 5. NOAA is currently developing a list of vessels and nations that engage 
in  IUU  fishing,  an  activity  in  which  eight  RFMO  to  which  the  U.S.  is  a  party  are 
also  engaging.  In  a  progress  report  released  by  your  agency  in  January  2008,  the 
need  for  consolidation  of  lists  identifying  IUU  vessels  and  nations  was  highlighted. 
How  is  the  development  of  a  separate  list  by  NOAA  an  effective  use  of  scarce  time 
and resources? 

Answer. Under the Moratorium Protection Act, as amended by the Magnuson-Ste-
vens  Act,  NOAA  Fisheries  is  required  to  identify  and  certify  nations  whose  vessels 
are engaged in IUU fishing and/or bycatch of protected living marine resources. The 
list of identified nations must be included in a report to Congress that is due in Jan-
uary 2009. 

Question  6a.  United  States  fishing  fleets  often  have  to  deal  with  rigorous  regula-
tions  to  reduce  bycatch  of  threatened  or  endangered  species  like  humpback  whales, 
Steller  sea  lions,  and  sea  turtles.  Many  of  these  species,  however,  are  threatened 
not  just  by  U.S.  fleets,  but  from  other  nations’  fleets  in  international  waters.  What 
is the U.S. Government doing to convince other nations’ fishing fleets to adopt more 
environmentally-sensitive fishing methods used by U.S. fleets to reduce bycatch? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

Answer.  The  United  States  continues  to  actively  work  within  the  international 
community to promote measures that will protect and conserve protected living ma-
rine resources from the adverse impacts of fisheries interactions. The United States 
works  toward  this  objective  through  bilateral  and  multilateral  engagement  with 
other  nations  to  address  bycatch.  The  United  States  provides  assistance  and  train-
ing  in  the  use  of  bycatch  reduction  gear,  mitigation  techniques,  and  other  appro-
priate  measures.  To  date,  U.S.  efforts  and  RFMO  actions  to  protect  and  conserve 
protected  living  marine  resources  have  generally  concentrated  on  the  impacts  of 
fishing  on  sea  turtles,  sharks,  dolphins  and  other  marine  mammals.  For  example, 
together  with  international  partners,  like  the  World  Wildlife  Fund  for  Nature  and 
the  Interamerican  Tropical  Tuna  Convention,  we  have  conducted  experiments  with 
countries  around  the  world  to  demonstrate  how  large  circle  hooks  with  the  appro-
priate bait combination can reduce the interactions and post-hooking mortality rates 
of  sea  turtles  with  longlines.  NOAA  Fisheries’  scientists,  together  with  a  regional 
non-governmental organization, WIDECAST, are also conducting research on how to 
reduce  the  bycatch  of  leatherback  turtles  in  coastal  gillnets.  Through  NOAA’s  re-
search on bycatch reduction, we are able to regularly export bycatch reduction solu-
tions  with  a  minimal  goal  of  voluntary  adoption  of  these  solutions,  which  in  time 
will  hopefully  lead  to  their  support  of  mandatory  measures  at  the  RFMOs.  As  an-
other example, NOAA Fisheries is actively engaged in capacity building in the West 
Africa  and  Central  America  regions  with  an  emphasis  on  enhancing  the  ability  of 
these countries to monitor and manage their fisheries with respect to reducing pro-
tected  species  bycatch.  NOAA  Fisheries  recently  conducted  observer  training  in 
Ghana to enhance this country’s monitoring capability. 

Question 6b. How successful is our track record in getting other nations’ fleets to 

adopt bycatch-reducing fishing methods? 

Answer. NOAA Fisheries has had successes in getting other countries to adopt by-
catch reduction technologies. Through our technology outreach to other countries we 
demonstrated  to  countries  that  using  bycatch  reduction  devices,  such  as  Turtle  Ex-
cluder  Devices,  can  reduce  bycatch  while  maintaining  target  catch  retention. 
Through domestic legislation like Public Law 101–162, and through significant tech-
nical outreach, nations wishing to maintain access to U.S. markets have adopted by-
catch  reduction  measures  in  order  to  comply  with  import  regulations  for  certain 
fisheries  products.  In  the  case  of  Turtle  Excluder  Devices,  the  United  States  cer-
tified  40  nations  and  one  economy  on  May  1,  2008  as  meeting  the  requirements  of 
Public Law 101–162. Of those 40 nations, 16 countries conduct operations in waters 
where shrimp trawls are likely to interact with sea turtles. Those 16 countries met 
the TED standards set forth in U.S. regulations. The U.S. Government will continue 
to  promote  bycatch  mitigation  technology  for  all  fisheries  where  proven  technology 
exists.  It  is  worth  noting  that  P.L.  101–162  currently  lacks  enforcement  authority 
and the authority to promulgate regulations as well as any specific language prohib-
iting the importation of embargoed product. Inclusion of such authorities and prohi-
bition  would  allow  enforcement  actions  to  be  brought  in  response  to  embargoed 
product entering the United States. 

Question  6c.  If  other  nations  don’t  adopt  such  methods  and  continue  to  drive  en-
dangered  species  toward  extinction,  couldn’t  this  eventually  threaten  to  close  some 
U.S. fishing fleets under the Endangered Species Act? 

Answer. The United States’ government believes that all countries should promote 
and use fishing practices that reduce adverse impacts on all living marine resources, 
including endangered species. Several endangered species are shared amongst many 
nations.  The  United  States  regularly  engages  countries  in  cooperative  activities  to 
recover species protected under the U.S. Endangered Species Act, especially species 
shared  across  national  borders.  The  United  States’  government  believes  that  these 
efforts  are  vital  for  meeting  each  species’  recovery  goals.  Section  7  of  the  Endan-
gered  Species  Act  requires  evaluation  of  the  effects  of  Federal  actions  (e.g.,  author-
ization  of  Federal  fisheries)  on  listed  species,  within  the  context  of  the  species  sta-
tus.  Thus  we  take  into  account  a  wide  variety  of  activities  within  the  range  of  the 
species that may affect the species. 

Question 6d. What more should we be doing, and what are the main impediments 

keeping us from being more successful in this arena? 

Answer.  Increasing  the  capacity  of  other  nations  to  address  the  management  of 
their fisheries and to reduce the bycatch of protected living marine resources is vital 
to ensuring their recovery. It is also a difficult task. The United States often works 
with countries that do not have the same regulatory and financial capacities. In ad-
dition  to  our  efforts,  other  developed  nations  also  provide  assistance  in  this  regard. 
The United States strives to take advantage of opportunities as they arise and will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

continue  to  reach  out  to  other  nations  to  build  capacity  and  export  successful  by-
catch reduction measures. 

79 

Question  7.  A  number  of  marine  mammals  that  are  listed  as  protected  under  the 
Endangered  Species  Act  or  that  are  listed  as  depleted  under  the  Marine  Mammal 
Protection Act are commonly involved in incidental takes during IUU fishing activi-
ties. Mortality associated with fishing has been identified as a significant factor con-
tributing  the  decline  of  some  of  these  species,  such  as  humpback  whales,  sperm 
whales, fin whales, pantropical spotted dolphins, and Steller sea lions. Why has the 
National Marine Fisheries Service failed to account for mortality due to IUU fishing 
in the recovery plans for these species? 

Answer. NOAA Fisheries does not specifically address IUU fishing in our recovery 
plans mainly because it is not currently considered to be a significant threat for any 
of the species listed in the question above. Of the species mentioned, recovery plans 
exist  for  Steller  sea  lions  (2008),  sperm  whales  (draft—2006),  fin  whales  (draft— 
2006),  and  humpback  whales  (1991).  These  plans  call  for  monitoring  of  the  popu-
lations, which would indicate if fishing interactions, including IUU fishing, becomes 
a  problem.  NOAA  Fisheries  periodically  update  recovery  plans,  and  any  new  infor-
mation with regard to fishery interactions generally, and IUU fishing in particular, 
would be reflected in the new plans. 

With  regard  to  pantropical  spotted  dolphins,  they  are  not  listed  under  ESA  and 
therefore we do not develop recovery plans for them. The anthropogenic factor with 
the  greatest  affect  on  this  stock  of  dolphins  is  the  take  of  these  dolphins  incidental 
to the purse seine fishery for yellow-fin tuna in the Eastern Tropical Pacific Ocean. 
This  mortality  is  being  addressed  through  conservation  measures  adopted  by  the 
Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Commission  (IATTC)  and  within  the  United  States 
through  the  dolphin-safe  labeling  standard  for  marketing  tuna  within  the  United 
States.  The  level  of  mortality  is  well  documented  through  observer  coverage  and 
subsequent reports to IATTC. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

JAMES W. BALSIGER, PH.D. 

Question  1a.  I  understand  that  NOAA  is  taking  an  active  role  in  improving  the 
international  Monitoring,  Control  and  Surveillance  (MCS)  network.  Can  you  de-
scribe your efforts, particularly regarding actions to improve MCS capabilities in de-
veloping countries? 

Answer. The United States continues to play a proactive role in the fight against 
IUU  fishing  and  is  hosting  the  International  Monitoring,  Control  and  Surveillance 
(MCS) Network. The MCS Network is a voluntary organization dedicated to linking 
together  law  enforcement  professionals  from  the  global  community  to  exchange  in-
formation,  offer  assistance  and  to  provide  training  on  MCS  issues.  The  Director  of 
NOAA Fisheries Office of Law Enforcement (OLE) is currently serving as the Chair-
man  of  the  Monitoring,  Control  and  Surveillance  (MCS)  network  and  OLE  is  work-
ing to enhance the network through various initiatives including updating the MCS 
Network  website,  planning  the  2nd  Global  Fisheries  Enforcement  Training  Work-
shop, and increasing network membership. The recent addition of an MCS Network 
coordinator and ongoing efforts to hire fisheries analysts and a training coordinator 
will further improve the capabilities of the International MCS network in 2008. 

In  April  2008,  the  MCS  Network  and  NOAA  Fisheries  OLE  participated  in  the 
Global Oceans Forum in Hanoi, Vietnam in an effort to increase membership of the 
network  and  publicize  the  role  and  opportunities  the  MCS  network  can  provide  to 
the Global community. The MCS Network hosted a workshop on illegal, unreported 
and unregulated (IUU) fishing during the Forum and fostered international dialogue 
on  the  challenges  and  potential  solutions  to  combat  IUU  fishing  in  both  developed 
and  developing  countries.  Through  this  effort,  contacts  with  MCS  practitioners  in 
developing countries in Africa has led to discussions on joint projects with the MCS 
Network  and  several  African  nations  to  conduct  operational  training  and  enforce-
ment  efforts  in  portions  of  Western  Africa.  Additionally,  NOAA  Fisheries  OLE  is 
working closely with NOAA Fisheries Office of International Affairs on MCS capac-
ity  building  in  Central  America  and  is  working  with  the  MCS  Network  to  increase 
its role in Central America. 

Question  1b.  What  kind  of  resources  and  capacities/authorities  are  needed  to 

strengthen MCS? 

Answer.  One  of  the  challenges  of  the  MCS  network  is  that  the  costs  are  signifi-
cantly higher than first estimated. The network’s main goal is to make the network 
free to join for all members. At present only five members contribute to the network 
enhancement  project.  The  costs  related  to  running  both  the  network  and  the  en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

hancement  project  (costs  beyond  what  the  member  countries  contribute)  fall  on 
NOAA Fisheries OLE. The reauthorization of the MSA has greatly expanded OLE’s 
role  international  capacity  building  and  cooperation.  The  MCS  network  enhance-
ment  project,  which  was  highlighted  in  the  ministerial  level  High  Seas  Task  Force 
(HSTF)  final  report,  ‘‘Closing  the  Net’’,  is  a  project  that  they  fully  endorsed.  The 
HSTF  report  and  MSRA  have  placed  a  very  bright  spotlight  on  the  MCS  enhance-
ment project and put NOAA on the world stage as the leader in combating IUU fish-
eries. 

Question 2. The International Commission for the Conservation of Atlantic Tunas 
(ICCAT)  is  a  showcase  of  the  failure  of  regional  fishery  management  organizations 
(RFMOs)  to  properly  conserve  global  fisheries.  ICCAT  has  consistently  ignored  the 
advice of its scientific committee on bluefin tuna and has authorized total allowable 
catch  in  the  eastern  Atlantic  and  Mediterranean  that  is  twice  the  recommended 
level  to  rebuild  the  population.  In  addition,  10  years  into  a  rebuilding  plan  for 
bluefin  in  the  western  Atlantic,  there  are  so  few  bluefin  left  that  the  U.S.  was  un-
able  to  catch  its  quota  last  year.  Does  NMFS  plan  again  to  seek  a  moratorium  on 
bluefin  tuna  fishing  in  the  eastern  Atlantic  and  Mediterranean  until  a  robust  re-
building  plan  is  adopted?  Does  NMFS  support  an  Atlantic-wide  moratorium  on 
bluefin tuna landings? 

Answer.  The  adoption  of  appropriate  new  management  measures  and  improving 
compliance  in  the  eastern  Atlantic  and  Mediterranean  bluefin  tuna  fishery  will  be 
very high priorities of the United States at ICCAT this November. Both the eastern 
and western stocks of bluefin tuna will be assessed this year. The United States and 
other western Atlantic bluefin tuna harvesters have been following scientific advice 
with  respect  to  this  stock  and  will  continue  to  do  so.  Per  agreement  by  ICCAT  in 
2006, the management measures for the eastern bluefin tuna stock will be reviewed 
in  November  2008.  We  fully  expect  that  ICCAT  will  need  to  adopt  new  measures 
to  improve  the  management  of  eastern  bluefin  tuna,  including  substantially  reduc-
ing fishing mortality. 

Last  year,  compliance  concerns  together  with  the  steep  decline  of  the  eastern 
stock,  led  the  United  States  to  propose  a  temporary  suspension  of  the  eastern 
bluefin  tuna  fishery  until  such  time  as  countries  could  demonstrate  control  of  their 
fisheries. Our proposal did not achieve consensus. Harvesters did agree to report in 
detail on their implementation of eastern bluefin tuna fishery rules before the 2008 
ICCAT  meeting.  The  United  States  will  review  over  the  coming  months  the  steps 
taken  by  eastern  harvesters  to  comply  with  ICCAT’s  rules.  It  is  too  early  to  say 
where that review will lead us. 

Notably, ICCAT does have instruments that allow for the application of penalties, 
including  quota  reductions  and  multilateral  trade  restrictive  measures,  under  cer-
tain  circumstances.  We  strongly  support  the  use  of  such  instruments  where  appro-
priate.  Further,  we  expect  more  robust  compliance  discussions  at  ICCAT  this  year 
as  a  member  of  the  U.S.  Delegation  to  ICCAT  now  chairs  the  Compliance  Com-
mittee. 

Question  3.  Electronic  documentation  can  reduce  the  potential  for  abuse  of  docu-
mentation  systems,  improve  the  speed  at  which  information  can  be  exchanged  and 
reduce  the  compliance  burden  on  legitimate  operators  and  regulatory  authorities. 
Does  NOAA  anticipate  that  the  IUU  certification  scheme  as  mandated  under  the 
Magnuson  Stevens  reauthorization  will  include  a  comprehensive,  electronic  catch 
documentation  system  that  traces  product  from  the  point  of  harvest  to  consumer? 
Answer. One important development that should improve NOAA’s ability to detect 
IUU fish being imported into the United States is the International Trade Data Sys-
tem  (ITDS)  currently  under  development  by  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security 
(Customs  and  Border  Patrol).  ITDS  is  an  integrated,  government-wide  system  for 
the  electronic  collection,  use,  and  dissemination  of  trade  data.  The  Safe  Ports  Act 
of  2006  made  ITDS  mandatory  for  all  Federal  agencies  that  have  a  role  in  deter-
mining  the  admissibility  of  imports  to  the  U.S.  market  and  NOAA  Fisheries  has 
taken steps to become a participating government agency in ITDS. 

Currently, NOAA Fisheries administers several trade monitoring programs under 
the  authority  of  various  statutes  and  international  agreements.  ITDS  will  signifi-
cantly improve the capability of NOAA Fisheries to enforce trade measures and doc-
umentation  requirements  of  these  programs.  Currently,  NOAA  Fisheries  may  not 
learn  of  import  violations  related  to  permitting,  documentation  and  reporting  re-
quirements  until  long  after  they  have  occurred,  making  their  investigation  and  for-
feiture of product difficult or impossible. ITDS will allow screening and targeting of 
inbound  shipments,  potentially  on  a  pre-arrival  basis.  Such  capability  will  place 
NOAA  Fisheries  in  a  position  to  approve  entries  of  product  into  the  United  States 
or  to  place  holds  on  shipments  when  permits  and/or  documentation  are  missing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

Close  interagency  coordination  through  the  ITDS  will  help  ensure  the  detection  of 
potential  IUU  shipments  of  fish  and  fish  products  as  well  as  the  effective  and  con-
sistent application of import regulations. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

JAMES W. BALSIGER, PH.D. 

Question 1. Last month I introduced a Senate Resolution 456, calling for the U.S. 
to enter into bilateral negotiations with Canada to come to an agreement on regula-
tions  to  protect  endangered  whales  from  entanglement  in  fishing  gear.  NMFS  has 
issued  new  regulations  that  will  have  a  drastic  impact  on  Maine’s  lobster  industry, 
imposing costs of $10–$15,000 per fisherman to re-equip their gear. Meanwhile, the 
Canadian  lobster  industry,  fishing  just  across  the  Maritime  Boundary  Line  and 
interacting with the same whales, operates with no comparable restrictions. This re-
duces the effectiveness of our own regulations and allows Canada’s fishermen to op-
erate at a distinct competitive advantage over our fleet. Has NMFS made any effort 
to  engage  the  Canadians  on  this  issue?  If  so,  why  has  it  been  so  difficult  to  come 
to any agreement? 

Answer.  NMFS  has  made  an  effort  to  engage  the  Canadians  on  the  development 
of  conservation  measures  to  address  both  gear  and  vessel  interactions  with  large 
whales.  NMFS  Northeast  Regional  Office  and  Canada’s  Division  of  Fisheries  and 
Oceans  (DFO)  Maritime  Region  has  established  a  Species  at  Risk  Working  Group 
(Group) to address transboundary protected species issues. The Group reports to an 
overarching  Transboundary  Resources  Steering  Committee  co-chaired  by  NMFS 
Northeast  Regional  Administrator  and  the  DFO  Directorate  for  the  Maritimes  Re-
gion. The Group met via teleconference on December 4, 2007 to develop a work plan 
for 2008. The Group agreed to: 

1. Identify issues that would require consultation by each country; 
2.  Identify  when  each  country  should  consult  with  one  another  (being  mindful 
of each countries processes); 
3.  Develop  a  protocol  for  how  each  country  will  consult  with  one  another,  both 
on a formal and informal basis; and 
4.  Update  the  transboundary  species  at  risk  table,  which  identifies  all  trans-
boundary  stocks  covered  by  the  U.S  Endangered  Species  Act  (ESA)  and  Can-
ada’s Species at Risk Act (SARA). The list also provides useful information con-
cerning where the species is with respect to each country’s listing process. 

The Group is currently working with its respective staffs to address these issues. 
At its next meeting, the Group will review their findings and develop a strategy for 
the  Steering  Committee’s  consideration,  which  will  identify  how  the  Group  intends 
to address these communication-type issues. The Group intends to meet in late sum-
mer 2008. 

The  Group  also  provided  updates  on  various  transboundary  marine  mammal  and 
protected  species  issues.  Of  particular  interest  was  the  update  on  the  Canadian 
Right Whale Recovery Strategy. The Recovery Potential Assessment (RPA) for right 
whales  was  completed  in  February  2007.  This  science  based  process  provided  the 
analysis  required  to  complete  several  components  of  the  draft  Recovery  Strategy. 
The Recovery Strategy is expected to be finalized in early 2008. The Recovery Strat-
egy  is  analogous  to  NMFS’  Right  Whale  Recovery  Plan  under  ESA.  DFO  reported 
that  at  its  next  Canadian  Right  Whale  Recovery  Team  meeting,  the  Team  would 
be  moving  forward  to  identify  strategies  for  reducing  right  whale  interactions  with 
lobster  gear  and  right  whale  avoidance  strategies  for  reducing  vessel  strikes.  The 
Team  is  very  interested  in  NMFS  input  into  these  strategies.  The  Canadian  Right 
Whale  Recovery  Team  met  in  March  2008  and  is  investigating  additional  industry 
based meetings in collaboration with International Fund for Animal Welfare Canada 
to  discuss  education  and  outreach  efforts  concerning  large  whale  entanglements 
with commercial fishing gear. 

Question  2.  In  recent  years,  demand  for  bluefin  tuna  has  skyrocketed,  leading  to 
vastly  increased  pressure  to  catch  these  fish,  some  of  which  can  retail  for  tens  of 
thousands of dollars per fish. In New England, bluefin has been a profitable fishery 
for  decades,  but  since  a  brief  boom  period  in  the  late  1990s  and  early  2000s,  our 
catch  history  has  suddenly  plummeted  to  historic  lows.  Maine’s  fishermen  landed 
just 9.1 metric tons in 2006, barely 5 percent of what they caught less than a decade 
prior. And for several years running the U.S. has been unable to land the quota af-
forded to it by the International Convention on the Conservation of Atlantic Tunas. 
Meanwhile,  the  European  Community  and  others  are  harvesting  more  than  their 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

quotas—effectively taking the fish that if left to mature could resupply the U.S. fish-
ery.  What  actions  does  the  U.S.  intend  to  undertake  at  the  next  meeting  of  ICCAT 
to prevent the further decimation of this vital U.S. industry? 

Answer. Both the eastern and western stocks of bluefin tuna will be assessed this 
year.  The  United  States  and  other  western  Atlantic  bluefin  tuna  harvesters  have 
been following scientific advice with respect to this stock and will continue to do so. 
Current management measures for the eastern bluefin tuna stock, however, are not 
consistent with scientific advice. Per agreement by ICCAT in 2006, the management 
measures  for  this  stock  will  be  reviewed  in  November  2008.  We  fully  expect  that 
ICCAT  will  need  to  adopt  new  measures  to  improve  the  management  of  eastern 
bluefin tuna, including substantially reducing fishing mortality. The adoption of ap-
propriate  and  effective  new  management  measures  is  a  very  high  priority  of  the 
United  States.  Given  mixing  between  the  eastern  and  western  bluefin  tuna  stocks, 
management  measures  that  are  set  in  line  with  scientific  advice  and  adhered  to 
should benefit the western stock and fishery. 

Compliance in the eastern fishery, however, has been poor over the years. Improv-
ing compliance in this fishery continues to be a high priority for the United States. 
We  expect  more  robust  compliance  discussions  at  ICCAT  this  year  as  a  member  of 
the  U.S.  Delegation  to  ICCAT  now  chairs  the  Compliance  Committee.  The  United 
States  will  review  over  the  coming  months  the  steps  taken  by  eastern  harvesters 
to comply with ICCAT’s rules. While it is as yet too early to say where that review 
will  lead  us,  ICCAT  does  have  instruments  that  allow  for  the  application  of  pen-
alties, including quota reductions and multilateral trade restrictive measures, under 
certain  circumstances.  We  strongly  support  the  use  of  such  instruments  where  ap-
propriate. 

Question 3. States such as the U.S., Canada, and Japan have, for the past quarter 
century, adhered to a stringent management regime for bluefin tuna in the western 
Atlantic.  Meanwhile,  nations  fishing  in  the  East  Atlantic  and  Mediterranean  Sea 
have over-exploited their resources, and now their overfishing seems to be impacting 
our  harvest  here  in  the  western  Atlantic  despite  our  conservation  efforts.  Despite 
the fact that we have a long history of responsible, sustainable fishery management 
in direct contrast to our counterparts across the Atlantic, there are some in the en-
vironmental community who would suggest that the western Atlantic nations should 
give  the  Eastern  states  additional  effort  reduction  in  order  to  convince  them  to  ad-
here to stricter conservation standards as well—effectively ignoring all the cuts our 
fishermen  have  taken  in  years  past  and  rewarding  the  easterners  for  their  bad  be-
havior.  Does  the  U.S.  plan  to  offer  reductions  in  our  effort  to  catch  bluefin  tuna  at 
the  next  ICCAT  meeting  in  hopes  of  gaining  similar  concessions  from  nations  fish-
ing  the  eastern  and  Mediterranean  stock?  If  so,  doesn’t  this  simply  add  insult  to 
the  injury  our  fishermen  have  already  received  and  reward  the  bad  actors  for  con-
tinuing to flout the rules of the Convention? 

Answer.  The  new  assessments  for  both  stocks  of  bluefin  tuna  will  be  completed 
in early July 2008. The United States will press ICCAT to adopt new measures for 
the  eastern  stock  that  are  consistent  with  scientific  advice.  Such  action  must  be 
taken  regardless  of  what  the  scientific  advice  may  be  for  the  western  stock.  As 
noted,  the  United  States  and  other  western  harvesters  have  consistently  followed 
the  science  for  the  western  bluefin  tuna  stock.  The  U.S.  Delegation  will  do  every-
thing  possible  to  protect  U.S.  interests  with  respect  to  bluefin  tuna  and  other 
ICCAT species this November. 

Question  4.  The  most  recent  reauthorization  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery 
Conservation  and  Management  Act  includes  language  authorizing  the  Secretary  of 
State  to  identify  and  impose  trade  restrictions  against  states  known  to  engage  in 
Illegal,  Unregulated,  and  Unreported  fishing.  While  the  language  includes  a  2-year 
buffer,  meaning  implementation  is  not  required  until  January  2009,  in  the  case  of 
bluefin  tuna,  the  2008  meeting  of  ICCAT  will  be  critical  to  future  management  of 
this  dwindling  fish  stock,  and  the  threat  of  listing  or  sanctions  for  nations  who  are 
ignoring  their  responsibilities  under  the  Convention  could  be  a  vital  tool  in  our  ef-
fort  to  establish  a  responsible,  scientifically-supported  international  management 
program. Would State Department action such as described above be helpful to your 
cause as you attempt to protect U.S. access to bluefin tuna stocks, and ensure that 
other nations cease over-harvesting of the species? 

Answer.  For  clarification,  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Man-
agement  Reauthorization  Act  (MSRA)  established  new  requirements  for  the  Sec-
retary  of  Commerce,  in  consultation  with  the  State  Department,  to  combat  illegal, 
unreported,  or  unregulated  (IUU)  fishing  and  help  reduce  the  bycatch  of  protected 
living  marine  resources.  Among  the  Act’s  requirements,  the  Secretary  of  Commerce 
must  identify  in  a  biennial  report  to  Congress  those  nations  whose  vessels  are  en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

gaged in IUU fishing or bycatch of protected living marine resources. Subsequently, 
the  Secretary  of  Commerce  must  certify  whether  the  identified  nations  have  taken 
appropriate  corrective  action  to  address  such  activities.  The  first  biennial  report  is 
due to Congress in January 2009. 

In preparation for the first identifications, NOAA Fisheries has been collecting in-
formation  from  the  public  and  will  be  seeking  to  corroborate  such  information.  On 
March  21,  2008,  NOAA  Fisheries  published  a  notice  in  the  Federal  Register  solic-
iting  information  from  the  public  regarding  nations  whose  vessels  are  engaged  in 
IUU  fishing  and  bycatch  of  protected  living  marine  resources.  The  information  re-
quest  has  been  circulated  broadly  within  our  constituent  groups.  At  this  stage,  it 
is too early to tell what the results of our information review will be. If any informa-
tion  comes  to  light  through  this  process  that  is  of  concern,  NOAA  Fisheries  would 
be  prepared  to  use  it  bilaterally,  at  ICCAT  or  in  other  international  fora  as  appro-
priate. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. DAVID A. BALTON 

Question 1. What is the Administration doing to level the playing field on the high 
seas  for  our  domestic  fishing  fleets  which  are  regulated  under  the  Magnuson-Ste-
vens  Act  and  are  disadvantaged  compared  to  the  unregulated  foreign  high  seas 
fleets? 

Answer. We recognize that effective international fisheries management is critical 
to  the  U.S.  fishing  industry  and  other  stakeholder  groups,  both  for  achieving  sus-
tainable fisheries world-wide and for creating a level economic playing field for U.S. 
fishing industries. 

The  United  States  works  bilaterally,  regionally,  and  globally  to  strengthen  inter-
national fisheries governance, sustainably conserve and manage fisheries resources, 
protect vulnerable marine species and habitats, and to combat IUU fishing. Through 
RFMOs we are seeking stronger monitoring, control, and surveillance measures, in-
cluding broader access to data from vessel monitoring systems, increased vessel ob-
server programs, stronger documentation schemes, and the adoption of controls and 
standards to regulate the landing and transshipment of fish in port, and advocating 
for  stricter  adherence  to  scientific  advice  when  adopting  conservation  and  manage-
ment  measures.  We  are  also  pressing  for  performance  reviews  to  assess  how  well 
RFMOs  are  meeting  their  mandates  and  to  identify  how  each  could  strengthen  its 
functioning. At the global level, the United States is working actively through inter-
national  organizations,  such  as  the  United  Nations  and  the  U.N.  Food  and  Agri-
culture Organization (FAO), to press for strengthened and more effective implemen-
tation  of  agreed  international  rules  and  instruments  and  to  develop  technical  guid-
ance that will ensure consistent application of standards across RFMOs and oceans. 
Further,  in  areas  of  the  world  where  RFMOs  do  not  yet  exist,  the  United  States 
is  taking  a  leadership  role  in  the  negotiations  to  establish  new  fisheries  manage-
ment  organizations.  Such  negotiations  are  underway  in  the  Northwest  Pacific  and 
the South Pacific for currently unregulated non-highly migratory species. In both of 
these  negotiations,  the  United  States  is  pressing  for  modern  agreements  that  are 
consistent  with  the  established  principles  of  international  law,  as  outlined  in  the 
1982 U.N. Convention on the Law of the Sea, and that reflect the conservation and 
management  objectives  established  by  the  1995  U.N.  Fish  Stocks  Agreement  and 
other related instruments. 

Question 2. Mr. Balton, what efforts has the international community taken in re-
cent  years  in  the  Pacific  to  address  sea  turtle  bycatch?  Have  any  other  countries 
followed the leadership of the longliners in the Pacific and adopted their techniques? 
Answer.  The  international  community,  which  together  faces  many  challenges  in 
managing  fisheries  target  species,  has  in  recent  years  devoted  attention  and  re-
sources  to  reducing  sea  turtle  bycatch,  largely  as  a  result  of  U.S.  leadership.  How-
ever,  the  work  accomplished  to  date  is  really  only  the  beginning  and  much  addi-
tional  work  and  follow  through  will  be  required.  A  number  of  nations  are  now  in 
the  process  of  undertaking  new  gear  and  research  trials  to  develop  fishing  gear 
modifications  and  to  identify  mitigation  techniques  most  appropriate  for  their  fish-
eries and their regions. With regard to one significant success, through bilateral out-
reach,  multilateral  coordination  and  participation  in  regional  fishery  management 
organizations (RFMOs), the United States has been able to promote the importance, 
ease  of  use  and  effectiveness  of  circle  hooks  and  bait  combinations  in  longline  fish-
eries.  While  few  nations  other  than  the  United  States  currently  require  the  use  of 
circle  hooks  in  their  shallow  set  longline  fisheries,  many  countries  have  agreed  to 
carry  de-hooking  equipment,  perform  gear  trials,  consider  requirements  for  circle 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

hooks  in  future  management  strategies  and  participate  cooperatively  in  RFMOs 
where  sea  turtle  conservation  and  management  measures  have  or  may  soon  be 
adopted.  Last  year,  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Convention  (IATTC)  adopted 
a  U.S.  proposal  to  mitigate  the  impact  of  tuna  fishing  on  sea  turtles.  Additionally, 
the  United  States  also  participated  in  discussions  regarding  a  conservation  and 
management  measure  for  sea  turtles  in  the  Western  and  Central  Pacific  Fisheries 
Commission and will lead efforts to develop a proposal that may be adopted by that 
Commission later this year. 

Coordinated international efforts to reduce sea turtle bycatch in fisheries are sup-
ported  by  U.S.  participation  in  meetings  of  multilateral  bodies  that  address  the 
management  challenges  of  sea  turtle  conservation  across  a  broader  range  of  issues 
in addition to fisheries, including those of habitat protection, scientific research and 
recovery  strategies.  These  organizations  and  forums  include  the  Indian  Ocean- 
Southeast  Asia  Marine  Turtle  Memorandum  of  Understanding,  the  Inter-American 
Convention  for  the  Protection  and  Conservation  of  Sea  Turtles,  the  International 
Fishers Forum and the Annual Symposium on Sea Turtle Biology and Conservation. 
Additionally,  the  Convention  on  Migratory  Species  may  soon  begin  discussions  on 
the  development  of  a  multilateral  Memorandum  of  Understanding  focused  specifi-
cally on sea turtle conservation in the Pacific Ocean. Forums such as these increase 
the  ability  of  the  international  community  to  effectively  reduce  sea  turtle  bycatch 
as they provide opportunities for nations to share new gear technologies and lessons 
learned  as  well  as  coordinate  research,  outreach  and  regional  workshops.  Through 
these  cooperative  efforts  the  international  community  will  continue  to  take  mean-
ingful  steps  and  will  undoubtedly  be  successful  at  further  reducing  sea  turtle  by-
catch. 

Question 3. The United States is a world leader in efforts to reduce bycatch mor-
tality,  not  only  in  application,  but  also  in  research  and  development.  What  efforts 
are being taken to distribute this knowledge and resources to the rest of the world? 
Answer.  Representatives  from  the  United  States  travel  around  the  world,  con-
ducting  workshops,  participating  in  gear  trials,  sharing  research  and  distributing 
modified fishing gear such as circle hooks. During the last calendar year, the United 
States participated in several turtle excluder device (TED) workshops, provided sup-
port  funds  and  in  kind  assistance  for  training  and  technology  transfer,  and  sent 
thousands of circle hooks to regions, such as South America and the Pacific Islands. 
U.S. scientists and gear specialists actively participate in international conferences, 
workshops and the scientific committees or related bodies of RFMOs where they are 
able to share recent findings, encourage collaborative research and promote effective 
mitigation techniques with a global audience. The United States also partners with 
local organizations to build regional capacity while undertaking some of the burden 
of monitoring fisheries interactions with non-target species and conducting rigorous 
gear trials. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

HON. DAVID A. BALTON 

Question 1. Last month I introduced a Senate Resolution 456, calling for the U.S. 
to enter into bilateral negotiations with Canada to come to an agreement on regula-
tions  to  protect  endangered  whales  from  entanglement  in  fishing  gear.  NMFS  has 
issued  new  regulations  that  will  have  a  drastic  impact  on  Maine’s  lobster  industry, 
imposing  costs  of  $10-$15,000  per  fisherman  to  re-equip  their  gear.  Meanwhile,  the 
Canadian  lobster  industry,  fishing  just  across  the  Maritime  Boundary  Line  and 
interacting with the same whales, operates with no comparable restrictions. This re-
duces the effectiveness of our own regulations and allows Canada’s fishermen to op-
erate  at  a  distinct  competitive  advantage  over  our  fleet.  Does  the  Department  of 
State have any plans to discuss a bilateral whale conservation agreement with Can-
ada?  Do  you  agree  that  such  negotiations  would  make  sense  given  the  cost  of  the 
new regulations we are imposing on our domestic industry? I understand that there 
is precedent for such bi-lateral agreements such as the Pacific Salmon Treaty which 
manages shared salmon stocks on the Pacific coast. 

Answer.  The  Department  of  State  agrees  it  would  be  useful  and  appropriate  to 
have  complementary  approaches  with  Canada  in  whale  conservation,  particularly 
with  respect  to  North  Atlantic  right  whales.  We  understand  that  Canada  has  al-
ready  implemented  certain  measures  to  reduce  ship  strikes,  and  that  National  Ma-
rine  Fisheries  Service  (NMFS)  personnel  have  approached  their  Canadian  counter-
parts  over  the  years  to  engage  further  on  right  whale  conservation.  Through  our 
regular  communication  channels,  we  will  work  with  NMFS  and  Canadian  officials 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

to implement the most efficient bilateral means to protect this and other whale spe-
cies along our coasts, including the possibility of a formal agreement. 

85 

Question  2.  In  recent  years,  demand  for  bluefin  tuna  has  skyrocketed,  leading  to 
vastly  increased  pressure  to  catch  these  fish,  some  of  which  can  retail  for  tens  of 
thousands of dollars per fish. In New England, bluefin has been a profitable fishery 
for  decades,  but  since  a  brief  boom  period  in  the  late  1990s  and  early  2000s,  our 
catch  history  has  suddenly  plummeted  to  historic  lows.  Maine’s  fishermen  landed 
just 9.1 metric tons in 2006, barely 5 percent of what they caught less than a decade 
prior. And for several years running the U.S. has been unable to land the quota af-
forded to it by the International Convention on the Conservation of Atlantic Tunas. 
Meanwhile,  the  European  Community  and  others  are  harvesting  more  than  their 
quotas—effectively taking the fish that if left to mature could resupply the U.S. fish-
ery. Why have U.S. efforts been so ineffective in the past? What should we be doing 
differently? 

Answer. We remain very concerned by the declines in bluefin tuna Atlantic-wide, 
and  by  the  apparent  impact  that  overfishing  elsewhere  is  having  on  U.S.  fisheries. 
The United States and other Western Atlantic harvesters have consistently adopted 
management measures for bluefin tuna in the Western Atlantic that are in line with 
the  advice  of  ICCAT’s  Standing  Committee  on  Research  and  Statistics.  The  situa-
tion  in  the  Eastern  Atlantic  and  Mediterranean  is  very  different.  Management 
measures  adopted  for  this  fishery  have  time  and  again  been  inconsistent  with  the 
scientific  advice,  and  many  years  of  poor  monitoring  and  control  has  ensured  that 
even these inadequate measures have not been respected. 

The  United  States  led  development  of  the  Western  Atlantic  rebuilding  plan  that 
was  adopted  by  ICCAT  in  1998,  and  we  have  also  spearheaded  initiatives  within 
ICCAT to impose consequences on ICCAT members who do not follow the rules. Un-
fortunately, too many other ICCAT members have lacked the political will to adopt 
and  implement  meaningful  conservation  measures.  We  have  been  working  to  get 
other  members  to  recognize  the  seriousness  of  the  status  of  bluefin  tuna  Atlantic- 
wide  and  the  urgent  need  for  ICCAT  to  act.  We  are  also  hopeful  that  changes  in 
the functioning of ICCAT’s Compliance Committee called for by both the new Chair-
man of the Commission and the new U.S. chair of the Compliance Committee itself 
will result in ICCAT finally undertaking a comprehensive review of member compli-
ance at the next annual meeting. 

Question 3. States such as the U.S., Canada, and Japan have, for the past quarter 
century, adhered to a stringent management regime for bluefin tuna in the western 
Atlantic.  Meanwhile,  nations  fishing  in  the  East  Atlantic  and  Mediterranean  Sea 
have over-exploited their resources, and now their overfishing seems to be impacting 
our  harvest  here  in  the  western  Atlantic  despite  our  conservation  efforts.  Despite 
the fact that we have a long history of responsible, sustainable fishery management 
in direct contrast to our counterparts across the Atlantic, there are some in the en-
vironmental community who would suggest that the western Atlantic nations should 
give  the  Eastern  states  additional  effort  reduction  in  order  to  convince  them  to  ad-
here to stricter conservation standards as well—effectively ignoring all the cuts our 
fishermen  have  taken  in  years  past  and  rewarding  the  easterners  for  their  bad  be-
havior.  Does  the  U.S.  plan  to  offer  reductions  in  our  effort  to  catch  bluefin  tuna  at 
the  next  ICCAT  meeting  in  hopes  of  gaining  similar  concessions  from  nations  fish-
ing  the  eastern  and  Mediterranean  stock?  If  so,  doesn’t  this  simply  add  insult  to 
the  injury  our  fishermen  have  already  received  and  reward  the  bad  actors  for  con-
tinuing to flout the rules of the Convention? 

Answer.  The  situations  in  the  western  and  eastern  Atlantic  are  linked  by  our  in-
sistence  that  management  measures  in  place  for  both  must  be  consistent  with  the 
best  available  scientific  advice  on  what  will  allow  bluefin  tuna  stocks  to  rebuild  to 
sustainable levels. As we work with our partners in NOAA Fisheries to develop U.S. 
positions  for  this  fall’s  ICCAT  annual  meeting,  we  will  ensure  that  they  reflect  the 
results  of  the  upcoming  bluefin  stock  assessment  to  be  done  in  July.  But  we  will 
insist  on  the  strongest  possible  measures  for  the  eastern  Atlantic  and  Mediterra-
nean fishery regardless of the outcome of the western stock assessment. 

Question  4.  The  most  recent  reauthorization  of  the  Magnuson  Stevens  Fishery 
Conservation  and  Management  Act  includes  language  authorizing  the  Secretary  of 
State  to  identify  and  impose  trade  restrictions  against  states  known  to  engage  in 
Illegal,  Unregulated,  and  Unreported  fishing.  While  the  language  includes  a  2-year 
buffer,  meaning  implementation  is  not  required  until  January  2009,  in  the  case  of 
bluefin  tuna,  the  2008  meeting  of  ICCAT  will  be  critical  to  future  management  of 
this  dwindling  fish  stock,  and  the  threat  of  listing  or  sanctions  for  nations  who  are 
ignoring  their  responsibilities  under  the  Convention  could  be  a  vital  tool  in  our  ef-
fort  to  establish  a  responsible,  scientifically-supported  international  management 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

program.  Why  has  the  Department  of  State  failed  to  implement  these  policies?  Do 
you  plan  to  list  or  threaten  to  list  any  nations  engaged  in  IUU  fishing  prior  to  the 
next ICCAT meeting slated for November 2008? 

Answer. The reauthorized Magnuson Stevens Act contains a number of new inter-
national  fisheries  provisions,  including  a  process  by  which  the  Secretary  of  Com-
merce, in consultation with the Secretary of State, may identify Nations whose ves-
sels are engaging in IUU fishing or other fishing that results in bycatch of protected 
species  beyond  certain  standards.  The  Department  has  been  working  closely  with 
NOAA  as  they  work  to  implement  these  provisions  as  quickly  as  possible.  In  the 
meantime,  we  have  begun  collaborating  to  gather  and  follow  up  on  information 
about nations whose vessels may be engaging in IUU fishing or bycatch of protected 
resources.  We  agree  that  this  process  provides  us  with  a  valuable  opportunity  to 
gather  additional  information  that  may  be  useful  in  our  bilateral  outreach  and  at 
the ICCAT Annual Meeting this fall. 

Question 5. The most recent report on global fish production from the United Na-
tion’s Food and Agriculture Organization shows that today’s fish harvests are larger 
than  ever  before,  yielding  over  154  million  tons  of  fish  in  2005  alone.  That  same 
report estimates that 77 percent of the world’s fish stocks are being fished at levels 
either at or in excess of their maximum sustainable limits. As technology allows ves-
sels  to  catch  more  fish  with  less  effort,  and  as  landings  close  in  on  their  maximum 
sustainable levels, we will invariably be faced with a problem of too many fishermen 
chasing too few fish to sustain their livelihoods. This problem is exacerbated by fish-
eries  subsidies.  Japan,  for  example,  spends  approximately  $750  million  annually 
subsidizing  its  fishing  fleet  and  the  European  Union  over  $530  million.  The  U.S., 
by  contrast,  averages  just  $24  million  annually,  much  of  which  is  specifically  tar-
geted  to  capacity  reduction  programs  such  as  vessel  buybacks  and  loans.  The  U.S. 
Trade  Representative  is  advocating  the  elimination  of  these  harmful  subsidies,  and 
that  their  efforts  are  supported  by  the  UN’s  Food  and  Agriculture  Organization. 
Specifically  what  efforts  has  the  U.S.  taken  at  the  international  level  to  discourage 
the  use  of  harmful  fisheries  subsidies?  What  effect  have  these  efforts  had  on  the 
targeted fisheries? 

Answer.  Negotiations  on  fisheries  subsidies  are  part  of  the  WTO  Doha  Round 
‘‘rules’’ negotiations, and are being conducted in a series of sessions taking place in 
Geneva  on  establishing  a  subsidies  discipline.  The  Doha  mandate  contains,  for  the 
first  time,  a  mandate  to  establish  a  set  of  rules  to  discipline  fishery  subsidies  that 
contribute  to  overcapacity  and  overfishing,  leading  to  the  depletion  of  fish  stocks 
around the world. In November 2007, the Chair of the negotiating group addressing 
fisheries  subsidies  released  an  ambitious  draft  text,  which  would  prohibit  a  broad 
list  of  potentially  harmful  fisheries  subsidies,  with  some  exceptions  (including  for 
developing  countries).  It  is  not  clear  how  long  the  negotiations  may  take,  as  they 
will be subject to the overall progress made in the larger context of the Doha Round. 
If the prohibition on subsidies is strong enough, and the exemptions or allowable 
subsidies  are  clearly  defined  and  appropriately  applied  within  the  WTO  member-
ship,  then  they  could  allow  the  international  community  to  focus  on  those  vessels 
or  flag  states  that  have  not  been  following  the  rules  or  that  realize  incentives  in 
acting  outside  of  the  agreed  frameworks  and  management  regimes.  However,  this 
step would only be effective if we considered it as part of a larger suite of measures, 
agreements  and  approaches  that  the  United  States  and  others  in  the  international 
community are taking at both global and regional fora to address the multiple chal-
lenges associated with, and solutions to, IUU fishing. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

REAR ADMIRAL ARTHUR E. BROOKS 

Question 1. Rear Admiral, I understand the Coast Guard leverages VMS resources 
in  the  North  Pacific,  enabling  more  effective  international  fisheries  enforcement  in 
that  region.  What  is  the  Coast  Guard  doing  to  increase  utilization  and  access  of 
VMS  in  the  Western  and  Central  Pacific  Region?  What  are  the  impediments  to  ex-
panding  Coast  Guard  access  to  VMS  feeds  internationally?  What  alternatives  are 
available  to  the  Coast  Guard  to  increase  its  Maritime  Domain  Awareness  when  ac-
cess to VMS data is not available? 

Answer. The Coast Guard continues to establish comprehensive Maritime Domain 
Awareness  (MDA)  to  inform  decisions  on  how  best  to  employ  finite  resources  to 
deter the threat of Illegal, Unregulated, Unreported (IUU) fishing. MDA is enhanced 
through application of technologies such as Vessel Monitoring Systems (VMS). VMS 
refers  to  satellite-based  ship  tracking  systems  used  as  part  of  a  living  marine  re-
sources regulatory regime. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

NOAA  has  implemented  VMS  requirements  as  a  critical  component  of  many  do-
mestic  fishery  management  plans.  The  Coast  Guard  has  real-time  access  to  this 
data  under  the  authority  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Man-
agement  Act  (MSFCMA).  VMS  requirements  are  also  being  increasingly  adopted 
through  international  fishery  agreements.  For  example,  the  Pacific  Forum  Fishery 
Agency  requires  that  foreign  fishing  vessels  seeking  to  fish  within  member  Exclu-
sive  Economic  Zones  (EEZs)  must  carry  operable  VMS.  In  the  Fourteenth  Coast 
Guard  District,  we  have  executed  agreements  with  Pacific  Forum  Fishery  Agency 
countries to gain near-real time access to this VMS position data. The Coast Guard 
can  see  the  movement  of  many  U.S.  and  foreign-flagged  vessels  operating  in  the 
non-contiguous U.S. EEZs of the Pacific, which provides us with improved visibility 
on what is happening in this geographically expansive area. VMS is also a provision 
of  other  Regional  Fisheries  Management  Organizations’  (RFMO)  management 
schemes, including the Central Bering Sea ‘‘Donut Hole’’ Convention and the West-
ern and Central Pacific Fisheries Commission. Relaxation of the data confidentiality 
provisions  in  the  MSFCMA  to  allow  for  sharing  data  with  RFMOs  and  other  na-
tion’s enforcement agencies would allow the U.S. to participate more fully in central-
ized vessel monitoring and trade tracking schemes. 

VMS  alone  is  not  enough  to  maintain  effective  MDA  for  IUU  enforcement.  VMS 
is not infallible; as it is not part of every management measure nor on board every 
potential  IUU  vessel.  The  Coast  Guard  is  able  to  close  this  gap  in  some  key  areas 
by utilizing national resources to monitor foreign fishing vessel activity. 

Question  2.  What  resources  are  needed  to  increase  the  Coast  Guard’s  maritime 
domain awareness so you can more effectively patrol, enforce, and target illegal, un-
reported, and unregulated fishing on the high seas? 

Answer. Enforcement of international fisheries management schemes is a mission 
largely  conducted  by  the  Coast  Guard  Deepwater  and  large  legacy  cutters  assets. 
Access  to  most  of  the  eight  non-contiguous  U.S.  EEZs  in  the  Western  and  Central 
Pacific  require  several  days  to  over  a  week  in  transit  time  for  a  cutter  departing 
the nearest Coast Guard base. The centerpiece of the Coast Guard’s future capabili-
ties to address a projected increase in IUU threat and secure our Nation’s maritime 
borders  is  the  Integrated  Deepwater  System.  The  Deepwater  acquisitions  are  de-
signed  to  enhance  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  enforce  international  and  domestic 
living marine resources regulations in the U.S. EEZ and on the high seas. 

The  Coast  Guard  needs  to  replace  aging  vessels,  aircraft,  and  shore  infrastruc-
ture,  and  sustain  these  assets  during  recapitalization.  The  cost  of  maintaining  and 
operating  out-dated  assets  is  continually  increasing,  as  are  major  unplanned  main-
tenance  evolutions  and  reductions  in  readiness.  Lost  cutter  days  within  the  legacy 
deepwater cutter fleet continue to mount. During the last 2 years, an average of 400 
scheduled  deployment  days  was  lost  in  the  Pacific  Area  due  to  unplanned  mainte-
nance  and  engineering  casualties.  Ultimately,  the  future  operational  success  of  the 
Coast  Guard  to  help  combat  the  global  threat  of  IUU  fishing  is  dependent  upon  a 
comprehensive recapitalization of front line assets and shore and support infrastruc-
ture.  We  can  provide  a  comprehensive  briefing  on  our  recapitalization  plans  and 
programs if helpful. 

Question  3.  What  effect  will  the  delays  in  the  Deepwater  acquisition  have  on  the 

Coast Guard’s ability to patrol the extensive Western Pacific EEZ? 

Answer.  The  majority  of  patrols  conducted  in  the  Western  Pacific  are  completed 
by the two 110’ patrol boats and the 225’ buoy tender assigned in Guam. Any delays 
in  the  Deepwater  program  have  no  impact  on  these  vessels  ability  to  patrol  in  the 
Western Pacific EEZ. 

The  patrols  of  these  smaller  cutters  are  occasionally  augmented  by  High  Endur-
ance  Cutters  and  Medium  Endurance  Cutters  on  an  as  needed  basis  based  upon 
operational requirements in the Western Pacific EEZ. 

Question 4. I understand that the Unmanned Aerial Systems (UAS) program has 
been put on hold under Deepwater. What was the Coast Guard’s plan for using the 
UAS for fisheries enforcement? 

Answer.  Unmanned  Aerial  Systems  (UAS)  would  provide  long  range  persistent 
surveillance  that,  when  coupled  with  an  end-game  asset  (i.e.,  surface  ship),  would 
provide  detection  and  monitoring  capability  and  the  means  to  execute  an  effective 
on  scene  presence  to  conduct  fisheries  enforcement.  We  are  evaluating  alternatives 
for future UAS capabilities. 

Question 5. Rear Admiral Brooks, what would the United States gain by ratifying 
the  United  Nations  Convention  on  Law  of  the  Sea?  How  would  this  enhance  our 
ability to address illegal, unreported, and unregulated fishing? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  Government  would  reap  significant  dividends  by  ratifying  the 
United Nations Convention on Law of the Sea (UNCLOS), particularly with respect 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

to combating Illegal, Unreported, Unregulated (IUU) fishing. UNCLOS promotes an 
economically  and  environmentally  balanced  fisheries  management  regime,  some-
thing  of  vital  importance  to  the  United  States.  UNCLOS  provisions  on  fisheries 
management  are  entirely  consistent  with  U.S.  domestic  fisheries  laws  as  well  as 
U.S. international fisheries agreements and understandings. UNCLOS also imposes 
basic  obligations  of  environmental  protection  and  species  preservation  on  all  mem-
ber states. The international framework applicable to the treaty continues to evolve 
and strengthen protection of aquatic resources. 

Absent  ratification,  it  is  challenging  for  the  U.S.  Government  to  credibly  partici-
pate in the evolution of IUU fishing counter-measures and to make our voice heard 
on  these  issues  because  UNCLOS  is  the  international  legal  instrument  that  estab-
lished  the  overall  structure  for  international  fisheries  management.  Without  acces-
sion,  the  U.S.  Government  will  continue  to  silence  its  otherwise  considerable  voice 
in international oceans and IUU discussions among parties to UNCLOS, and we will 
unnecessarily restrict our ability to enforce the elements of UNCLOS that are in the 
interest  of  the  U.S.  Government.  Ratifying  UNCLOS  would  demonstrate  the  U.S. 
Government’s global commitment to the fight against IUU fishing. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

REAR ADMIRAL ARTHUR E. BROOKS 

Question 1. U.S. law prohibits foreign fishing vessels and cargo vessels from land-
ing  their  catch  in  U.S.  ports.  American  Samoa,  Guam,  and  the  U.S.  Virgin  Islands 
are exempt from this law, so foreign cargo vessels that accept at-sea transshipments 
of  fish  species  and  foreign  flagged  fishing  vessels  can  land  product  in  these  U.S. 
ports.  How  do  we  ensure  that  the  fish  landed  at  these  ports  were  not  harvested  in 
an  illegal,  unregulated,  or  unreported  (IUU)  manner?  Why  are  these  locations  ex-
empt  from  the  law  that  applies  to  U.S.  ports?  Do  we  have  any  idea  if  IUU  fish  are 
landed in these territories? 

Answer.  Coast  Guard  expertise  resides  in  our  authority,  competency,  and  capa-
bility  to  conduct  at-sea  enforcement  for  Federal  laws  and  regulations.  Accordingly, 
the  Coast  Guard  is  not  in  a  position  to  address  regulations  related  to  landing  re-
quirements  and  recommends  you  contact  the  Department  of  Commerce  for  further 
information. 

Question  2.  One  of  the  key  steps  necessary  for  achieving  sustainable  fisheries  is 
developing management organizations with clear mandates, clear lines of authority, 
and  the  authority  to  reduce  catch  and  regulate  harvest.  Taking  a  look  at  a  global 
map  of  the  world’s  international  fishery  management  organizations,  though,  it 
seems  like  they  are  more  like  a  disorganized  mess  than  a  system  with  clear  lines 
of  authority  to  regulate  international  fishing.  How  would  you  grade  the  inter-
national  community’s  success  in  developing  management  organizations  with  clear 
mandates  and  clear  lines  of  authority  to  regulate  fishing  harvest?  How  would  you 
grade the international community’s success in defining clear lines of responsibility 
and  authority  for  effective  fisheries  enforcement  in  international  waters?  Do  the 
international  regional  fishery  management  organizations  do  an  effective  job  giving 
the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  a  clear  picture  of  the  jurisdictions  for  international  fisheries 
regulation and enforcement, and where the U.S. Coast Guard should operate within 
them?  To  what  extent  has  not  ratifying  the  Law  of  the  Sea  impacted  the  United 
States’  ability  to  participate  internationally  in  these  international  fishery  manage-
ment issues? Has it hurt our ability to play a clear and effective role in this arena? 
Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  applauds  and  supports  the  National  Oceanic  and  At-
mospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  and  the  State  Department  in  their  efforts  to 
bring  additional  tools  to  bear  on  combating  Illegal,  Unregulated,  Unreported  (IUU) 
fishing,  such  as  the  application  of  Port  State  Measures  to  deter  IUU  importation, 
implementation  of  Catch  Documentation  Schemes,  and  development  of  an  Inter-
national  Trade  Data  System.  These  tools  help  restrict  market  access  for  IUU  prod-
uct,  thereby  making  IUU  activity  less  profitable.  However,  at-sea  enforcement  and 
the ability to deliver consequences to those found directly engaged in illegal fishing 
activity  remains  a  critical  element  of  the  overall  U.S.  Government  effort  to  address 
the  IUU  threat,  as  outlined  in  the  U.S.  National  Plan  of  Action  to  Prevent,  Deter, 
and Eliminate IUU Fishing. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  dedicated  to  supporting  multilateral  efforts  to  bolster  legal 
regimes that deter IUU and deliver consequences to violators. Considering maritime 
initiatives  and  policies  as  part  of  a  larger  system  enables  a  better  understanding 
of their inter-relationships and effectiveness. A well designed system of regimes cre-
ates  the  opportunity  for  mutually  supporting  domestic  and  international  regula-
tions. Together, they provide a comprehensive system of maritime governance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

The  Coast  Guard  fully  supports  modernization  of  Regional  Fishery  Management 
Organizations  (RFMOs)  to  include  comprehensive  boarding  and  inspection  regimes 
as  called  for  by  the  1995  Agreement  for  the  Implementation  of  the  Provisions  of  the 
United  Nations  Convention  on  the  Law  of  the  Sea  of  10  December  1982  Relating  to 
the  Conservation  and  Management  of  Straddling  Fish  Stocks  and  Highly  Migratory 
Fish  Stocks—more  commonly  referred  to  as  the  U.N.  Fish  Stocks  Agreement.  The 
Western  and  Central  Pacific  Fisheries  Commission’s  recent  incorporation  of  these 
enforcement principles into its management regime is a particularly relevant exam-
ple.  This  Commission  is  one  of  the  first  in  the  world  to  employ  a  fully-developed 
boarding  and  inspection  protocol  for  high  seas  enforcement  based  on  the  U.N.  Fish 
Stocks  Agreement.  The  Coast  Guard  is  proud  to  have  been  involved  in  its  develop-
ment. 

While the Coast Guard continues to work with our international partners on IUU 
fishing enforcement and counter-measures, the United States’ status with respect to 
the  United  Nations  Convention  on  Law  of  the  Sea  (UNCLOS)  does  present  chal-
lenges  in  our  ability  to  enforce  some  elements  of  UNCLOS  that  are  in  the  interest 
of the United States. Ratifying UNCLOS would demonstrate the United States’ com-
mitment to our international partners in the fight against IUU fishing and the pro-
vide the United States increased legitimacy in international oceans and IUU discus-
sions. 

Question  3.  Does  the  Coast  Guard  enforce  illegal,  unreported,  and  unregulated 
fishing  in  the  high  seas  in  the  same  way  that  you  engage  in  drug  interdiction  in 
international  waters?  Does  the  Coast  Guard  even  have  the  ability  or  authority  to 
do  this?  Please  explain  the  primary  legal,  political,  logistical,  and  resource-related 
issues  impeding  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  from  participating  in  high  seas  fisheries  en-
forcement. 

Answer.  The  principle  source  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  authority  to  conduct  maritime 
law  enforcement  operations,  including  Illegal  Drug  Interdiction  and  Illegal,  Unre-
ported,  Unregulated  (IUU)  fishing  activity,  resides  in  14  U.S.C.  89.  This  section  al-
lows  the  Coast  Guard  to  ‘‘make  inquiries,  examinations,  inspections,  searches,  sei-
zures, and arrests upon the high seas and waters over which the United States has 
jurisdiction  . . .’’  Similarly,  for  both  mission  areas,  the  Coast  Guard  utilizes  multi- 
and  bilateral  agreements  (e.g.,  shipriders)  to  maximize  legal  authority  to  engage  in 
law enforcement activities on participating flag state vessels. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

REAR ADMIRAL ARTHUR E. BROOKS 

Question  1.  I  understand  that  the  Coast  Guard  has  developed  capacity  building 
programs in certain West African nations, to assist states who currently do not have 
the ability to police or protect their own EEZ. What type of support does the Coast 
Guard need to fully develop and implement this program? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  currently  has  a  Memorandum  of  Agreement  with  the 
Department  of  the  Navy  which  allows  Coast  Guard  participation  in  the  delivery  of 
Security  Assistance  programs  authorized  by  the  Foreign  Assistance  Act  and  the 
Arms  Export  Control  Act.  The  Coast  Guard  has  very  limited  organic  authorities  to 
provide  training  to  foreign  nationals.  These  are  limited  to  training  in  conjunction 
with  normal  operations  (coincident  to  a  port  call)  which  must  be  coordinated  with 
Department  of  State  (DoS)  and  follow  human  rights  vetting  procedures  and  assist-
ance to non-compliant ports under the International Ship and Port Facility Security 
Code (ISPS) to correct deficiencies. Under Security Assistance, the Coast Guard can 
only  provide  training  to  foreign  nationals  at  the  request  of  another  government 
agency, at the request of a U.S. Embassy team, or in conjunction with normal oper-
ations  (coincident  with  a  port  call),  coordinated  with  the  Department  of  State  and 
fully  reimbursed  under  the  Economy  Act.  The  Coast  Guard  does  not  possess  inde-
pendent legal authority or funding to assist other countries directly for the purpose 
of training and education. 

Question  2.  In  your  experience,  what  are  the  most  important  steps  we  can  take 

at the regional or international level to improve flag state accountability? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  fully  supports  NOAA  and  the  State  Department  in 
their  efforts  to  bring  additional  tools  to  bear  on  combating  Illegal,  Unreported,  Un-
regulated  (IUU)  fishing,  such  as  the  application  of  Port  State  Measures  to  deter 
IUU  importation,  implementation  of  Catch  Documentation  Schemes,  and  develop-
ment  of  an  International  Trade  Data  System.  These  tools  will  help  restrict  market 
access  for  IUU  product,  thereby  making  IUU  activity  less  profitable.  However,  at- 
sea  enforcement  and  the  ability  to  deliver  consequences  to  those  found  directly  en-
gaged  in  illegal  fishing  activity  remains  a  critical  element  of  the  overall  U.S.  Gov-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ernment  effort  to  address  the  IUU  threat,  as  outlined  in  the  U.S.  National  Plan  of 
Action to Prevent, Deter, and Eliminate IUU Fishing. 

90 

Question  3.  It  is  critical  that  we  have  good  information  on  the  vessels  that  are 
entering  our  waters.  What  kind  of  monitoring/tracking  is  currently  required,  for 
both large and small boats entering U.S. waters? Is this data shared between coun-
tries? What level of tracking is reasonable and manageable? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  employs  a  variety  of  classified  and  unclassified  vessel 
tracking information systems and processes to monitor vessel movement. These sys-
tems  include  the  Automatic  Identification  System  (AIS)  and  in  2009,  the  Long 
Range  Identification  and  Tracking  (LRIT)  system,  both  of  which  are  International 
Maritime  Organization  (IMO)  mandated  systems  for  commercial  vessels.  While 
these  systems  do  not  currently  provide  information  on  smaller  vessels,  the  Coast 
Guard  is  exploring  the  option  of  extending  AIS  requirements  to  some  smaller  class 
of  vessels.  Indeed,  the  Coast  Guard  is  currently  working  with  the  Department  of 
Homeland Security to finalize a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking to mandate AIS car-
riage on certain vessels 65′ and larger, as required by the Maritime Transportation 
Security Act of 2002. Additionally, classified systems are utilized on a limited basis 
to monitor vessels and Vessel Traffic Services (VTS), the Inland River Vessel Move-
ment Center (IRVMC), and the National Vessel Movement Center (NVMC) monitor 
commercial  vessels  in  various  ports  and  waterways  of  the  United  States.  Improved 
tactical  vessel  tracking  is  planned  using  surface  search  radar  in  the  vicinity  of 
major ports under the Interagency Operations Center/Command 21 project, and the 
use of unclassified commercial space capabilities is being assessed. Finally, all com-
mercial  vessels  entering  U.S.  waters  are  required  to  submit  an  Advanced  Notice  of 
Arrival  (ANOA)  report  to  the  Coast  Guard,  and  any  vessel  entering  U.S.  waters 
from  overseas,  regardless  of  size  or  category,  must  report  to  Customs  and  Border 
Patrol. Some of this information is being shared with international partners, subject 
to U.S. law, and more sharing agreements are being sought for the future. 

As  a  component  of  many  domestic  fisheries  management  plans  and  international 
fisheries  agreements,  some  fishing  vessels  are  required  to  maintain  a  vessel  moni-
toring system (VMS). The coordination, development, implementation, and manage-
ment of domestic VMS programs resides within NOAA. The application of domestic 
VMS  systems  on  U.S.  vessels  to  meet  international  requirements  of  various  Re-
gional  Fishery  Management  Organizations  (RFMOs)  is  also  overseen  by  NOAA.  As 
such,  NOAA  is  in  a  better  position  to  respond  to  questions  regarding  data  sharing, 
system and carriage requirements, and the overall national management of VMS in-
formation. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

REAR ADMIRAL ARTHUR E. BROOKS 

Question  1.  When  the  Coast  Guard  was  transferred  to  the  Department  of  Home-
land  Security  in  2003  it  gained  a  new  suite  of  maritime  security  missions  but  to 
date  has  not  appreciably  expanded  its  personnel  level.  While  we  can  debate  what 
that  investment  represents  in  terms  of  effective  execution,  in  2007,  for  the  second 
straight  year,  the  Coast  Guard  failed  to  achieve  its  self-imposed  targets  for  five  of 
its eleven mission programs. It is telling that four of those five are so-called ‘‘tradi-
tional’’  Coast  Guard  missions,  including  living  marine  resources  enforcement—the 
mission  area  that  includes  fisheries  management  at  the  domestic  and  international 
levels. Meanwhile, IUU fishing is on the rise, and the Coast Guard annually detects 
over  a  hundred  incursions  into  our  Exclusive  Economic  Zone.  Understanding  that 
the Coast Guard’s motto—semper paratus—implies its willingness to always accom-
plish the mission required with whatever capabilities it has at the ready, I wonder: 
can the Coast Guard effectively carry out its required enforcement against IUU fish-
ing practices given its current level of assets and financial support? 

Answer.  Coast  Guard  Operational  Commanders  are  tasked  with  conducting  risk- 
based  decision-making  to  conduct  operational  planning,  apportion  and  allocate  re-
sources,  and  align  mission  priorities.  The  Coast  Guard  applies  this  standard  to  the 
Other Law Enforcement mission (i.e., Foreign Fishing Vessel Enforcement) to deter-
mine the appropriate level of Coast Guard effort. The Other Law Enforcement mis-
sion’s  performance  target  for  Fiscal  Year  2009  is  to  reduce  the  number  of  detected 
foreign fishing vessel incursions into the U.S. Exclusive Economic Zone (EEZ) to 195 
or less. The Coast Guard anticipates a continued focus on high threat areas as out-
lined  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fisheries  Enforcement  Strategic  Plan,  Ocean  Guardian, 
and on ensuring compliance with international fisheries agreements. We will ensure 
mission performance continues to drive allocation of operational assets. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

Question 2. I understand that the Coast Guard has entered into cooperative agree-
ments  with  some  Pacific  nations  known  or  suspected  of  significant  IUU  fishing  ef-
fort,  specifically  targeting  vessels  fishing  with  driftnets  greater  than  2.5  kilometers 
in length—a method banned by the United Nations. These agreements include pro-
visions allowing foreign enforcement officials to ‘‘ride along’’ on Coast Guard vessels 
providing  immediate  sovereign  authority  for  boarding  foreign  vessels  and  to  inter-
pret  between  Coast  Guard  officers  and  the  suspected  violators.  While  I  appreciate 
the  innovative  nature  of  this  program,  I  am  concerned  that  it  may  shift  too  much 
of the Coast Guard’s focus away from domestic fisheries enforcement, given that liv-
ing marine resourced missions taking up just 9.3 percent of the Coast Guard’s 2006 
budget allocation. Can you provide us with an update on this program? What impact 
has this and other cooperative enforcement programs had on high seas driftnet fish-
ing in particular and IUU fishing in general? Are similar programs being developed 
for  other  areas  of  the  high  seas,  and  if  so,  will  they  further  deplete  resources  that 
would otherwise be used for domestic enforcement? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  develop  active  international  partnerships 
through  the  development  of  bilateral  enforcement  agreements  and  participation  in 
multilateral  groups,  like  Regional  Fisheries  Management  Organizations  and  the 
North Pacific Coast Guard Forum. Combating Illegal, Unreported, and Unregulated 
(IUU)  fishing  internationally  requires  that  the  Coast  Guard  work  closely  with  the 
National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  and  the  U.S.  State  De-
partment to develop and advance cooperative enforcement agreements. For example, 
over  the  past  year  the  Coast  Guard  coordinated  with  North  Pacific  Anadromous 
Fish  Commission  and  North  Pacific  Coast  Guard  Forum  partners  including  Cana-
dian, Chinese, Japanese, and Russian surface and air patrols to cooperatively deter 
IUU in the North Pacific. 

These  two  forums  further  supplement  the  Coast  Guard’s  implementation  of  a  bi-
lateral U.S. Government—People’s Republic of China (PRC) Memorandum of Under-
standing (MOU) to enforce the United Nation’s moratorium on large-scale high seas 
driftnet fishing. The MOU (also referred to as the ‘‘U.S.-PRC Shiprider Agreement’’) 
establishes  boarding  procedures  for  law  enforcement  officials  of  either  country  to 
board and inspect U.S. or Chinese flagged vessels suspected of driftnet fishing. The 
Memorandum  also  establishes  a  shiprider  program,  which  allows  China’s  Ministry 
of Agriculture’s Bureau of Fisheries (FLEC) officials to embark on U.S. Coast Guard 
resources during each driftnet fishing season. Pursuant to this provision, China has 
provided a total of 46 enforcement officials to the Coast Guard since 1994. In 2007, 
two FLEC officers rotated through the North Pacific Regional Fishery Training Cen-
ter  in  Kodiak,  Alaska,  from  April-August  2007.  In  addition,  two  FLEC  shipriders 
were  deployed  on  the  USCG  Cutter  BOUTWELL  during  its  IUU  Patrol.  These  offi-
cials  were  instrumental  in  facilitating  communications  between  the  USCG  and  the 
FLEC and effectively expanded the jurisdictional reach of both enforcement agencies 
allowing  for  six  vessel  seizures,  the  largest  number  in  the  North  Pacific  since  the 
implementation of the MOU. 

In  mid-February  of 

Beyond  our  work  in  the  North  Pacific,  the  Coast  Guard  is  increasingly  involved 
in  West  Africa  and  with  Pacific  Island  nations  to  utilize  bilateral  fisheries  enforce-
ment  agreements. 
this  year,  Coast  Guard  Cutters 
ASSATEAGUE and SEQUOIA, with embarked Federated States of Micronesia ship- 
riders, interdicted two Japanese-flagged fishing vessels in the Micronesian EEZ 160 
nautical miles south of Guam. Both Japanese fishing vessels were found to be fish-
ing in violation of Micronesian law. The Coast Guard cutters, acting under authority 
of  their  embarked  Micronesian  fisheries  enforcement  officers,  escorted  these  sus-
pected IUU fishing vessels toward Pohnpei, Micronesia for further investigation and 
prosecution. Finally, in June, the high endurance Coast Guard cutter DALLAS will 
deploy  to  West  Africa  under  the  operational  control  of  the  Department  of  Defense. 
Planning efforts are underway to conduct maritime law enforcement operations with 
Cape  Verde,  which  include  using  Cape  Verde  maritime  law  enforcement  officer 
‘‘ship-riders’’ as a proof-of-concept test. If successful, the U.S. Coast Guard and U.S. 
Navy  may  consider  expanding  such  operations  to  other  West  African  nations  with 
the interest and capacity to participate. 

Coast Guard Operational Commanders are tasked with conducting risk-based de-
cision-making to conduct operational planning, apportion and allocate resources, and 
align  mission  priorities.  The  Coast  Guard  applies  this  standard  to  the  Other  Law 
Enforcement mission (i.e., foreign fishing vessel enforcement) and the Living Marine 
Resources  Law  Enforcement  mission  (i.e.,  domestic  fisheries  enforcement)  to  deter-
mine the appropriate level of Coast Guard effort. Coast Guard mission planning and 
execution is accomplished through performance based management. Performance in 
the  Other-Law  Enforcement  mission  has  exceeded  program  targets  in  four  of  the 
last  5  years.  Performance  has  been  similarly  consistent  in  the  domestic  Living  Ma-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

rine Resources Law Enforcement mission. The Coast Guard conducted a near histor-
ical  high  number  of  commercial  fishing  vessel  boardings  in  Fiscal  Year  2007  (6,375 
boardings),  and  observed  at-sea  compliance  rate  for  domestic  fisheries  has  been 
within  1  percent  of  the  97  percent  observed  compliance  target  for  the  past  5  years. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DAVID BENTON 

Question  1a.  In  your  testimony,  Mr.  Benton,  you  talk  about  how  the  Alaska  fish-
eries  have  been  so  successful  at  least  partly  because  of  United  States  success  in 
making  major  inroads  with  other  nations  on  fishery  management  agreements  and 
treaties.  Why  do  you  think  we  have  been  so  successful  in  forging  successful  inter-
national  agreements  for  Alaska’s  fisheries?  What  was  the  main  tipping  point  that 
pushed us into these treaties? 

Answer.  In  my  testimony  I  describe  some  of  the  conservation  challenges  that  the 
United  States  faced  in  the  North  Pacific  in  the  decades  leading  up  to  the  passage 
of  the  MSA  and  into  the  mid–1980s.  Passage  of  the  MSA,  and  the  declaration  of 
the  EEZ  was  a  major  milestone  and  allowed  us  to  protect  and  management  re-
sources out to 200 miles. However, throughout that period, the U.S. also made great 
efforts to address challenges on the high seas, but for the most part was unsuccess-
ful. Then, several factors came together that afforded us the opportunity to achieve 
our  conservation  goals  and  establish  these  new  international  agreements.  Chief 
among  these  was  a  renewed  sense  of  united  purpose  within  the  United  States  lead 
by Members of Congress, the fishing industry, and the Dept. of State; coupled with 
the  thawing  of  relations  with  the  (then)  Soviet  Union  that  allowed  for  the  two  na-
tions  to  work  closely  together.  The  other  players  in  the  region:  Japan,  Taiwan,  Re-
public of Korea, China, and Canada all had various interests some of which aligned 
with  our  interests,  many  of  which  did  not.  And,  while  this  had  been  the  case  for 
many  years,  the  gridlock  was  broken  when  the  two  superpowers  brought  forward 
joint proposals for new fishery arrangements in the North Pacific. This, in my view, 
was  perhaps  the  main  ‘‘tipping  point’’  that  made  many  of  these  arrangements  pos-
sible. 

Question  1b.  How  much  was  this  success  because  of  the  cooperativeness  of  inter-

national partners? 

Answer. Certainly the cooperation of international partners played a key role, but 
internal agreement within the U.S. was equally important. In particular, leadership 
out  of  the  Congress  and  especially  the  Senate  helped  forge  a  united  U.S.  position. 
The  states  of  Alaska,  Washington,  and  Oregon  worked  well  together,  and  with  the 
fishing industry. We had a common goal and a shared approach. In addition, at that 
time there was a better working relationship between the fishing industry, the envi-
ronmental lobby, and other U.S. interests than exists today. This allowed the United 
States to put forward a strong and unified position that, when coupled with the new 
cooperation  with  some  of  our  international  partners,  was  very  powerful.  Unfortu-
nately,  relationships  today  between  the  fishing  industry  and  the  environmental 
lobby  are  more  antagonistic.  In  fact,  many  in  the  fishing  industry  believe  that  the 
environmental  lobby  is  using  some  of  these  international  issues  to  put  pressure  on 
U.S.  domestic  fisheries  over  and  above  the  requirements  of  existing  U.S.  law  such 
as  the  MSA.  This  will  make  it  harder  for  the  United  States  to  form  a  strong  and 
united front to address legitimate conservation issues on the high seas. 

Question 1c. Why have we not been able to repeat this success for other fisheries 
in  other  regions?  What  makes  Alaska  different?  What  can  we  do  to  repeat  the  suc-
cess of the Pacific Northwest in other fisheries and regions? 

Answer. I think these two questions are very closely related, and I would suggest 
that  there  have  been  successes  elsewhere  with  other  fisheries  and  other  arrange-
ments. For example, the emerging fishery management regime in the Western Cen-
tral  Pacific  holds  promise  to  be  an  effective  management  tool  for  highly  migratory 
species there, although a lot of work remains to be done. There have been improve-
ments  in  some  of  the  southern  oceans  fishery  management  arrangements  as  well 
as  bilateral  arrangements  with  Canada  and  Mexico.  Many  of  these  improvements 
have come about, or are coming about, due to evolving international standards such 
as  those  pushed  by  Alaska  in  the  North  Pacific,  and  through  implementation  of 
broader  international  instruments  such  as  the  Code  of  Conduct  and  the  U.N.  Fish 
Stocks Agreement. 

Looking forward, the new provisions regarding international fisheries in the most 
recent  reauthorization  of  the  MSA  should  help  advance  U.S.  interests  internation-
ally  if  they  are  implemented  thoughtfully.  In  my  view,  this  means  we  need  to  get 
back to some basics. In recent years, international agreements have often times be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

93 

come  more  about  furthering  somewhat  esoteric  principles  instead  of  focusing  on 
practical  and  effective  measures  to  address  real-world  management  and  conserva-
tion  issues.  It  has  become  more  fashionable  to  pursue  ill-defined,  but  rhetorically 
gratifying  language  in  these  discussions  than  to  buckle  down  to  the  hard  work  of 
crafting  and  implementing  basic  fishery  management  regimes.  What  is  needed  is 
less focus on ‘‘principles’’ and more work on solid science programs, effective harvest 
and  fishing  capacity  controls,  and  at-sea  monitoring  and  enforcement  programs. 
And,  in  the  end,  U.S.  fishing  interests  need  to  see  some  benefit  from  these  inter-
national  agreements.  Instead  of  U.S.  fishermen  sitting  on  the  beach  while  foreign 
fishing fleets continue to fish, new agreements need to place the same requirements 
on all participants, including opportunity for U.S. interests to fish as well as foreign 
fleets. This is the approach we have used in Alaska and the Pacific Northwest over 
the years with some success. 

Question 2. You mention in your testimony that high-seas driftnet fisheries (which 
are banned by U.N. moratorium) are the ultimate Illegal, Unreported, and Unregu-
lated  fisheries.  You  also  mention  that  they  are  experiencing  a  significant  resur-
gence.  In  your  view,  why  is  this  resurgence  happening?  Who,  if  anyone,  is  respon-
sible  for  capturing  and  prosecuting  individuals  who  fish  with  driftnets  illegally  on 
the  high  seas?  If  our  government  catches  someone  doing  this  outside  our  EEZ,  do 
we even have the ability to capture and prosecute them? 

Answer. I am not sure exactly why the resurgence of large scale high seas fishing 
is occurring. It appears to be related to the growing economies of China and South-
east  Asia,  with  the  attendant  demand  for  seafood  and  a  higher  standard  of  living. 
In  the  North  Pacific  we  have  a  strong  international  cooperative  enforcement  re-
gime.  This  regime  initially  came  about  because  of  the  North  Pacific  Anadromous 
Fish  Convention  (NPAFC)  which  set  up  a  mechanism  for  cooperative  enforcement 
by  non-flag  state  members.  As  I  understand  it,  this  initial  arrangement  has  been 
expanded  and  reinforced  through  various  bi-lateral  arrangements  with  nations  not 
party  to  the  NPAFC.  The  result  is  an  enforcement  net  implemented  by  the  major 
coastal  states  of  the  North  Pacific,  with  the  ability  for  them  to  detain,  board,  in-
spect,  and  bring  into  port  vessels  engaged  in  illegal  fishing  activities  such  as  high 
seas  driftnet  fishing.  Prosecuting  violators  remains  with  the  flag  state.  So,  as  a  re-
sult, the U.S. Coast Guard does have the ability to detain, for example, a Japanese 
vessel  illegally  engaged  in  high  seas  driftnet  fishing  and  bring  it  into  a  U.S.  port. 
Prosecution  would  be  by  the  Japanese  government  once  the  vessel  and/or  the  cap-
tain and crew were turned over to Japanese authorities. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

DAVID BENTON 

Question  1.  In  recent  years,  demand  for  bluefin  tuna  has  skyrocketed,  leading  to 
vastly  increased  pressure  to  catch  these  fish,  some  of  which  can  retail  for  tens  of 
thousands of dollars per fish. In New England, bluefin has been a profitable fishery 
for  decades,  but  since  a  brief  boom  period  in  the  late  1990s  and  early  2000s,  our 
catch  history  has  suddenly  plummeted  to  historic  lows.  Maine’s  fishermen  landed 
just 9.1 metric tons in 2006, barely 5 percent of what they caught less than a decade 
prior. And for several years running the U.S. has been unable to land the quota af-
forded to it by the International Convention on the Conservation of Atlantic Tunas. 
Meanwhile,  the  European  Community  and  others  are  harvesting  more  than  their 
quotas—effectively taking the fish that if left to mature could resupply the U.S. fish-
ery. These issues with bluefin tuna also apply to other highly migratory species such 
as  swordfish  and  white  and  blue  marlin.  Such  issues  are  also  similar  to  some  of 
those you have addressed in the north Pacific. Based on your experiences with fish-
eries  enforcement  in  the  North  Pacific,  what  are  the  features  of  effective  high  seas 
fisheries enforcement that can be translated to the North Atlantic Ocean? How can 
Congress  help  facilitate  effective  high  seas  enforcement  partnerships  with  other 
countries? 

Answer.  I  recall  several  years  ago  Senator  Snowe  came  to  Alaska  to  see  how  we 
are doing, and asking similar questions. We discussed at the time the similarity be-
tween  Alaska  and  New  England:  small  communities  with  a  long  tradition  of  being 
dependent  on  the  sea  for  their  livelihood.  I  appreciate  her  leadership  on  oceans 
issues,  and  her  continued  interest  in  improving  our  Nation’s  fisheries  conservation 
programs  while  at  the  same  time  promoting  policies  aimed  at  maintaining  sustain-
able fisheries and communities. 

I am less familiar with North Atlantic high seas enforcement than with the North 
Pacific.  However,  I  believe  that  there  are  some  fundamental  characteristics  to  suc-
cessful and effective programs that transcend regional differences. These include: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

94 

Good  science.  The  foundation  of  successful  management  and  conservation  is  hav-
ing  a  strong  scientific  program  that  provides  managers  with  the  information  they 
need  to  ensure  sustainable  harvests  and  take  into  account  ecosystem  factors.  For 
HMS, this is especially true, given their complex life history. 

Accurate  monitoring.  For  fisheries  operating  on  the  high  seas,  effective  and 
verifiable  monitoring  programs  are  a  must.  At-sea  observers,  augmented  by  vessel 
logs  and  independent  verification  are  a  necessary  part  of  successful  management. 
This  is  especially  true  for  international  agreements  that  set  harvest  quotas  among 
numerous  nations.  Each  party  (nation)  must  be  able  to  independently  verify  the 
catches  reported  by  the  other  parties  in  order  for  all  parties  to  trust  the  manage-
ment system. 

Strict application of catch levels and other restrictions. There needs to be an effec-
tive,  cooperative  regime  in  place  to  ensure  that  catch  levels  are  adhered  to,  with 
stiff  penalties  for  overharvest.  For  example,  if  a  party  (nation)  overharvests  its 
quota  for  bluefin  tuna  in  a  given  year,  then  the  quota  for  the  next  year  should  de-
duct  that  amount  plus  an  additional  amount  as  a  penalty  for  non-compliance.  I  do 
not know if such an arrangement exists in the North Atlantic; but given the history 
of  overharvest  of  various  species  by  parties  such  as  the  EU,  something  similar 
should be implemented. 

Cooperative enforcement. In the North Pacific, pursuant to the North Pacific Anad-
romous  Fish  Convention  (and  subsequently  other  arrangements)  enforcement  ves-
sels  from  a  non-flag  state  can  detain,  board,  inspect,  and  divert  to  port  vessels  en-
gaged  in  IUU  fishing  such  as  high  seas  driftnet  fishing.  This  means  that  a  U.S. 
Coast  Guard  Cutter  could  detain  a  Japanese  vessel  engaged  in  illegal  high  seas 
driftnet fishing in the North Pacific. Prosecution of the offenders is by the flag state. 
Much  credit  goes  to  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  for  their  diligent  work  to  ensure  that 
these  cooperative  arrangements  continue  to  work.  As  a  result,  in  the  North  Pacific 
there  is  an  effective  cooperative  enforcement  net  for  stopping  violations  of  the  rel-
evant international agreements. This has been an extremely effective and necessary 
component to our international management regime. 

As  I  mentioned,  I  am  not  as  familiar  with  North  Atlantic  arrangements  as  I  am 
with  the  North  Pacific.  But,  if  there  are  lessons  to  be  learned  and  applied  to  the 
North  Atlantic  I  believe  that  the  above  characteristics  need  to  be  implemented  in 
your region. This will require a concerted effort on the part of the U.S. government, 
the  Congress,  the  regional  seafood  industry,  and  other  interests.  The  various  inter-
ests need to provide the U.S. with a strong and cohesive position as well as support 
for  aggressive  and  determined  diplomacy  at  several  levels  of  government.  In  my 
view,  the  biggest  challenge  to  developing  a  cohesive  U.S.  policy  will  depend  on 
whether  or  not  the  environmental  lobby  can  set  aside  its  rhetorical  stance  on  some 
issues  and  work  effectively  with  other  interests  such  as  the  seafood  industry  to 
achieve a common goal. That has certainly been a challenge in our part of the world. 
Question  1a.  You  are  clearly  very  familiar  with  the  gaps  in  international  agree-
ments surrounding Alaska, but have you identified any other gaps in high seas fish-
eries  management  elsewhere  in  the  world?  What  steps  can  the  U.S.  take  to  close 
these gaps? 

Answer. Many, if not most of the international fisheries management regimes and 
organizations around the world are targeted on specific fisheries. Tuna agreements, 
squid  agreements,  salmon  treaties,  etc.  This  species/fisheries  specific  approach  is  a 
practical,  efficient,  and  cost  effective  way  for  international  interests  to  address  real 
world management issues. However, gaps exist at both the geographic level as well 
as species coverage. This is true for most parts of the world, even the North Pacific. 
For  example,  in  the  central  and  eastern  North  Pacific  there  are  no  international 
management  regimes  in  place  to  address  fishing  on  seamounts,  or  for  species  other 
than  salmon  and  highly  migratory  species.  With  the  push  now  for  new  Regional 
Fishery  Management  Organizations  (RFMOs)  these  gaps  hopefully  can  be  filled  so 
there are management regimes in place around the globe. However, again one of the 
biggest  challenges  is  crafting  international  arrangements  that  are  simple,  effective, 
and practical. I believe that the international fisheries provisions in the most recent 
reauthorization  of  the  MSA  should  help  advance  U.S.  interests  internationally  if 
they  are  implemented  thoughtfully.  In  my  view,  this  means  we  need  to  get  back  to 
some  basics.  In  recent  years,  international  agreements  have  often  times  become 
more  about  furthering  esoteric  principles  instead  of  focusing  on  practical  and  effec-
tive  measures  to  address  real-world  management  and  conservation  issues.  What  is 
needed  is  less  focus  on  ill  defined  ‘‘principles’’  and  more  work  on  solid  science  pro-
grams, effective harvest and fishing capacity controls, and at-sea monitoring and en-
forcement programs. And, in the end, U.S. fishing interests need to see some benefit 
from these international agreements. Instead of U.S. fishermen sitting on the beach 
while foreign fishing fleets continue to fish, new agreements need to place the same 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

95 

requirements  on  all  participants,  including  opportunity  for  U.S.  interests  to  fish  as 
well as foreign fleets. 

Question  1b.  How  effective  has  the  Coast  Guard’s  high  seas  driftnet  enforcement 
program been at reducing incidents of IUU driftnet fishing? Are the resources being 
applied  to  this  program  causing  a  reduction  in  effort  in  domestic  enforcement? 
Should the program be expanded into the north Atlantic? 

Answer.  In  my  mind,  this  is  one  of  the  most  important  issues  to  be  addressed. 
In  the  North  Pacific  I  do  not  believe  that  international  arrangements  and  obliga-
tions are currently undermining regional domestic monitoring and enforcement pro-
grams.  I  can  not  speak  to  the  situation  for  the  North  Atlantic.  But,  if  new  inter-
national arrangements do not build on existing programs, and if these new arrange-
ments  are  not  crafted  around  solid  and  easily  enforceable  requirements,  then  there 
is  a  significant  likelihood  that  we  will  be  placing  an  unreasonable  burden  on  the 
U.S.  Coast  Guard  and  handing  them  a  mission  with  an  unattainable  goal.  Even 
now,  USCG  resources  are  stretched  thin,  and  additional  funding  and  assets  are 
needed. But, with the emerging demands of the Arctic Ocean opening up, increased 
responsibilities for enforcing ever more complicated international laws and treaties, 
coupled  with  growing  domestic  demands  the  USCG  is  going  to  be  severely  ham-
strung  if  Congress  and  the  Administration  doesn’t  step  up  to  the  plate  with  addi-
tional  support.  So,  my  belief  is  that  the  USCG  is  up  to  the  task,  whether  it  is  in 
the  North  Pacific,  the  South  Pacific,  the  Gulf  of  Mexico  or  the  North  Atlantic:  but 
only  if  we  provide  them  the  tools,  support,  and  resources  necessary  to  get  the  job 
done. 

Question  2.  Regional  Fishery  Management  Organizations  or  RFMOs  exist  in  nu-
merous  forms  that  vary  in  terms  of  quantities  of  fish  stocks  addressed,  numbers  of 
party  states,  and  areas  of  sovereignty  to  which  the  treaties  apply.  The  U.S.  alone 
is  party  to  more  than  a  dozen  different  RFMOs.  Given  all  these  discrepancies  be-
tween  the  different  organizations,  each  clearly  requires  specific  negotiations.  But 
there must be some underlying principles that can be applied across multiple orga-
nizations—a  set  of  ‘‘best  management  practices’’  that  can  facilitate  agreements  and 
lead  to  a  brighter  future  for  our  world’s  fisheries.  Since  each  RFMO  is  designed  to 
address unique regions and stocks, they have adopted different approaches for forg-
ing  cooperation.  What  have  you  found  to  be  some  ‘‘best  practices’’  of  RFMOs  that 
can and should be adopted by other RFMOs? 

Answer.  I  believe  that  I  have  addressed  most  of  this  above.  However,  I  want  to 
emphasize one of the crucial factors that I believe will determine success or failure. 
One of the biggest challenges, in my mind, is crafting international agreements that 
are  effective,  efficient,  and  practical.  Too  often,  the  environmental  lobby  has  di-
verted  negotiations  from  the  hard  work  necessary  to  build  effective  regimes  toward 
an argument about broad and ill defined principles. This is the path to inaction and 
needs to be avoided. 

As  for  the  rest,  RFMOs  in  my  view  need  to  have  solid  practical  requirements  for 
science, independently verifiable monitoring, effective enforcement, and penalties for 
non-compliance. Decisions need to be transparent, but transparency should not lead 
to gridlock. And in the end, the parties to any such agreements need to see tangible 
benefits.  This  must  include  U.S.  fishing  interests  that  have  often  times  been  dis-
advantaged  by  such  agreements,  taking  on  the  majority  of  the  conservation  burden 
while the fishermen of other nations continue to fish. 

Question  3.  RFMOs  consistently  have  problems  with  securing  compliance  of  their 
member  states,  even  for  simple  functions  like  data  reporting.  In  reauthorizing  the 
Magnuson  Stevens  Act  at  the  end  of  the  109th  Congress,  new  authority  was  pro-
vided  for  the  Federal  Government  to  manage  international  fisheries.  Among  those 
provisions  was  the  authority  to  identify  and  impose  trade  restrictions  on  countries 
that  are  known  to  engage  in  IUU  Fishing  practices,  but  the  Federal  Government 
has  not  yet  carried  out  this  authorization.  If  the  Federal  Government  chose  to  act 
on  the  authority  provided  by  Congress  to  identify  and  sanction  nations  that  are 
know  to  use  IUU  Fishing  practices,  how  would  that  impact  our  work  within  the 
RFMO  structure?  Would  it  improve  or  degrade  our  negotiating  position  with  other 
member states? What kinds of incentives can we offer to help encourage other coun-
tries to live up to their commitments under RFMOs? 

Answer.  I  believe  that  the  provisions  provided  by  Congress  can  assist  the  United 
States exert a leadership role in the development of RFMOs, or in its efforts to im-
prove existing RFMOs if they are part of a ‘‘carrot and stick’’ approach. This means 
that U.S. diplomacy must be firm, but practical and reasonable as mentioned in pre-
viously.  We  also  need  to  be  careful  not  to  open  ourselves  to  vulnerabilities  such  as 
violating  world  trade  rules,  or  allowing  other  nation’s  to  use  similar  measures  not 
for conservation, but to secure trade advantages. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

96 

With  regard  to  incentives,  the  U.S.  has  the  opportunity  to  assist  developing  na-
tions  to  better  manage  resources  within  their  waters  or  on  the  high  seas  through 
technical assistance and fiscal support. It will be more difficult to provide incentives 
to developed nations although there are incentives for many nations to work closely 
with  the  U.S.  on  scientific  and  conservation  programs  to  better  manage  resources 
those countries depend upon. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

JAMES COOK 

Question  1.  Mr.  Cook,  can  you  address  the  effectiveness  of  the  Western  and  Cen-
tral  Pacific  Fisheries  Commission  to  establish  conservation  and  management  ef-
forts? 

Answer. Since its inception, the WCPFC has been working implementing essential 
monitoring  and  control  measures  such  as  Vessel  Monitoring  Systems  (VMS),  a  re-
gional  observer  program,  vessel  identification  requirements,  and  boarding  and  in-
spection  measures.  Currently,  the  VMS  and  a  regional  observer  programs  have  not 
been  fully  agreed  to  and  implemented,  which  indicates  that  it  has  taken  a  signifi-
cant  amount  of  time  to  implement  some  of  the  more  basic,  yet  essential,  conserva-
tion and management measures. 

Regarding  conservation  and  management  of  fish  stocks,  the  WCPFC  agreed  to 
measures  to  reduce  bigeye  tuna  overfishing  involving  catch  quotas  for  longline  ves-
sels  and  fishing  effort  increases  for  purse  seine  vessels.  Despite  these  measures, 
there  is  no  indication  that  they  have  been  successful  in  reducing  bigeye  tuna  over-
fishing,  as  there  are  too  many  longliners  fishing  in  the  convention  area  and  too 
much purse seine FAD fishing. 

Question  2.  To  what  extent  has  the  Western  and  Central  Pacific  Fisheries  Com-
mission  consulted  with  and  coordinated  with  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna 
Commission?  What  do  you  see  as  possible  impediments  for  the  two  commissions  to 
come together and collaborate? 

Answer.  The  IATTC  and  WCPFC  have  signed  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding 
to  cooperate  on  and  as  much  as  possible  harmonize  fishery  management  between 
the two areas of competence. However, the membership composition of the two Com-
missions is one of the key factors, which may create impediments to reaching a con-
sensus  on  collaboration.  In  the  WCPFC,  the  Pacific  Islands  form  a  single  block,  to-
gether with Australia and New Zealand, in the form of the Forum Fisheries Agency 
(FFA), which is a majority of the countries in the WCPFC. Although all of the mem-
ber countries of FAA sit as independent commission members their interventions in 
the  Commission  process  are  made  on  the  basis  of  an  agreed  upon  FFA  position. 
There is no similar grouping in the ITTC, where all members speak independently. 
The  South  and  Central  American  countries,  which  are  the  majority  of  the  IATTC, 
have  not  formed  a  similar  bloc  within  IATTC,  and  only  recently,  in  2006  began  to 
caucus  to  see  if  they  could  develop  their  own  consensus  on  management  measures. 
Furthermore, the two commissions utilize different organizations to provide stock as-
sessments  for  fisheries  they  manage.  Often,  there  are  disagreements  between  the  two 
commissions  on  the  stock  structure  of  manages  species  such  as  yellowfin  and  bigeye 
tuna. 

Question  3.  Mr.  Cook,  you  mentioned  in  your  written  testimony  that  69  percent 
of  U.S.  purse  seiners  use  FADs.  What  effects  would  the  prohibition  of  this  tech-
nology as recommended by the WPFMC, have on U.S. purse seiners? 

Answer. The U.S. fleet would have to fish on free swimming or un-associated skip-
jack  schools.  It  would  be  competing  against  other  purse  seine  fleets,  some  of  which 
on  un-associated  schools,  while  others  fish  predominantly  on  FADs.  The  U.S.  fleet 
has swung back and forth between using FADs and fishing on un-associated schools, 
but  currently,  the  use  of  FADs  may  be  critical  since  the  use  of  FADs  may  greatly 
reduce  the  fuel  requirements  by  obviating  the  need  to  search  for  free  swimming 
skipjack  schools.  As  fuel  becomes  more  expensive,  FAD  use  will  likely  increase. 
FADs  are  instrumented  with  radio  transponders  and  have  sonar  buoys  suspended 
beneath  to  monitor  fish  biomass  accumulating  beneath  the  FAD.  Purse  seiners  can 
therefore query each of their FADs to determine which is likely to be the most pro-
ductive and thus cut down on uncertainty. 

Question  4.  The  United  States  has  not  released  a  management  plan  for  the  use 

of FADs as required by the WCPFC in 2006. What is the status of this plan? 

Answer. The State Department and NMFS are working on a solution to the FAD 
problem and hope to gain support at the WCPFC meeting in Pusan this December. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

97 

Question  5.  The  Western  pacific  Management  Council  has  proactively  addressed 
the  issue  of  bycatch,  especially  in  regard  to  sea  birds  and  turtles.  What  effects  do 
bycatch  reduction  techniques  included  in  their  bycatch  reduction  program  have  on 
the total catch allowable? 

Answer.  The  implementation  of  seabird  and  sea  turtles  in  the  Hawaii  longline 
fleet  has  not  had  a  major  influence  on  catch  rates  of  target  species:  however,  the 
requirement  of  circle  hooks  and  mackerel  bait  in  addition  to  sea  bird  mitigation 
measures  such  as  night  setting,  side  setting,  blued  dyed  bait  have  significantly  re-
duce  sea  turtles  and  seabird  interactions  by  orders  of  magnitude  within  fleet.  In 
other words, the bycatch measures have been highly successful in reducing protected 
species interactions while maintaining high catch rates of target species. 

Question  6.  Mr.  Cook,  would  you  say  that  other  nations  enforce  bycatch  and  sea 

turtle conservation standards to the same degree as the United States? 

Answer. No, other nations do not have nor enforce bycatch and sea turtle conserva-
tion  standards  to  the  same  degree  as  the  United  States  as  the  U.S.  has  the  most 
strictly regulated pelagic longline fleets in the world. Other fleets, notably the New 
Zealand  and  Australian  longline  fleets  have  taken  steps  to  reduce  seabird  inter-
actions but have not made the same changes to their longline fleets to minimize sea 
turtle  interactions.  Japan  has  advocated  a  requirement  for  all  shallow  set  longline 
fleets in the WCPFC to use large circle hooks and fish bait, but Australia, New Zea-
land and the EU have so far resisted such a measure. 

Question 7. If not, can you speak to the economic impacts this has on U.S. fisher-

man? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  longline  fleet  in  the  Pacific  is  competing  against  less  regulated 
fleets which target the same stocks of fish, some of which are exported to the U.S.. 
In addition to gear requirements such as circle hooks and fish bait, the Hawaii shal-
low-set  longline  fishery  that  targets  swordfish  is  also  regulated  by  an  effort  limit 
and  sea  turtle  interaction  hard  caps  as  well  as  100  percent  observer  coverage.  The 
Hawaii  deep-set  longline  fishery,  which  targets  bigeye  tuna  is  restricted  from  de-
ploying  shallow-sets  on  a  tuna  trip.  Historically,  these  fisheries  could  switch  be-
tween  gear  and  often  would  do  ‘‘mixed’’  sets  at  various  depths.  Therefore,  based  on 
these  highly  restrictive  regulatory  regimes,  the  Hawaii  longline  fleet  has  less  flexi-
bility,  as  opposed  to  unregulated  fisheries,  to  switch  between  shallow  and  deep  set 
fishing in response to economic conditions and market demand. 

Question 8. The Hawaii-based longline fishery is closed down when the maximum 
limit  of  sea  turtles  interactions  has  been  reached.  Has  the  bycatch  reduction  pro-
gram impacted the length of longline season? 

Answer. From 2004–2007, only in 2006 the shallow set fishery was closed for the 
remainder  of  the  year  when  the  loggerhead  cap  of  16  interactions  was  reached  in 
March. However, the effort cap and turtle caps have had an influence on fishermen 
behavior.  Prior  to  the  current  management  regime  for  the  swordfish  fishery,  effort 
for  swordfish  would  typically  peak  in  the  second  quarter  of  the  year.  By  contrast, 
swordfish  effort  had  tended  to  peak  in  the  first  quarter  as  fishermen  ‘race’  to  the 
turtle cap, i.e., expend their allowable effort as fast as possible before the loggerhead 
turtle  cap  is  reached.  Loggerhead  interaction  rates  are  generally  higher  in  the  first 
quarter  of  the  year,  however,  in  2008,  no  loggerhead  interactions  have  been  ob-
served in the fishery. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

JAMES COOK 

Question  1.  In  your  written  testimony,  I  noticed  that  you  say  the  State  Depart-
ment,  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  (NMFS),  and  Coast  guard  are  all  ‘‘doing 
their best to implement the international provisions of the Magnuson-Stevens Reau-
thorization Act of 2006 within the context of the international regional fishery man-
agement organizations.’’ You also mention, though, that NMFS has failed to develop 
a  Fish  Aggregating  Device  management  plan  as  was  agreed  to  under  the  Western 
and Central Pacific Fisheries Commission. Papua Guinea has a plan, but the United 
States does not. Does this mean that Papua New Guinea is a more responsible play-
er in international fishing in the Pacific than we are? Why has the National Marine 
Fisheries Service failed to develop and issue a plan? What does this do to our credi-
bility  on  these  issues?  Doesn’t  it  prevent  us  from  pushing  others  on  conservation? 
Answer. The economic zone of Papua New Guinea has a FAD density higher than 

anywhere in the Pacific and therefore a heightened need to monitor. 

The State Department and NMFS are working on a solution to the FAD problem 

and hope to gain support at the WCPFC meeting in Pusan this December. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

98 

Question 2. I understand that your fishery has been faced with numerous bycatch 
issues  in  recent  years,  and  that  we  have  had  a  fair  amount  of  success  in  finding 
solutions  that  reduce  the  fishery’s  bycatch.  What  has  our  government  been  doing 
to  push  other  nations’  fishing  fleets  to  adopt  these  successful  bycatch  reduction 
methods?  What  has  your  company,  fishery,  or  industry  done  to  help  this?  Wouldn’t 
you say that this responsibility also lies on your shoulders and not solely on the gov-
ernment’s? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  has  been  proactive  in  pushing  for  the  adoption  of  circle  hooks 
and  fish  bait  for  shallow  set  longline  fishing  in  the  WCPFC.  The  Hawaii  Longline 
association  and  my  company  Pacific  Ocean  Producers  (POP)  have  been  extremely 
supportive  and  pro-active  in  developing  mitigation  technology  for  seabirds  and  sea 
turtles.  The  technique  of  side  setting  to  minimize  seabird  interactions  was  a  result 
of  collaborative  effort  by  POP  and  the  Blue  Ocean  Institute  to  test  underwater  set-
ting  chutes  for  longlining,  during  which  the  simpler  technique  of  side-setting 
emerged  and  has  now  been  implemented  on  about  one  third  of  the  Hawaii  longline 
fleet.  The  fishing  industry  must  be  proactively  engaged  in  the  development  of 
longline  mitigation  technology.  Many  of  the  solutions  will  be  found  within  the  vast 
storehouse of fishermen’s knowledge from the thousands of hours of experience fish-
ermen have fishing and observing ocean ecosystem, including bycatch species. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. TED STEVENS TO 

JAMES COOK 

Question 1. How the U.S. can increase the effectiveness of the WCPFC? 
Answer. The U.S. can increase effectiveness in the WCPFC by taking hard stances 
on various conservation and management issues, e.g., bigeye tuna conservation. The 
$18  million  per  year  in  the  funds  provided  to  member  nations  of  the  South  Pacific 
Tuna  Treaty  act  is  significant  and  can  be  used  as  leveraging  tool.  The  U.S.  also 
needs  to  be  a  leader  in  preparing  and  submitting  reports  or  plans,  such  as  a  plan 
for  purse  seine  fishing  around  Fish  Aggregation  Devices,  which  is  a  requirement  of 
WCPFC  member  nations,  however  to  date,  has  not  bee  provided  to  the  WCPFC  by 
the U.S. 

Question 2. How can we bring about a better relationship with the Western Pacific 
Fisheries Management Council to improve U.S. international fisheries management? 
Answer.  The  U.S.  Government  can  bring  about  a  better  relationship  with  the 
WCPFC  through  perpetually  assigning  the  chair  of  the  WPFMC  to  be  a  WCPFC 
Commission as called for under the MSRA. The U.S. Government should also assign 
the  chair  of  the  WPFMC  to  be  a  commissioner  of  the  IATTC  to  ensure  consistency 
between the Pacific tuna RFMOs which in some cases manage the same fish stocks. 
The draft MOU between the State Department, NMFS, and the three Pacific fish-
ery management councils (FMCs), which to date has not been agreed to, is another 
important  tool  to  bring  about  a  better  relationship  with  the  WPFMC.  The  draft 
MOU outlines important facets of cooperation between the FMCs and the U.S. Gov-
ernment in relation to international fisheries management and how it applies to do-
mestic regulations. A clear MOU is essential to implement domestic regulations that 
are based on international agreements. 

Further,  the  U.S.  management  of  highly  migratory  fish  stocks  (HMS)  is  not  har-
monious  between  the  Atlantic,  and  the  two  halves  of  the  Pacific  Ocean.  In  the  At-
lantic, NMFS has assumed management of HMS and the Regional Fishery Manage-
ment Councils have been marginalized in the process. In the Eastern Pacific, inter-
national  management  of  HMS  has  been  conducted  under  a  1949  convention  which 
established  the  Inter-American  Tropical  Tuna  Commission,  which  was  initially  for 
pole-and-line tuna fishing and predates the rise of purse seining, the Magnuson Act 
and  the  implantation  of  the  FMCs.  The  Pacific  and  Western  Pacific  Council  are 
marginalized  in  the  process,  even  though  the  Western  Pacific  longline  fleet  based 
out  of  Hawaii  fishes  in  the  Eastern  Pacific.  Neither  Council  serves  as  a  Commis-
sioner,  nor  are  the  Councils  even  members  of  the  General  Advisory  Committee  or 
the  Science  Committee  despite  making  an  application  for  membership  on  both  sev-
eral years ago. Indeed the GAC is top heavy with purse seiners and Cannery folks, 
despite the virtual demise of U.S. purse seine fishing in the Eastern Pacific and the 
canning industry on the West Coast. 

The  Antigua  Convention  designed  to  supersede  the  1949  Convention  and  the  im-
plementing legislation is an opportunity to redress this balance and make it mirror 
the implementing legislation for the Western and Central Pacific Fisheries Commis-
sion.  This  would  include  having  Commissioners  from  both  of  the  two  Councils  and 
to  include  Council  membership  in  the  GAC  to  include  the  representative  range  of 
fishers from longline and troll fisheries . This would bring the IATTC into line with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

99 

the Western and Central Pacific Fisheries Commission and its implementing legisla-
tion, which specifies the Council Chairs as Commissioners and its role in the W&C 
Pacific  Advisory  Committee.  Moreover,  the  appointment  of  members  of  the  W&C 
Advisory  Committee  is  through  the  Commerce  Department  not  the  Department  of 
State, which again is something that should be rectified in the Antigua Convention 
implementing legislation. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

JAMES COOK 

Question  1.  Regional  Fishery  Management  Organizations  or  RFMOs  exist  in  nu-
merous  forms  that  vary  in  terms  of  quantities  of  fish  stocks  addressed,  numbers  of 
party  states,  and  areas  of  sovereignty  to  which  the  treaties  apply.  The  U.S.  alone 
is  party  to  more  than  a  dozen  different  RFMOs.  Given  all  these  discrepancies  be-
tween  the  different  organizations,  each  clearly  requires  specific  negotiations.  But 
there must be some underlying principles that can be applied across multiple orga-
nizations—a  set  of  ‘‘best  management  practices’’  that  can  facilitate  agreements  and 
lead  to  a  brighter  future  for  our  world’s  fisheries.  Since  each  RFMO  is  designed  to 
address unique regions and stocks, they have adopted different approaches for forg-
ing  cooperation.  What  have  you  found  to  be  some  ‘‘best  practices’’  of  RFMOs  that 
can and should be adopted by other RFMOs? 

Answer. Best practices include regular meetings as well as Memorandums of Un-
derstanding  (MOU)  between  RFMOs  to  share  common  management  approaches  for 
the same stock. For example, Article 22 of the Western and Central Pacific Fisheries 
Convention requires the Commission to collaborate with other relevant intergovern-
mental  organizations  particularly  those  with  related  objectives  and  which  can  con-
tribute  to  the  attainment  of  the  objective  of  the  Convention.  The  Tuna  RFMOs  did 
meet last year in Kobe, Japan and discussed performance measures. I have attached 
a matrix of ‘‘Suggested Criteria for Reviewing the Performance of RFMOs’’ for your 
consideration.  I  believe  identifying  such  criteria  is  an  essential  step  toward  estab-
lishing best practices. 

Another  best  practice,  however,  does  not  necessarily  pertain  to  RFMOs,  but  it 
does  involve  regular  international  meetings  amongst  fishermen  to  share  common 
understandings  and  to  address  management  issues  regarding  target  stocks  and  by-
catch of protected species. A good example of a successful series of meetings are the 
International  Fishers  Forums  (coordinated  by  the  Western  Pacific  Fishery  Manage-
ment  Council)  where  fishermen  from  all  over  the  world  have  gathered  to  discuss 
measures  and  methods  to  reduce  bycatch  of  sea  turtles  and  seabirds.  These  types 
of  meetings  are  essential  in  bringing  fishermen,  as  well  as  fishery  managers,  to-
gether to share information and best practices that work in their fisheries. 

Question 2a. RMFOs consistently have problems with securing compliance of their 
member  states,  even  for  simple  functions  like  data  reporting.  In  reauthorizing  the 
Magnuson  Stevens  Act  at  the  end  of  the  109th  Congress,  new  authority  was  pro-
vided  for  the  Federal  Government  to  manage  international  fisheries.  Among  those 
provisions  was  the  authority  to  identify  and  impose  trade  restrictions  on  countries 
that  are  known  to  engage  in  IUU  Fishing  practices,  but  the  Federal  Government 
has  not  yet  carried  out  this  authorization.  If  the  Federal  Government  chose  to  act 
on  the  authority  provided  by  Congress  to  identify  and  sanction  nations  that  are 
know  to  use  IUU  Fishing  practices,  how  would  that  impact  our  work  within  the 
RFMO  structure?  Would  it  improve  or  degrade  our  negotiating  position  with  other 
member states? 

Answer.  It  would  send  a  clear  message  that  the  U.S.  is  taking  the  issue  of  fish-
eries management in the international context very seriously. I think in some cases 
it  could  degrade  negotiation  positions  if  the  U.S.  is  inconsistent  in  its  IUU  listings 
and sanctions. For example, the U.S. does not have yet to develop a clear policy on 
how  it  will  list  IUU  vessels  and  nations,  nor  has  it  developed  a  policy  in  how  to 
deal  with  U.S.  vessels  that  may  be  considered  IUU  by  RFMOs  or  other  nations.  In 
addition,  the  U.S.  is  not  necessary  compliant  on  all  measures  of  international  fish-
eries management agreements (e.g., no U.S. FAD management plan as called under 
the  WCPFC).  This  being  said,  taking  a  hard  stance  on  issues  and  sanctioning  IUU 
nations in some cases would improve our negotiating position as potential sanctions 
from the world’s largest economy is undoubtedly a powerful negotiating tool. 

Question 2b. What kinds of incentives can we offer to help encourage other coun-

tries to live up to their commitments under RFMOs? 

Answer.  For  the  Pacific  Island  Nations  that  are  party  to  the  South  Pacific  Tuna 
Treaty (SPTT), I think the annual $18 million the U.S. provides to them under the 
SPTT  for  U.S.  purse  seine  access  to  their  waters  is  a  strong  incentive  and  bar-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

100 

gaining  tool  for  compliance  within  RFMOs.  Besides  the  aid  the  U.S.  provides  to 
many  nations  party  to  RFMOs,  there  are  really  not  many  incentives  the  U.S.  can 
provide  to  nations  to  live  up  to  commitment  under  RFMOs.  In  some  cases  the  U.S. 
could  provide  observer  training  in  relation  to  data  collection  or  enforcement  meas-
ures. The Western Pacific Regional Fishery Management Council has also been con-
ducting  a  series  of  International  Fishers  Forums  (IIFF),  which  have  brought  to-
gether  pelagic  fishers  from  all  over  the  Pacific  and  beyond  to  discuss  and  share 
ways  to  develop  environmentally  responsible  methods  of  pelagic  fishing.  However, 
when  dealing  with  resource  conservation,  there  is  little  the  U.S.  could  do  outside 
of  RFMO  negotiations  in  terms  of  how  much  of  the  resource  is  harvested  in  within 
the EEZ of foreign countries. 

Question  3.  In  response  to  a  growing  awareness  among  consumers  about  seafood 
sustainability,  we  have  seen  a  proliferation  of  voluntary  eco-labeling  practices  for 
fish  products.  One  of  the  major  players  in  the  certification  of  seafood  sustainability 
is  the  Marine  Stewardship  Council,  based  in  the  U.K.  In  my  home  state  of  Maine, 
organizations such as the Port Clyde Groundfishermens’ Cooperative and the Maine 
Lobster Promotion Council have begun taking steps to certify their products as ‘sus-
tainable’  to  take  advantage  of  this  trend.  In  fact,  some  major  retailers  in  the  U.S., 
such  as  Wal-Mart  have  made  a  commitment  to  sell  nothing  but  fish  certified  as 
‘‘sustainable’’.  What  are  the  costs  and  benefits  of  this  approach?  What  are  some 
other voluntary mechanisms for encouraging wise consumer decisions? 

Answer. Eco-labeling and certification programs for marine capture fisheries, and 
sustainable seafood sourcing policies and standards adopted by retailers and seafood 
buyers  is  being  increasingly  referred  to  as  the  ‘Sustainable  Seafood  Movement’. 
Most  Sustainable  Seafood  activities  are  currently  taking  place  in  developed  coun-
tries, notably in Europe, the USA and Australasia; while there have been a few re-
cent initiatives to help facilitate certification in developing countries. 

In Europe in particular, environmental NGO’s are currently at the forefront in in-
fluencing  the  sustainable  seafood  agenda  with,  for  example,  Greenpeace’s  eco- 
rankings of supermarket retail chains in the UK, Denmark and Sweden, and plans 
for a similar initiative in the U.S. Greenpeace has been very active in Britain where 
there  are  only  a  few  major  supermarket  chains  and  where  supermarket  retailers 
will do whatever it takes to protect their brands from negative publicity. Greenpeace 
has also been critical of some fisheries certified by the Marine Stewardship Council 
(MSC)  which  creates  conflict  and  confusion  for  both  retailers  and  the  public.  One 
could  therefore  look  at  eco-labeling  as  a  cost  of  doing  business  or  legitimized  extor-
tion.  Certification  can  also  come  with  conditions  attached.  Such  is  the  case  of  the 
Marine Stewardship Council’s (MSC) certification of the American Albacore Fishing 
Association  (AAFA).  Part  of  the  certification  conditions  include  a  requirement  to 
take  appropriate  steps  to  request  that  management  agencies  begin  a  process  to  de-
velop  a  framework  for  development  and  clear  documentation  of  decision  rules  and 
appropriate  harvest  control  mechanisms  in  the  South  Pacific  albacore  fishery.  Al-
though  a  seemingly  reasonable  and  precautionary  requirement,  it  is  nonetheless 
based  on  actions  which  are  not  directly  connected  with  the  sustainability  of  the 
AAFA fishery and require AAFA to follow a specified policy agenda. 

From the perspective of the Hawaii longline fishery, there is little economic incen-
tive to seek eco-certification since it will not likely improve the already high market 
profile of fish caught by Hawaii’s longliners. However, the Hawaii Longline Associa-
tion would likely be in favor of the U.S. Government and the National Marine Fish-
eries  Service  becoming  ‘third  party’  certifiers.  NMFS  already  has  a  Fish  Watch 
website  for  consumers  where  they  can  read  up  on  fisheries.  It  would  be  a  natural 
extension of this initiative to move into certification. 

Sustainability  criteria  used  by  some  environmental  non-governmental  organiza-
tions,  retailers,  and  buyers  are  based  on  the  Food  and  Agriculture  Organization  of 
the  United  Nations’  Code  of  Conduct  for  Responsible  Fisheries  (COC),  and  address 
minimum  standards  for  the:  (i)  adequacy  of  the  fisheries  management  systems,  (ii) 
the  health  of  stocks  under  consideration,  and  (iii)  ecosystem  effects  (e.g.,  bycatch  of 
sensitive  species  groups,  habitat  effects  from  fishing  gear,  status  of  stocks  of  non- 
target  catch,  impacts  on  dependent  predators).  The  Hawaii  longline  fishery  has 
twice been evaluated against the FAO COC and scores in excess of 90 percent. 

Further,  the  Western  Pacific  Regional  Fishery  Management  Council  recently  co- 
hosted the Sustainable Tuna Round Table one of the outcomes of which was agree-
ment  that  The  Food  and  Agriculture  Organization  of  the  United  Nation’s  Code  of 
Conduct for Responsible Fisheries is an appropriate starting point as a global, single 
set of standards against which to assess the sustainability of individual marine cap-
ture  fisheries.  The  FAO  has  also  produced  eco-labeling  guidelines  for  countries  and 
industry to develop their own certification programs. Its is planned to hold another 
meeting immediately prior to the next FAO Committee on Fisheries (COFI) in 2009 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

101 

which  would  develop  recommendation  to  be  passed  to  the  various  member  country 
delegations  to  have  COFI  recommend  that  countries  develop  their  own  certification 
based oin the FAO COC and the FAO eco-labeling guidelines. Although there would 
be  many  individual  national  certification  and  labeling  schemes  they  would  all  be 
rooted  in  one  set  of  standards  and  criteria.  The  Committee  may  thus  need  to  con-
sider legislation authorizing the National Marine Fisheries Service to produce a gov-
ernment certified eco-label for the U.S. 

Retailers  and  tuna  fishing  industries  have  identified  concerns  with  existing  as-
sessment  and  eco-certification  programs,  including:  (i)  the  need  for  improved  sci-
entific vigor of some assessment/certification programs; and (ii) demand for a single 
set  of  global,  harmonized  minimum  sustainability  standards  as  a  means  to  address 
confusion and diminished confidence created by the recent proliferation of competing 
certification  and  eco-labeling  programs.  Perhaps  as  the  sustainable  seafood  move-
ment  matures,  retailers  and  restaurant  chains  will  harmonize  their  standards  and 
methods, and as a result, the number of eco-certification and labeling programs will 
be pared down to the few most scientifically vigorous. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

LISA SPEER 

Question  1.  What  recent  progress  has  been  made  toward  the  establishment  of  a 

South Pacific Regional Fisheries Management Organization? 

Answer.  Major  progress  has  been  made  toward  drafting  an  agreement  estab-
lishing  a  South  Pacific  RFMO,  and  strong  interim  measures  have  been  developed 
by the parties negotiating the new RFMO. That said, concerns remain regarding the 
implementation of the interim measures, and conflicts surround decisionmaking and 
other key elements of the draft agreement to establish the RFMO. 

Question  2.  Current  RFMOs  primarily  address  highly  migratory  species,  but  the 
South Pacific RFMO will focus on non-highly migratory species. How do you antici-
pate  this  RFMO  will  be  different  from  the  others  that  we  are  more  familiar  with? 
Answer.  The  South  Pacific  RFMO  will  address  both  bottom  dwelling  fish  species 
and  non-highly  migratory  pelagic  fish,  such  as  jack  mackerel.  It  is  our  hope  that 
the  SP  RFMO  agreement  will  reflect  modern  principles  of  fisheries  management, 
and  as  a  result,  avoid  the  chronic  problems  of  overfishing,  depletion  and  impacts 
on non-target species and ecosystems that have plagued older RFMOs. 

Question 3. There is general uncertainty about what constitutes a Vulnerable Ma-
rine Ecosystem (VME). What is the consensus on the defining this term among the 
international community? 

Answer. A technical consultation is underway under the auspices of the U.N. Food 
and  Agriculture  Organization  to  define  that  term.  The  consultation  is  expected  to 
complete  its  work  by  September  2008.  Progress  to  date  has  been  good  in  some  im-
portant respects, including identification of specific types of habitats and ecosystems 
that should be considered VMEs. 

Question  4.  Within  international  fisheries  management,  what  are  the  next  steps 

to further address VMEs? 

Answer. Under U.N. resolution 61/105, States and RFMOs must, by December 31, 
2008, identify VMEs, assess whether bottom fishing would have significant adverse 
impacts  on  them,  adopt  conservation  and  management  measures  to  prevent  those 
impacts, or not authorize such fishing to proceed. 

Question  5.  Within  the  United  States,  there  has  been  increased  attention  paid  to 
the possible benefits of managing fisheries with an ecosystem-based approach. What 
efforts have been made internationally toward integrating ecosystem-based manage-
ment for fisheries? 

Answer.  With  the  exception  of  the  Antarctic,  very  few  RFMO/As  have  adopted 
meaningful  measures  to  implement  an  ecosystem  approach  to  fisheries  manage-
ment. 

Question  6.  What  are  the  obstacles  to  employing  this  potentially  more  effective 

method of natural resource management? 

Answer. There are several obstacles, but by far the greatest is the lack of political 

will to implement ecosystem approaches to fisheries management. 

Question 7. Ms. Speer, I understand that the issue of shifting baselines is of con-
cern  to  many  in  the  management  community.  What  effects  can  a  lack  of  historical 
catch  and  biological  data  have  on  our  ability  to  sustainably  manage  global  fish 
stocks? 

Answer.  A  poor  understanding  of  historical  catch  and  biological  data  hampers  ef-
forts  to  determine  what  constitutes  recovery  of  fish  stocks  and  ecosystems,  which 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

has  in  turn  led  to  development  of  recovery  targets  that  are  below  what  the  eco-
system and/or fish stock is capable of reaching if given the chance. 

102 

Question  8.  How  can  we  as  a  nation  work  to  compile  relevant  data  sets  that  pro-

vide for effective management and conservation efforts? 

Answer.  An  excellent  question,  one  that  would  benefit  from  a  thoughtful  process. 
One  option  to  consider  is  commissioning  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  to  con-
vene an expert panel to evaluate this question and make recommendations. 

Question  9.  What  do  you  see  as  the  biggest  impediments  to  creating  stock  data 

and catch history within the international fisheries community? 

Answer. The lack of funding for these efforts is the single biggest impediment, fol-
lowed by the absence of a uniform system of data collection and reporting and a cen-
tral repository to analyze and report out findings. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

LISA SPEER 

Question  1.  One  of  the  key  steps  necessary  for  achieving  sustainable  fisheries  is 
developing management organizations with clear mandates, clear lines of authority, 
and  the  authority  to  reduce  catch  and  regulate  harvest.  Taking  a  look  at  a  global 
map  of  the  world’s  international  fishery  management  organizations,  though,  it 
seems like they are more like a disorganized mess. How would you grade the inter-
national  community’s  success  in  developing  management  organizations  with  clear 
mandates and clear lines of authority to regulate fishing harvest? 

Answer. Overall, an F, with few exceptions. 
Question  1a.  What  is  the  U.S.  Government  doing  to  help  improve  that  situation? 

Are we doing enough? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  has  been  a  leader  in  promoting  RFMO  reform.  However  there 
is  much  more  that  needs  to  be  done.  One  very  helpful  step  would  be  to  establish 
regular,  independent  reviews  of  RFMO  performance  against  model  RFMO  perform-
ance standards, such as those developed under the auspices of Chatham House that 
can be found at http://www.oecd.org/dataoecd/2/33/39374297.pdf. A key next step 
for  the  U.S.  would  be  to  seek  agreement  at  the  United  Nations  to  conduct  an  inde-
pendent assessment of the RFMOs against the best practices identified in the Chat-
ham House report. 

Question  2.  In  order  to  manage  fisheries  responsibly,  we  need  to  be  able  to  track 
fish  stocks  effectively.  Good,  solid  science  is  necessary  not  just  to  help  in  making 
wise management choices, but also for getting cooperation and buy-in from the fish-
ermen  who  are  impacted  by  those  management  choices.  In  your  testimony  you  talk 
about  gaps  in  governance  and  gaps  in  enforcement,  but  do  you  believe  that  there 
are also gaps in the science we need for international fisheries management? 

Answer. Yes, very much so. As my friend Sylvia Earle likes to say, we know more 

about Mars than our own oceans. 

Question 2a. What are the main reasons for this science gap? 
Answer.  Scientific  research  on  the  high  seas  is  very  expensive  and  time  con-
suming.  Much  greater  funding  for  deep  ocean  research  is  essential  if  we  are  to  fill 
the gaps necessary for sound conservation and management decisions. 

Question  2b.  Do  you  believe  that  the  U.S.  is  doing  enough  to  play  its  role  in  pro-
moting  good,  solid  science  for  international  fisheries  management?  What  more 
should we be doing? 

Answer. One option to consider is supporting the establishment of a regular, high 
level assessment of the state of ocean health, like an IPCC for the oceans. We would 
like to see the U.S. to play a leadership role in creating such a process. 

Question  3.  United  States  fishing  fleets  often  have  to  deal  with  rigorous  regula-
tions  to  reduce  bycatch  of  threatened  or  endangered  species  like  humpback  whales, 
Steller  sea  lions,  and  sea  turtles.  Many  of  these  species,  however,  are  threatened 
not just by U.S. fleets, but from other nations’ fleets in international waters. In your 
view, is the U.S. doing enough to convince other nations’ fishing fleets to adopt more 
environmentally-sensitive fishing methods used by U.S. fleets to reduce bycatch? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  has  played  a  very  important  role  in  encouraging  other  nations 
to adopt more environmentally sensitive fishing methods. Robust implementation of 
the  2006  amendments  to  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  on  this  topic  are  an  important 
means of making progress. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

103 

Question  3a.  If  other  nations  don’t  adopt  such  methods  and  continue  to  drive  en-
dangered  species  toward  extinction,  couldn’t  this  eventually  threaten  to  close  some 
U.S. fishing fleets under the Endangered Species Act? 

Answer.  My  expertise  does  not  extend  to  the  Endangered  Species  Act,  but  it  is 
critically  important  for  the  U.S.  to  escalate  the  pressure  on  other  countries  whose 
practices do not live up to the standards U.S. fishing fleets must comply with. 

Question 3b. What more should we be doing, and what are the main impediments 

keeping us from being more successful in this arena? 

Answer.  Vigorous  implementation  of  the  amendments  to  the  Magnuson-Stevens 
Act  on  this  topic  is  an  important  means  of  making  progress.  S.  2907,  the  Inter-
national Fisheries Stewardship and Enforcement Act, also represents a means of ad-
dressing  illegal  fishing  that  results  in  harm  to  endangered  and  threatened  species. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

LISA SPEER 

Question  1.  Regional  Fishery  Management  Organizations  or  RFMOs  exist  in  nu-
merous  forms  that  vary  in  terms  of  quantities  of  fish  stocks  addressed,  numbers  of 
party  states,  and  areas  of  sovereignty  to  which  the  treaties  apply.  The  U.S.  alone 
is  party  to  more  than  a  dozen  different  RFMOs.  Given  all  these  discrepancies  be-
tween  the  different  organizations,  each  clearly  requires  specific  negotiations.  But 
there must be some underlying principles that can be applied across multiple orga-
nizations—a  set  of  ‘‘best  management  practices’’  that  can  facilitate  agreements  and 
lead  to  a  brighter  future  for  our  world’s  fisheries.  Since  each  RFMO  is  designed  to 
address unique regions and stocks, they have adopted different approaches for forg-
ing  cooperation.  What  have  you  found  to  be  some  ‘‘best  practices’’  of  RFMOs  that 
can and should be adopted by other RFMOs? 

Answer.  There  have  been  a  number  of  efforts  to  identify  best  practices  among 
RFMOs.  Among  the  best  of  these  is  a  report  prepared  in  2007  by  an  independent 
panel  convened  by  Chatham  House  that  can  be  found  at  http://www.oecd.org/ 
dataoecd/2/33/39374297.pdf.  A  key  next  step  would  be  to  seek  agreement  at  the 
United  Nations  to  conduct  an  independent  assessment  of  the  RFMOs  against  the 
best practices identified in the Chatham House report. 

Question  2.  RMFOs  consistently  have  problems  with  securing  compliance  of  their 
member  states,  even  for  simple  functions  like  data  reporting.  In  reauthorizing  the 
Magnuson  Stevens  Act  at  the  end  of  the  109th  Congress,  new  authority  was  pro-
vided  for  the  Federal  Government  to  manage  international  fisheries.  Among  those 
provisions  was  the  authority  to  identify  and  impose  trade  restrictions  on  countries 
that  are  known  to  engage  in  IUU  Fishing  practices,  but  the  Federal  Government 
has  not  yet  carried  out  this  authorization.  If  the  Federal  Government  chose  to  act 
on  the  authority  provided  by  Congress  to  identify  and  sanction  nations  that  are 
know  to  use  IUU  Fishing  practices,  how  would  that  impact  our  work  within  the 
RFMO  structure?  Would  it  improve  or  degrade  our  negotiating  position  with  other 
member states? What kinds of incentives can we offer to help encourage other coun-
tries to live up to their commitments under RFMOs? 

Answer. The provisions included in the reauthorization related to trade sanctions 
for  countries  whose  vessels  engage  in  IUU  fishing  were  very  important  steps  for-
ward.  We  believe  that  trade  measures  are  an  important  tool  in  the  arsenal,  and 
would help improve the effectiveness of RFMOs if carefully implemented. 

Question  3.  One  of  the  paradoxes  of  international  fisheries  management  is  that 
some developed nations have built up large, efficient, technologically advanced fish-
ing fleets and have depleted fish stocks in their own waters. In search of fertile fish-
ing  grounds  these  vessels  have  been  forced  to  go  further  and  further  afield  to  meet 
their citizens’ appetites and keep their fishermen employed. Meanwhile, some devel-
oping countries have smaller, more sustainable, even artisanal harvesting practices, 
but because these are not economically efficient, their governments can reap greater 
financial  rewards  by  leasing  fishing  rights  to  foreign  countries,  thereby  expanding 
the  areas  in  which  these  more  destructive  fishing  practices  can  occur  and  simulta-
neously displacing their own workers. What specific steps can the U.S. take to help 
developing coastal countries to sustain their stocks? What can we do, through devel-
opment assistance or otherwise, to stop this? 

Answer.  Assistance  to  developing  countries  is  crucial  to  enabling  them  to 
sustainably  manage  fisheries  and  enforce  the  rules  that  apply  within  their  zones. 
Leasing fishing rights can be problematic, as can IUU fishing in the waters of devel-
oping countries that do not have the resources to monitor and control what goes on 
within their zones. There are many ways the U.S. can help, from providing technical 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

104 

assistance (for example, with VMS), to training fisheries managers and enforcement 
officials, to providing financial assistance to FAO to develop a global registry of fish-
ing  vessels,  which  would  help  all  nations,  including  developing  nations,  track  and 
control fishing by foreign fleets within their zones. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:36 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075048 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75048.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

